S.  HRG.  110–1165 

KEEPING  AMERICA  MOVING: 

A  REVIEW  OF  NATIONAL  STRATEGIES 
FOR  EFFICIENT  FREIGHT  MOVEMENT 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SURFACE TRANSPORTATION 

AND MERCHANT MARINE INFRASTRUCTURE, 

SAFETY, AND SECURITY 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

JUNE  10,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

75–682 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  SURFACE  TRANSPORTATION  AND  MERCHANT 

MARINE  INFRASTRUCTURE,  SAFETY,  AND  SECURITY 

FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey, 

Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

Page 
1 
59 
3 
1 
57 

5 
7 

11 
12 

24 
26 

44 
46 

48 
50 

69 

69 

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on June 10, 2008  ...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Carper  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator Smith  ...................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Brubaker,  Hon.  Paul  R.,  Administrator,  Research  and  Innovative  Technology 
Administration, U.S. Department of Transportation  ........................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Glynn,  Hon.  Astrid  C.,  Commissioner,  Department  of  Transportation,  State 
of  New  York;  and  Chair,  Standing  Committee  on  Rail  Transportation, 
American Association of State Highway and Transportation Officials 
...........
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Hamberger,  Edward  R.,  President  and  CEO,  Association  of  American  Rail-
roads  ......................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Larrabee,  Rear  Admiral  Richard  M.,  (Ret.),  Port  Commerce  Director,  Port 
............................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Vanselow,  Glenn,  Executive  Director,  Pacific  Northwest  Waterways  Associa-
........................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Authority of New York and New Jersey 

tion 

Collins, Hon. Susan M., U.S. Senator from Maine, prepared statement  ............
Response  to  written  question  submitted  by  Hon.  Frank  R.  Lautenberg  to 
Hon. Paul R. Brubaker  ........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

KEEPING  AMERICA  MOVING: 

A  REVIEW  OF  NATIONAL  STRATEGIES 
FOR  EFFICIENT  FREIGHT  MOVEMENT 

TUESDAY,  JUNE  10,  2008 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SURFACE TRANSPORTATION AND 

MERCHANT MARINE INFRASTRUCTURE, SAFETY, AND SECURITY,
COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:33  p.m.  in  room 
SR–253, Russell Senate Office Building, Hon. Frank R. Lautenberg, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  We  know  that  railroads  can  be  more 
prompt than I was and we’re working toward on-time performance 
with  freight  as  well  as  passenger  railroads.  So  anyway,  we  thank 
all  of  you  here.  Today  we’re  going  to  take  a  closer  look  at  how  our 
Nation  moves  its  freight  by  ship,  truck,  train,  and  barge,  and  the 
challenges  that  we  must  overcome  to  keep  that  freight  and  our 
economy moving in the future. 

Our  country  has  one  of  the  best  freight  transportation  systems 
in the world. It’s the backbone of our economy. It carries the prod-
ucts  that  Americans  rely  on,  such  as  food,  clothing,  toys,  things 
that go on store shelves. Raw materials like coal, lumber, fuel and 
iron  required  to  manufacture  all  kinds  of  goods  are  also  moved  as 
freight.  Just-in-time  delivery  and  real-time  tracking  of  shipments 
have  greatly  reduced  the  need  for  companies  to  hold  huge  inven-
tories because we can count on goods being there when needed. 

Jobs  are  at  stake  also.  In  my  home  state  of  New  Jersey,  11  per-
cent  of  our  4.4  million  workers  are  involved  in  the  movement  of 
goods. 

But our economy is threatened by the current state of the trans-
portation  infrastructure  and  its  inability  to  meet  future  demands. 
The  Minneapolis  bridge  collapse  was  the  Nation’s  wake-up  call  for 
the  current  state  of  our  infrastructure.  In  fact,  25  percent  of  our 
Nation’s  bridges  are  still  functionally  deficient.  Even  when  these 
bridges  are  repaired,  our  highways  along  with  our  ports  and  rail-
roads will be overwhelmed. 

Congestion on our roads already costs our country nearly $80 bil-
lion a year. On the rails, some trains take—have I been doing that, 
just talking to myself? 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

2 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. It was charming. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Somebody was listening. 
On the rails, some trains take a day to just cross the City of Chi-

cago. 

Total  freight  traffic  is  expected  to  double  in  the  next  20  years. 
To keep getting the goods we need in the future, we’ve got to invest 
in  our  transportation  infrastructure  right  now.  Building  roads  will 
not  solve  all  of  our  problems  and  in  some  places  it’s  not  even  pos-
sible.  Trains  and  barges  can  reduce  highway  congestion  and  wear 
and  tear  on  our  roads  and  bridges.  They’re  also  more  energy  effi-
cient than trucks, which will aid our fight against global warming, 
and help us become more energy independent. 

We  need  to  encourage  these  efficiencies  to  the  maximum  extent 
possible.  The  Federal  Government  has  to  step  up  and  play  a  lead-
ership  role  in  planning  our  future  transportation  network,  one 
which  takes  these  benefits  into  account.  In  New  Jersey  we  know 
that  we’ve  got  to  actively  plan  freight  transportation  solutions  in 
order  to  keep  our  region’s  economy  moving,  and  in  2007  the  New 
Jersey  Department  of  Transportation  published  its  first  com-
prehensive statewide freight plan. It’s time for the Federal Govern-
ment to look to the New Jersey program for ideas to build a freight 
transportation network that is ready for the future needs. 

Congress  is  going  to  consider  these  challenges  in  the  next  year 
as  we  reauthorize  our  surface  transportation  programs.  I  look  for-
ward  to  hearing  from  our  witnesses  how  we  can  meet  that  chal-
lenge.  I  ask  now  that  my  colleague  from  Minnesota,  Senator 
Klobuchar, have a chance to make her opening remarks. 

Before  that,  I  attract  your  attention  to  what  we  see  in  display 
form.  Trains  and  barges  are  more  fuel  efficient.  Look  at  this.  One 
gallon  of  diesel  can  carry  a  ton  of  freight  if  it  goes  by  truck  155 
miles,  by  rail  413  miles,  and  by  barge  576  miles.  This  tells  you 
about the significant part of what we’ve got to do and the problem 
that  we  have  if  we  don’t  take  advantage  of  these  time-saving  and 
value-saving changes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

3 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Now, please, Senator Klobuchar. 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Well,  thank  you  very  much,  Senator  Lau-
tenberg,  for  holding  this  hearing,  and  thank  you  to  our  panelists, 
witnesses, for being here today. 

I  believe  that  most  people  involved  in  freight  transport  agree 
that  our  infrastructure  and  our  funding  for  infrastructure  is  out-
dated and that we need new thinking for how we’re going to main-
tain and expand our infrastructure. Senator Lautenberg mentioned 
the  bridge  collapse  in  Minnesota.  That  certainly  is  something  that 
makes  our  state  particularly  focused  on  it,  six  blocks  from  my 
home. But I’ve also seen it when I visit all 87 counties in our state 
every  year.  I’ve  stood  in  Renville  County  as  they  came  out  in  zero 
degree  weather  with  rail  ties  that  had  fallen  apart,  and  I’ve  seen 
the tremendous potential for biofuels in our state, but then see that 
we  have  a  transportation  system  that’s  actually  worn  down  from 
the increase in biofuels and from the weight of these new products, 
and yet we aren’t keeping up. 

You only have to look at the rest of the world to see the fact that 
the  U.S.  transportation  system  is  starting  to  fall  behind.  China  is 
building  a  53,000-mile  national  highway  system  set  to  rival  or  ex-
ceed the one we created half a century ago. India is similarly build-
ing  thousands  of  miles  of  new  highways,  and  the  European  Union 
is  continuing  to  devote  significant  public  resources  to  the  develop-
ment and upgrade of its highways, railways, ports, and waterways. 
To  compete  with  these  economies,  maintain  economic  promi-
nence, and sustain economic growth, we will need to modernize and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
T
U
A
L
0
1
6

4 

integrate  our  freight  transportation  systems,  including  our  water-
ways,  our  highways,  and  our  railroads.  When  I  get  around  my 
State, the things that are most mentioned about the transportation 
system is, first of all, the need for more, particularly rail lines, with 
our  new  rural  economy  that  is  revitalizing  so  much  of  our  rural 
area. 

Second is the expense, especially for trains, and the issue of how 
the rail companies are pricing some of the routes. That’s very hard 
for  our  captive  shippers.  Senator  Dorgan  and  I  have  a  bill  to  try 
to fix that. 

Third  is  that  as  the  expenses  go  up,  the  lack  of  stops,  the  fact 
that  they  can  go  back  and  forth  across  a  small  town  and  they’re 
not able to get the delivery that they need. Those are all things I’ve 
heard time and time again in our State. 

In Minnesota and throughout our country, as I mentioned, we’re 
at  the  beginning  stage  of  a  new  energy  and  economic  revolution. 
But  one  thing  is  clear.  We  will  not  be  able  to  build  a  21st  century 
economy  by  relying  on  a  20th  century  infrastructure  that  is  both 
rapidly deteriorating and inadequate for our growing needs. 

Our  Nation  has  faced  this  challenge  before,  a  half  century  ago, 
and we succeeded in building a new modern transportation system 
for  our  new  modern  economy.  In  his  1963  memoir,  ‘‘Mandate  for 
Change,  1953  to  1956,’’  President  Eisenhower  famously  said  that: 
‘‘More  than  any  single  action  by  the  government  since  the  end  of 
the  war,  the  building  of  the  interstate  highway  system  would 
change  the  face  of  America.  Its  impact  on  the  American  economy, 
the  jobs  that  it  would  produce  in  manufacturing  and  construction, 
the rural areas it would open up, was beyond calculation.’’ 

He  was  right.  It  is  now  our  responsibility  to  restore  and  update 
Eisenhower’s  vision  of  a  transportation  infrastructure,  including 
updating  our  waterways,  railroads,  and  highways,  so  that  the  sys-
tem works for all Americans. 

Thank you very much. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you, Senator Klobuchar. 
Now  I  want  to  formally  welcome  our  panel  of  witnesses.  They 
are:  the  Honorable  Paul  Brubaker,  Administrator  of  the  Research 
and Innovative Technology Administration at the U.S. Department 
of Transportation; the Honorable Astrid Glynn, who’s here as Chair 
of  the  American  Association  of  State  and  Highway  Transportation 
Officials  Standing  Committee  on  Rail  Transportation,  and  I  note 
also  that  Ms.  Glynn  is  also  the  Commissioner  of  the  New  York 
State  Department  of  Transportation,  and  we  welcome  you  here  as 
a neighbor as well as an important witness. 

Admiral  Rick  Larrabee,  the  Port  Commerce  Director  of  the  Port 
Authority  of  New  York  and  New  Jersey.  As  a  former  Commis-
sioner,  which  is  what  I  was  doing  when  I  was  elected  to  the  Sen-
ate—it  wasn’t  my  full-time  job,  but  I  learned  a  lot  about  transpor-
tation in the few years I was there—I appreciate the job that Rick 
Larrabee is doing. 

And Ed Hamberger, who serves as the President and CEO of the 

Association of American Railroads. Pleased to see you. 

And  Mr.  Glenn  Vanselow,  the  Executive  Director  of  the  Pacific 

Northwest Waterways Association. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

5 

I’m  glad  that  we  have  all  of  you  here  as  witnesses  before  our 
Subcommittee  and  thanks  for  bringing  the  experiences  that  you 
and  the  issues  that  you  have  reviewed  over  these  few  years.  We 
look forward to hearing your testimony. 

Administrator Brubaker, if you would start, please, honoring the 

5-minute rule, and we look forward to hearing you. 

STATEMENT OF HON. PAUL R. BRUBAKER, ADMINISTRATOR, 
RESEARCH AND INNOVATIVE TECHNOLOGY ADMINISTRATION, 

U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

Mr.  BRUBAKER.  Sure.  Thank  you.  Chairman  Lautenberg,  Rank-
ing  Member  Smith,  Senator  Klobuchar,  and  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee:  I’m  grateful  for  the  opportunity  to  be  here  before  you 
today  to  testify  on  national  strategies  for  efficient  freight  move-
ment. 

Today the United States is an integral part of an unprecedented 
global  economy.  We’ve  seen  significant  increases  in  freight  flow 
throughout  our  supply  chain  here  as  we  look  at  the  traffic  that 
flows  into  the  United  States.  These  changes  are  funneling  increas-
ing volumes of freight through our major gateway ports and to and 
from  our  major  metropolitan  areas,  concentrating  in  regions  that 
are already some of the most congested in the Nation. 

Our  Nation’s  transportation  network  moves  over  50  million  tons 
of  freight,  worth  $36  billion,  over  highways,  roads,  bridges,  rails, 
ports,  and  pipelines  every  day,  competing  with  passenger  move-
ment  for  network  capacity,  and  the  Department  anticipates  that 
this  figure  will  almost  double  by  2035.  This  sheer  volume  of  goods 
and  services  is  straining  the  network’s  capacity  for  supporting  the 
efficient  movement  of  freight,  threatening  America’s  ability  to  re-
main competitive in the global economy. 

As  a  result  the  cost  of  moving  freight  is  significantly  increasing. 
After  17  years  of  decline,  logistics  costs  grew  by  $156  billion  for 
U.S. companies between 2004 and 2005, accounting for 8.8 percent 
of the gross domestic product, a figure that increased to 9.5 percent 
a year later. 

The  Department  must  also  take  into  consideration  the  rise  in 
fuel prices and the potential impact those fuel price increases have 
on the performance of supply chains, as what was once a fairly sta-
ble expense is adding to the cost of transporting goods. 

These  trends,  if  left  unabated,  will  continue  to  drive  up  the  cost 
of transporting goods, significantly impacting our economy and our 
quality of life. The Department believes the most effective strategy 
for  addressing  this  challenge  is  to  strengthen  and  diversify  our  ef-
forts  to  collect  and  analyze  freight  movement  data  from  an  inter-
modal,  holistic  perspective.  The  Department  must  have  a  better 
understanding  of  the  dynamics  of  freight  movement  in  order  to 
more effectively plan and allocate departmental resources. There is 
a need to expand our data collection capabilities to increase the in- 
transit,  intermodal  visibility  of  freight  flows  so  that  effective  per-
formance  measures  can  be  assessed,  bottlenecks  identified,  and 
models  can  be  developed  that  will  allow  us  to  simulate  scenarios 
and predict future system performance. 

Cutting  edge  technologies  that  are  already  on  the  market,  such 
as  RFID  and  differential  GPS,  can  significantly  improve  capabili-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

6 

ties in this effort by accurately tracking movements. These innova-
tions  even  extend  beyond  transportation  applications  and  into  ap-
plications  such  as  freight  security  that  contribute  to  system  ineffi-
ciencies. 

New  freight  transportation  paradigms  such  as  short-sea  ship-
ping,  or  the  marine  highway,  intelligent  transportation  systems, 
and  remote  sensing  show  tremendous  potential  to  reduce  conges-
tion  and  enhance  freight  planning  and  management.  Cooperative 
research  is  needed  to  determine  the  viability  and  effectiveness  of 
these new approaches. 

The  multi-state  international  makeup  of  supply  chains,  coupled 
with  the  fact  that  much  of  the  infrastructure  is  owned  and  oper-
ated by multiple public and private entities, will require the estab-
lishment of public-private partnerships, cooperations, and better in-
stitutional arrangements in order for the Department to achieve its 
goals.  Departmental  programs  that  invest  in  partnerships  have 
grown,  have  shown  great  potential  for  freight  management  re-
search and development. Many of these programs are the direct re-
sult of the mandate provided by SAFETEA–LU. 

One  of  the  Department’s  most  significant  freight  data  programs 
is the Commodity Flow Survey, or CFS. The CFS is the main data 
engine that supports the Federal Highway Administration’s Freight 
Analysis Framework, or FAF, a key resource for forecasting trends 
in freight movement and identifying changing supply and distribu-
tion patterns. 

The  National  Cooperative  Freight  Research  Program,  which  is 
sponsored  by  my  agency,  RITA,  brings  together  freight  stake-
holders  from  industry,  government,  academia,  and  other  relevant 
entities  to  conduct  applied  research  on  problems  facing  the  freight 
industry.  This  group’s  work  began  in  late  2006  and  we’re  antici-
pating significant results from their research later this year. 

The  Department’s  Congestion  Initiative  is  a  national  blueprint 
that  encompasses  a  broad  array  of  congestion-reducing  programs, 
including urban partnerships, to test intelligent transportation sys-
tems and congestion pricing innovations in several major cities. 

The  Corridors  of  the  Future  program  is  fast-tracking  major  con-
gestion-reducing  projects  and  is  looking  to  implement  technology 
and  operational  improvements  to  measurably  improve  safety  and 
system performance. 

Programs like University Transportation Centers seek to tap into 
the  vast  pool  of  expertise  and  existing  research  portfolios  of  our 
Nation’s  academic  community  by  funding  specific  transportation 
studies, including freight management and planning. 

These  types  of  strategies,  which  focus  on  working  with  regional 
authorities  and  private  sector  stakeholders,  are  going  a  long  way 
toward  meeting  the  challenges  of  creating  a  resilient,  secure  infra-
structure for the efficient movement of freight, but much more has 
to be done. 

The  key  to  our  national  strategy  is  to  have  a  broader,  more  in- 
depth understanding of supply chains and the interstate and multi-
national dynamics that impact the flow of goods across our Nation’s 
transportation network. This will take greater cooperation between 
stakeholders,  better  institutional  arrangements  for  sharing  infor-
mation,  planning  and  implementing  multiple  State  and  public-pri-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

7 

vate  projects,  effective  performance  measures,  and  operational  im-
provements to the transportation system. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Brubaker follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. PAUL R. BRUBAKER, ADMINISTRATOR, RESEARCH AND 
INNOVATIVE TECHNOLOGY ADMINISTRATION, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 
Introduction 

Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking  Member  Smith,  and  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee,  I  am  grateful  for  the  opportunity  to  come  before  you  today  to  testify  on 
National Strategies for Efficient Freight Movement. 

The  United  States  (U.S.)  freight  transportation  system  is  efficient,  reliable,  safe, 
and  secure.  The  freight  system  underpins  the  Nation’s  continued  economic  growth, 
and  historically  the  U.S.  has  led  the  world  in  freight  system  design  and  manage-
ment. Yet dramatically increasing freight flows have created congestion in some sec-
tors  of  the  transportation  system,  imposing  costs  on  shippers,  consumers,  and  the 
environment.  This  statement  will  focus  on  current  and  future  challenges  facing  the 
efficient movement of freight throughout the Nation’s transportation system, includ-
ing  in  ports,  on  railroads,  and  by  commercial  motor  vehicles,  and  will  also  address 
new  technological  developments  that  could  help  improve  the  efficiency  of  freight 
transportation. 

The  U.S.  transportation  system  must  not  only  be  able  to  handle  both  growth  in 
the  volume  of  freight  and  passenger  movement,  but  as  new  markets  and  trade 
routes  emerge,  it  must  enable  increasingly  complex  supply  chains  to  operate.  The 
Interstate  Highway  System  was  a  critical  innovation  that  helped  fuel  the  unprece-
dented growth of 20th century, post-war America, enabling the movement of freight 
arriving  at  our  ports  from  overseas  and  goods  manufactured  in  our  large  cities  to 
small  towns  across  the  country.  The  Interstate  Highway  System  provided  an  infra-
structure  that  not  only  offered  the  interconnectivity  for  economic  expansion,  but 
acted  as  a  catalyst  for  it.  However,  the  highway  system  we  are  using  today  must 
handle very different dynamics. 

Changes  in  demographics,  manufacturing,  and  warehousing,  and  a  dramatic  in-
crease in imported manufactured goods and foods, have caused freight funneling at 
major gateway ports, leading to congestion on the highways and at the rail connec-
tions  as  containers  are  reloaded  on  trucks  and  rail  cars.  Private  sector  changes  in 
inventory management and production operations are placing demands on the trans-
portation  system  that  go  beyond  connectivity  to  speed,  reliability,  and  throughput. 
Logistics costs have been rising for some time. As reported by the Council of Supply 
Chain Management Professionals, logistics costs as a percent of gross domestic prod-
uct  have  increased  63  percent  since  the  beginning  of  2004.  In  2006,  inventory  car-
rying costs jumped 13.5 percent, while transportation costs were up 9.4 percent over 
2005 levels, and the trends are expected to continue. To make maximum use of the 
entire  transportation  system,  it  is  imperative  to  develop  better  and  smarter  ap-
proaches to moving cargo and people through the entire intermodal system, from or-
igin to destination. 

The  United  States  is  part  of  an  unprecedented,  global  economy  that  transcends 
borders.  Telecommunications  and  computing  technology  have  evolved  to  meet  the 
demands  of  consumers,  industry,  and  government  in  a  world  that  is  vastly  more 
connected  on  a  daily  basis  than  when  the  Interstate  Highway  System  was  built. 
Each day, an estimated 50 million tons of freight, worth $36 billion, moves over our 
highways, roads, bridges, rail, ports, coastal and inland waterways, or marine high-
ways, ports and pipelines. Current analysis clearly shows the predominant corridors 
through which freight is moving, and the connection between freight flows and met-
ropolitan areas. 

The  Department  estimates  that  the  total  tonnage  of  domestic  and  foreign  freight 
traveling  along  the  U.S.  transportation  system  will  almost  double  by  2035,  with 
international shipments, most of which move by water, growing at a somewhat fast-
er  rate  than  domestic  shipments.  The  U.S.  freight  system  faces  significant  capacity 
constraints  at  key  freight  gateways,  and  it  is  straining  to  move  the  current  volume 
of freight quickly, reliably, and economically in order to sustain growth. The difficul-
ties posed by increased cargo volumes are compounded by environmental challenges, 
a limited supply of land on which to expand transportation facilities, congested road 
and  rail  linkages,  and  increasing  fuel  costs.  Effective  policy  solutions  will  require 
coordinated  and  collaborative  action  by  both  public  and  private  parties.  To  be  cred-
ible  and  achievable,  these  solutions  require  input  and  buy-in  from  the  broader 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

8 

freight  sector,  including  both  public  and  private  sector  interests.  The  Department 
has  begun  the  process  of  soliciting  such  input,  and  DOT  looks  forward  to  working 
with its partners to further develop the freight framework. 

It  is  clear  that  the  public  and  private  sectors  will  need  to  closely  coordinate  to 
address modern freight challenges. The private sector owns and operates the mobile 
assets,  controlling  when,  where,  and  how  goods  are  moved  on  public  and  private 
transportation  facilities.  Trucks,  rail  cars,  and  ships  are  privately  owned.  Maritime 
terminals  are  predominantly  operated  by  private  entities,  with  only  a  few  publicly 
operated. 

This largely private-sector ownership of the components of the transportation net-
work  has  been  extremely  effective  in  increasing  transportation  productivity  and  re-
ducing  transportation  costs  to  shippers.  From  1987  to  1999,  productivity  in  rail 
freight  transportation—the  freight  mode  (other  than  pipelines)  that  is  most  com-
pletely  in  private  hands—increased  by  48  percent,  and  rail  freight  rates  fell  by  18 
percent.  Trucking  productivity  rose  by  15  percent  during  the  same  period,  and  air-
line  productivity  rose  by  16  percent—all  more  than  the  overall  10-percent  increase 
in  U.S.  private  business  productivity.  Moreover,  all  the  freight  modes  have  re-
sponded  effectively  to  shipper  requirements,  providing  more  frequent  service  of 
smaller  shipments  to  accommodate  their  demands  for  Just-in-Time  deliveries  of 
freight that allow reductions in inventories and logistics costs. 

The  Department  of  Transportation’s  Framework  for  a  National  Freight  Policy 
identifies seven objectives for addressing the congestion that has been created in the 
transportation system from dramatically increasing freight flows. With regard to ca-
pacity, these are to improve the operations of the existing freight transportation sys-
tem, and add physical capacity to the freight transportation system in places where 
investment makes economic sense. A third objective is to use pricing to better align 
costs and benefits between users and owners of the freight system and to encourage 
deployment  of  productivity-enhancing  technologies.  It  recommends  actions  be  taken 
to reduce statutory, regulatory, and institutional barriers to improved freight trans-
portation  performance,  and  to  proactively  identify  and  address  emerging  transpor-
tation  needs.  The  sixth  objective  is  to  maximize  the  safety  and  security  of  the 
freight transportation system. Last, the Framework recommends that actions should 
be taken to mitigate and better manage the environmental, health, energy, and com-
munity  impacts  of  freight  transportation.  Effective  policy  solutions  will  require  co-
ordinated and collaborative action by both public and private parties. 

Solutions that unlock the constraints of these complex, interwoven networks must 
extend  beyond  the  jurisdiction,  or  authority,  of  any  one  entity.  Effective  solutions 
to these challenges will necessitate coordinated and collaborative efforts of all trans-
portation stakeholders. 

Here are some examples that exemplify this level of cooperation: 

The National Cooperative Freight Research Program (NCFRP) is a multi-modal 
freight  research  program,  guided  by  an  oversight  committee  of  industry  rep-
resentatives,  academics,  and  public  officials.  Current  NCFRP  projects  now  un-
derway,  or  being  initiated,  include  mobility  constraints,  measuring  operational 
performance,  identifying  investment  needs,  and  assessing  the  environmental 
and  economic  impacts  of  freight  transportation.  This  program  is  indicative  of 
the potential found in cooperation between stakeholders. 
Likewise,  the  University  Transportation  Centers  (UTC)  program  is  an  invest-
ment,  and  cooperative  endeavor,  in  our  Nation’s  institutions  of  higher  edu-
cation;  to  cultivate  U.S.  expertise  in  transportation  research  and  technology 
transfer,  offering  a  wealth  of  knowledge  and  innovation  to  the  area  of  freight 
movement.  Sixty  UTC’s  are  currently  active,  including  the  Alan  M.  Voorhees 
Transportation  Center  at  Rutgers  University,  which  is  exploring  the  establish-
ment of a Freight Transportation Center for Excellence. 
The  Freight  Performance  Measures  program,  another  public-private  effort,  en-
ables  the  Department  to  measure  travel  speeds  and  travel  time  reliability 
across  two-thirds  of  the  Interstate  Highway  System.  This  data  is  available 
through an arrangement with the trucking industry. Many long-distance truck-
ing  firms  use  GPS  transponders  on  their  cabs  to  track  their  assets;  this  allows 
businesses  to  maintain  continual  awareness  of  asset  movement.  Through  a  col-
laborative  agreement  with  the  American  Transportation  Research  Institute,  we 
can tap into GPS data from over 350,000 trucks that are traversing our Nation’s 
roadways  on  any  given  day.  We  hope  to  expand  this  data  to  include  over 
400,000 trucks by 2009. We use this data to calculate travel speed and time re-
liability throughout twenty-five corridors across America. This helps the Depart-
ment  gain  insight  into  system  performance,  so  that  we  can  better  focus  our  ef-
forts in increasing network capacity. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

9 

These system performance measures allow every entity involved in transportation, 
public and private, to better manage its resources. Performance measures are driven 
by data—data that are absolutely vital for the Department to conduct accurate anal-
ysis,  simulation,  and  modeling.  The  Department’s  Research  and  Innovative  Tech-
nology  Administration  has  several  programs  that  have  been  critical  to  our  efforts 
to  collect  data  and  assess  our  Nation’s  freight  movement  performance  and  needs. 
The  largest  of  these  data  programs,  the  Commodity  Flow  Survey  (CFS),  provides 
primary national and state-level data and forecasting on domestic freight shipments 
and  exports  by  American  establishments,  with  the  latest  data  expected  to  be  re-
leased  at  the  end  of  the  year.  The  CFS  is  also  the  main  data  engine  that  supports 
the Federal Highway Administration’s Freight Analysis Framework (FAF). The FAF 
commingles  the  CFS  data  with  a  broad  array  of  publicly  available  freight  data  to 
create the complete picture of freight flows you see here. 

We  are  also  supporting  private  sector  investment  in  freight  transportation 
through  our  Private  Activity  bond  program,  authorized  by  section  11143  of 
SAFETEA–LU.  This  provision  allows  private  investors  to  benefit  from  tax-exempt 
financing  of  transportation  infrastructure.  We  have  received  three  applications  for 
intermodal  freight  transfer  facilities  totaling  $2.2  billion,  and  capable  of  handling 
more than 2 million containers per year. 

As  noted  earlier,  the  complexity  of  supply  chains  and  the  multi-jurisdictional  na-
ture  of  freight  movement  complicate  our  institutional  ability  to  address  stresses  on 
the  transportation  system.  As  part  of  its  Congestion  Initiative,  the  Department  an-
nounced the Corridors of the Future Program which will challenge agencies to work 
collaboratively to develop dynamic financial and operational mechanisms to improve 
the flow of goods and people. 

The PierPass program in Southern California is an excellent example of how con-
gestion pricing can improve to the flow of goods at our Nation’s ports. The PierPass 
program  charges  a  traffic  mitigation  fee  of  $50/TEU  (this  equals  a  $100  charge  for 
an average 40-foot container) to encourage the pick-up of containers during off-peak 
hours  (6  p.m.  to  3  a.m.).  The  off-peak  shift  now  handles  about  65,000  truck  trips 
a  week,  or  37  percent  of  the  container  moves  at  the  two  ports.  Since  its  inception 
in July, 2005, over 8 million truck trips have shifted to off-peak hours. 

The independent evaluators of this program from the University of Southern Cali-
fornia  noted:  ‘‘Like  the  handful  of  experiments  with  congestion  pricing,  it  dem-
onstrates  that  price  incentives  are  powerful  tools  for  managing  the  transportation 
system.’’ 

Pipelines  are  a  transportation  system  that  can  be  used  to  relieve  congestion  on 
the  railroads.  Seventy  percent  of  oil  and  petroleum  products  and  close  to  one  hun-
dred  percent  of  natural  gas  is  transported  by  privately  owned  pipelines.  Large  vol-
umes  of  anhydrous  ammonia,  carbon  dioxide,  and  other  chemicals  are  moved  by 
pipeline.  It  is  expected  that  in  the  near  future,  large  amounts  of  ethanol,  which  is 
currently carried by rail, may be moved by pipeline as well. 

Congestion  pricing  is  an  excellent  example  of  how  businesses  can  change  their 
patterns  to  use  existing  capacity  more  efficiently.  While  we  are  on  our  way  to  ad-
dressing  the  challenge  of  maintaining  a  resilient,  secure,  and  efficient  transpor-
tation  system  for  the  movement  of  freight,  more  has  to  be  done  to  use  our  existing 
resources, and to develop innovations that will enable America’s transportation sys-
tem to support the growing demand for goods and services. 

One  such  example  is  America’s  Marine  highway,  which  includes  our  coastal  wa-
ters, our inland waterway system and the Great Lakes. Although the United States 
already  transports  one  billion  tons  of  domestic  cargo  on  our  domestic  waterways 
each year, this 25,000 mile network of navigable waters can help us expand our way 
out  of  landside  congestion.  The  Energy  Independence  and  Security  Act  of  2007  di-
rected  the  Secretary  of  Transportation  to  establish  a  Marine  Highway  Program  to 
encourage  this  transformation  and  identify  the  disincentives  that  keep  the  conges-
tion  on  the  highways  and  railroads.  The  Department  of  Transportation’s  Maritime 
Administration  is  working  with  their  many  stakeholders  to  implement  this  prom-
ising program as quickly as possible. 

The  key  for  our  national  freight  strategy  is  to  have  a  broader,  more  in-depth  un-
derstanding  of  supply  chains  and  the  interstate  and  multi-national  dynamics  that 
impact  the  flow  of  goods  across  the  transportation  network.  This  will  take  greater 
cooperation  between  stakeholders,  better  institutional  arrangements  for  planning 
and  implementing  multi-state  projects,  effective  performance  measures,  and  oper-
ational improvements to the transportation system. 

Thank you again for inviting me to testify. I would be happy to answer any ques-

tions that the Subcommittee members might have. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

10 

FREIGHT IN THE SAFE, ACCOUNTABLE, FLEXIBLE, EFFICIENT TRANSPORTATION EQUITY 

ACT: LEGACY FOR USERS (SAFETEA–LU) P.L. 109–059 

Table 1.—Direct Expenditures for Freight Infrastructure in SAFETEA–LU 

Projects of National/Regional 
Significance 

$1.779 billion over 5 years 

National Corridor Infrastructure 
Improvement 
Coordinated Border Infrastructure 
Program 
Freight Intermodal Distribution 
Pilot Grant Program 
Truck Parking 

$1.948 billion over 5 years 

$833 million over 5 years 

$30 million over 5 years 

$25 million over 4 years 

Rulemaking to solicit and select 
new projects in review; 20 of 25 
originally identified projects un-
derway or in review 
28 of 33 identified projects under-
way or in review 
Apportioned program to border 
states 
3 of 6 identified projects underway 
or in review 
Multiple year funding combined 
into one request for proposals and 
projects submitted through the 
Corridors of the Future initiative 

Total 

$4.615 billion 

Source:  USDOT,  2006  Status  of  the  Nation’s  Highways,  Bridges,  and  Transit:  Conditions  and  Performance, 

page 14–7, at www.fhwa.dot.gov/policy/2006cpr/chap14.htm. 

Table 2.—Other Freight Provisions in SAFETEA–LU 

Transportation  Infrastructure  Fi-
Innovation  Act 

and 

nance 
(TIFIA) Program 

Eligibility  expanded  for  financing 

freight projects 

State Infrastructure Banks 

Program extended 

Private Activity Bonds 

Freight 

Professional 

Building 

Tax code modified to encourage up 
to $15 billion private investment 
in freight facilities 

Capacity 

$3.5 million over 4 years 

$15 million over 4 years 

Examples include Reno rail project 
($51 million) and Louisiana high-
way access to water terminals 
($66 million) 
Example includes truck diesel ret-
rofits on West Coast 
Examples include 3 intermodal 
yards ($2.2 billion) and the Miami 
port tunnel ($900 million) 
Several courses and distance- 
based learning programs initiated 
Current projects listed in table 3 

$5 million over 4 years 

Current projects listed in table 3 

National  Cooperative  Freight  Re-

search Program 

Hazardous  Materials  Cooperative 

Research Program 

Source:  USDOT,  2006  Status  of  the  Nation’s  Highways,  Bridges,  and  Transit:  Conditions  and  Performance, 

page 14–7, at www.fhwa.dot.gov/policy/2006cpr/chap14.htm. 

Table 3.—Cooperative Freight and Hazardous Materials Research Projects through 2008 

NCFRP 01 
NCFRP 02 
NCFRP 03 
NCFRP 04 

Review and Analysis of Freight Transportation Markets and Relationships 
Impacts of Public Policy on the Freight Transportation System 
Performance Measures for Freight Transportation 
Identifying and Using Low-Cost and Quickly Implementable Ways to Address Freight-System 
Mobility Constraints 
Framework and Tools for Estimating Benefits of Specific Freight Network Investment Needs 
Freight-Demand Modeling to Support Public-Sector Decision Making 
Institutional Arrangements in the Freight Transportation System 
Separation of Vehicles: Commercial Motor Vehicle Only Lanes 
Current and Future Contributions to Freight Demand in North America 
Specifications for Freight Transportation Data Architecture 
Developing High Productivity Truck Corridors 
Truck Drayage Practices 

NCFRP 05 
NCFRP 06 
NCFRP 09 
NCFRP 10 
NCFRP 11 
NCFRP 12 
NCFRP 13 
NCFRP 14 
NCFRP 15  Understanding Urban Goods Movements 
NCFRP 16 
NCFRP 17 
HMCRP 01  Hazardous Materials Commodity Flow Data and Analysis 
HMCRP 02  Hazardous Materials Transportation Incident Data for Root Cause Analysis 
HMCRP 03  A Guide for Assessing Emergency Response Needs and Capabilities for Hazardous Materials 

Representing Freight in Air Quality and Greenhouse Gas Models 
Synthesis of Short Sea Shipping in North America 

HMCRP 04  Emerging Technologies Applicable to Hazardous Materials Transportation Safety and Security 
HMCRP 05  Evaluation of the Potential Benefits of Electronic Shipping Papers for Hazardous Materials 

HMCRP 06  Assessing Soil and Groundwater Environmental Hazards from Hazardous Materials Transpor-

Releases 

Shipments 

tation Incidents 

Source: www.trb.org/CPR/NCFPR/NCFRPProjects.asp and www.trb.org/CPR/HMCPR/HMCRPProjects.asp. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

11 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much, Mr. Brubaker. 
Ms. Glynn, please. 
STATEMENT OF HON. ASTRID C. GLYNN, COMMISSIONER, 

DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION, STATE OF NEW YORK; 

AND CHAIR, STANDING COMMITTEE ON RAIL 

TRANSPORTATION, AMERICAN ASSOCIATION OF STATE 

HIGHWAY AND TRANSPORTATION OFFICIALS 

Ms.  GLYNN.  Thank  you,  Senator.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and 
Senators.  My  name  is  Astrid  Glynn  and  I  want  to  thank  you  for 
the  opportunity  to  be  here  today  on  behalf  of  AASHTO.  I  would 
like  to  describe  the  freight  transportation  problem  as  we  see  it, 
focus  on  the  public  sector’s  role,  particularly  the  Federal  Govern-
ment’s role, describe some of the states, and then close with a brief 
summary  of  AASHTO’s  freight  policy  recommendations,  all  of 
which are set forth in greater detail in the written testimony. 

As you have said, the United States still has the most productive 
transportation system in the world. But that transportation system 
is  starting  to  show  its  age  and  limitations.  Later  in  this  century, 
the U.S. economy will no longer be the world’s largest. Investment 
in  a  21st  century  transportation  system  is  one  of  the  actions  we 
need to undertake if we are to avert economic decline. 

Growth in trade and change in freight traffic, combined with lim-
ited  growth  in  system  capacity  for  all  modes,  mean  more  conges-
tion,  increased  costs,  and  less  reliable  trip  times.  This  in  turn 
means  added  manufacturing  costs,  higher  import  prices,  and  a 
need  for  businesses  to  hold  more  inventory.  Over  time  these  costs 
add up to a higher cost of doing business and a higher cost of living 
for Americans. 

We  are  starting  to  see  a  disturbing  rise  in  total  logistics  costs, 
the first in 25 years. In 1980 logistics costs were approximately 16 
percent of the GDP. They had dropped to less than 9 percent a few 
years ago, a significant spur to economic growth. Now we are head-
ed  in  the  opposite  direction,  with  logistics  costs  at  about  10  per-
cent, and this estimate is prior to the recent and dramatic changes 
in fuel costs. 

Clearly  the  public  sector  has  an  immense  social,  economic,  and 
environmental stake in our freight system. The performance of the 
network  directly  affects  our  jobs,  our  standard  of  living,  our  com-
munity,  and  our  national  security.  We  have  tremendous  respon-
sibilities  also  because  we  as  the  public  sector  own,  operate,  regu-
late, or secure much of the system. 

The Federal Government must continue to lead the public sector 
in  that  role.  At  each  of  the  transportation  policy  commission  hear-
ings  held  over  the 
last  couple  of  years,  Vice  Chair  Jack 
Shannendorf  asked  each  panel  whether  the  Federal  Government 
should continue to have a major role in transportation. The answer 
was a unanimous and unqualified yes, and this answer holds even 
more true for freight since America’s ability to compete in the glob-
al economy is directly tied to the health of our freight system. 

States have recognized the need for our action. Four of the most 
notable  State  initiatives  are:  the  Chicago  CREATE  Program  that 
will help address the transfer time that you alluded to, Mr. Chair-
man;  the  FAST  Corridor  in  Washington  State  and  the  Alameda 
Corridor  in  California,  both  to  provide  improved  port  access;  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

12 

the I–95 Corridor Coalition that coordinates freight information for 
the  East  Coast.  More  information  on  these  initiatives  are  in  my 
written testimony. 

But  I’d  like  to  spend  a  couple  of  minutes  if  I  may  talking  about 
some  of  New  York’s  initiatives,  because  we  are  also,  like  many 
States, working to address exponential growth in freight. I’d like to 
focus on two areas, transit and borders. Transit may not seem like 
it  relates  to  freight,  but  it  does.  The  greatest  challenge  for  freight 
is  the  last  mile.  In  areas  such  as  Upstate  New  York,  this  could  be 
a  railhead  or  a  bridge  that,  weight  limits  willing,  allow  a  farm  to 
ship his apples cost effectively or that allows a factory to invest in 
its workforce rather than in extra inventory. 

But the last mile is also a challenge to major metropolitan areas, 
where  highway  congestion  threatens  freight  mobility.  New  York 
City  is  one  of  the  most  truck-dependent  and  transit-dependent  cit-
ies in the Nation. The more we are able to move people by transit, 
the more scarce urban highway capacity can we make available for 
trucks.  Unfortunately,  we  lack  the  rail  connections  that  provide 
us—that might provide us with alternatives. 

The relationship between transit and efficient goods movement is 
not  unique  to  New  York  City.  It  is  a  factor  in  every  major  metro-
politan area in the country. 

More than ever, international trade drives demand. So I want to 
focus  for  a  minute  on  land-side  borders.  Nearly  one-quarter  of  all 
U.S.-Canadian  trade,  the  largest  bilateral  trading  relationship  in 
the  world,  passes  through  New  York  State’s  northern  and  western 
ports  of  entry  and  on  to  our  road  and  rail  systems.  Nearly  80  per-
cent of this trade either originates in or is destined for States out-
side  of  New  York,  and  this  is  a  story  that  my  sister  border  States 
will tell you again and again. 

The Federal Government needs to share in the costs of maintain-
ing  and  improving  this  international  access.  Localities  cannot  be 
primarily  responsible  for  this  infrastructure.  It  is  unrealistic  to 
think that they can bear that burden. We know that there is a Fed-
eral  interest  and  we  hope  that  that  Federal  interest  will  be  trans-
lated into facilitation and support. 

I just want to close briefly by summarizing AASHTO’s policy rec-
ommendations,  which  focus  on  not  just  the  need  for  funding,  but 
also  a  strong  Federal  partnership  and  a  request  that  the  Federal 
Government  help  us  find  ways  to  address  projects  that  have  bene-
fits  for  an  area  larger  than  a  State  and  help  us  find  ways  to  work 
together and address those regional needs that are so pressing. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Glynn follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON.  ASTRID C.  GLYNN,  COMMISSIONER,  DEPARTMENT OF 
TRANSPORTATION,  STATE OF NEW YORK;  AND CHAIR,  STANDING COMMITTEE ON 
RAIL TRANSPORTATION,  AMERICAN ASSOCIATION OF STATE HIGHWAY AND 
TRANSPORTATION OFFICIALS 
Good afternoon, I am Astrid Glynn, Commissioner of the New York State Depart-
ment  of  Transportation.  Thank  you  for  the  invitation  to  speak  today  on  an  issue  of 
critical importance to the nation—current and future challenges facing the efficient 
movement  of  freight  throughout  our  Nation’s  transportation  system  and  national 
strategies to address these challenges. 

I  am  appearing  on  behalf  of  the  American  Association  of  State  Highway  and 
Transportation Officials (AASHTO). I chair AASHTO’s Standing Committee on Rail 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

13 

Transportation and am a member of AASHTO Freight Transportation Authorization 
Policy  Team.  I  will  also  touch  on  some  New  York  State  issues  and  the  activities  of 
the I–95 Corridor Coalition. 

Since  the  publication  of  the  AASHTO  Freight  Rail  Bottom  Line  Report  in  2002, 
AASHTO  and  its  members  have  worked  hard  to  respond  to  the  increasing  freight 
sector  demand  for  safe,  reliable,  efficient  and  affordable  transportation.  Despite 
these  efforts,  the  condition  and  performance  of  the  transportation  system  is  not 
keeping up with the increasing demands of the freight sector. 

AASHTO  has  undertaken  a  number  of  freight  transportation  activities.  Specifi-

cally, AASHTO has: 

• Published  America’s  Freight  Challenge,  a  report  with  recommendations  sub-
mitted  to  the  National  Surface  Transportation  Policy  and  Revenue  Study  Com-
mission; 
• Organized  a  Transportation  Vision  Conference  in  Spring,  2007  which  included 
• Updated the Freight Rail Bottom Line Report to a comprehensive freight report, 
currently  in  final  draft,  which  contains  analyses  of  the  major  freight  modes  as 
well as an overview of freight demand and logistics. 

substantial attention to freight transportation needs; and 

These  and  other  materials  will  be  provided  to  the  Committee  staff  for  use  by  the 

Committee. 

For  the  Spring,  2007  Vision  Conference,  AASHTO  convened  a  predominantly  pri-
vate  sector  group  to  produce  a  report.  That  group’s  report  was  titled  ‘‘The  U.S. 
Freight Transportation System in the Global Economy: Anchored in the Past—Adrift 
in the Future.’’ The conclusions and recommendations were on two dimensions—the 
improvements  needed  in  the  freight  transportation  system  and,  changes  needed  in 
politics and government to accomplish these improvements. 

In the first of these dimensions they recommended: 
• Expanded and targeted highway capacity; 
• Integration of private supply-chain management and public infrastructure; 
• Increased freight rail capacity; 
• More efficient port operations; 
• Improved intermodal connections; 
• Coordinated multimodal/multistate corridors; and 
• Strategically located intermodal facilities. 
But,  they  said,  it  will  not  be  possible  to  achieve  these  objectives  unless  political 

and institutional obstacles are overcome, including: 

ance; 

• Lack of national leadership; 
• A weak Federal role; 
• Absence  of  a  clear  consensus  on  a  vision  of  the  freight  system  and  its  perform-
• Fragmented Congress; 
• U.S. DOT modal stove pipes; 
• A disconnect between business and government; 
• Lack of multi-state collaboration; 
• Projects  which  have  a  national  benefit  of  transportation  projects,  but  whose 
• Local fragmentation and parochialism. 
Business  has  entered  the  21st  century,  while  the  U.S.  freight  transportation  sys-
tem  that  supports  it  was  built  for  the  18th,  19th,  and  20th  centuries.  While  the 
United  States  still  has  the  most  fully  developed,  efficient,  and  productive  transpor-
tation  system  in  the  world,  it  is  showing  signs  of  age,  over-use,  obsolescence,  and 
fragmentation.  Although  transportation  and  logistics  are  fundamental  elements  of 
the  manufacturing  and  retail  sectors,  the  transportation  system  is  not  well-inte-
grated with contemporary supply-chain management practices. 

costs are borne locally; and 

Emerging  world  economies  are  investing  in  transportation  and  intending  to  leap 
into the future while the United States patches up the past. Every mile of highway, 
railroad,  and  waterway,  every  acre  of  seaport  is  operating  in  the  global  economy 
and, depending on its condition and performance, either helps or hinders America’s 
global competitiveness. 

Some  say  that  by  the  middle  of  this  century,  the  U.S.  economy  will  no  longer  be 
the  world’s  largest.  Is  America  in  decline?  Investment  in  a  21st  century  transpor-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

14 

tation  system  is  one  of  the  actions  needed  to  avert  decline.  The  challenge  now  is 
to think differently and to execute that new way of thinking effectively and expedi-
tiously. 

For nearly a decade we have been dwelling on the national freight transportation 
problem.  By  now,  everything  has  been  said  and  everyone  has  said  it.  We  must 
translate  the  agreement  that  there  is  a  problem  into  a  commitment  to  action.  Now 
is the time to solve it. If we don’t we will pay a high price. 

The  demand  for  freight  transportation  to  support  economic  growth  will  nearly 
double  between  2005  and  2035  (see  chart).  Measured  in  tons,  freight  demand  will 
grow from 15 billion tons today to 26 billion tons in 2035, an increase of 89 percent. 
Measured in ton miles (a ton of freight moved a mile counts as one ton-mile), freight 
demand  will  grow  from  6  trillion  ton-miles  today  to  11  trillion  ton-miles  in  2035, 
an increase of 92 percent. The table attached shows the freight tonnage forecast by 
mode for 2005 through 2035. 

The  effects  of  rapid  growth  in  demand  and  limited  growth  in  system  capacity  for 
all modes are increased congestion, increased costs and less reliable trip times. This, 
in  turn  means  increased  costs  for  manufacturers,  higher  import  prices,  and  a  need 
for  businesses  to  hold  more  expensive  inventory  to  prevent  stockouts.  The  effect  on 
each individual shipment or transaction is usually modest, but over time these costs 
add up to a higher cost of doing business for firms, a higher cost of living for Ameri-
cans. And it makes it more difficult for our Nation to compete in the global market-
place. 

Constraints  on  freight  transportation  infrastructure  for  all  modes  have  contrib-
uted to a disturbing rise in total logistics costs—the first in 25 years. In 1980 these 
costs  totaled  about  16  percent  of  the  gross  domestic  product  (GDP).  Infrastructure 
investment, deregulation, and advanced logistics practices combined to reduce logis-
tics costs to less than 9 percent in the first years of this century, reflecting increases 
in  efficiency  and  capital  released  for  other  investment  that  produced  a  significant 
spur to economic growth. Now we are headed in the opposite direction, with logistics 
costs  now  at  about  10  percent—before  the  recent  significant  increase  in  the  price 
of diesel fuel. 

The performance of the Nation’s freight transportation system is critically impor-

tant. It directly affects: 

• Economic  Development  and  Jobs—Cost-effective  and  reliable  freight  transpor-
tation  gives  industries  and  businesses  a  competitive  advantage  in  the  global 
economy  by  providing  them  the  ability  to  deliver  products  at  lower  cost  and 
reach  larger  markets.  This  translates  into  more  jobs,  greater  profitability,  and 
better growth prospects. Poor freight transportation performance means smaller 
markets, fewer jobs, and limited economic development opportunities. 
• Standard  of  Living—The  freight  transportation  system  delivers  an  immense 
range  of  food,  clothing,  tools,  materials,  and  services  to  our  homes  and  busi-
nesses.  Consumers  enjoy  an  unprecedented  variety  and  quality  of  products  be-
cause producers are able to manufacture, trade, and distribute across local, na-
tional,  and  global  markets.  Poor  freight  transportation  performance  means 
higher costs, less choice, and a lower standard of living for all citizens. 
• Communities—Freight  transportation  is  heavy  industry.  A  well-performing  and 
innovative freight transportation industry means less congestion, fewer air pol-
lutants and greenhouse gas emissions, quieter operations, and greater safety in 
our  communities.  Poor  freight  transportation  performance  leads  to  degradation 
of community health and safety. 
• Military  Capability—The  freight  transportation  system  that  supports  the  Na-
tion’s  civilian  economy  also  supports  the  Nation’s  military.  It  ensures  a  ready 
and  reliable  supply  of  material  and  gives  the  military  the  mobility  to  operate 
effectively  at  home  and  abroad.  Poor  freight  transportation  performance  means 
less mobility, higher cost, and greater risk. 

The  public  sector  has  a  major  role  in  the  freight  transportation  system:  it  owns 
and  operates  the  highways;  owns  and  manages  most  of  the  Nation’s  ports,  water-
ways,  and  airports;  regulates  the  rail  and  pipeline  systems;  and  oversees  the  secu-
rity  of  all  freight  transportation  facilities  and  freight  carriers.  It  has  an  immense 
social,  economic,  and  environmental  stake  in  the  condition  and  performance  of  the 
freight transportation system. 

The nation is entering the early stages of a freight transportation capacity crisis. 
But  the  public  sector  is  poorly  positioned  to  deal  with  the  emerging  crisis  because 
there is: 

• No  clear  and  consistent  description  of  the  national  freight  transportation  sys-

tem, its performance, and investment needs; 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

15 

• Insufficient  public  sector  knowledge  of  freight  transportation  and  supply  chain 

management and their importance to businesses and economic growth; 

• Lack of coordinated public and private actions on freight transportation policies, 

programs, and finance; and 

• Lack of public sector focus on transportation operations. 
As a Nation, we rely upon a legacy of 300 or more years of transportation invest-
ment to deliver the promise of an economy of the future. Our most recent major in-
vestment, the 50-year old interstate highway system, was laid on top of a 19th cen-
tury  rail  system.  As  a  direct  result  of  that  Federal  investment,  the  rail  system 
adapted and shrank, leaving thousands of modal disconnects that would be unjusti-
fiable  and  inconceivable  if  the  network  were  designed  today.  The  reduction  in  rail 
track mileage, the increase in rail traffic (both passenger and freight), and changes 
in  the  operating  strategy  of  the  freight  railroads  have  resulted  in  more  and  longer 
trains operating at reduced speeds, creating more conflicts with highway movement, 
increased safety risks, bifurcation of communities, and exacerbation the problems of 
urban  traffic  circulation.  Some  of  the  best-known  freight  projects  or  programs—the 
Alameda  Corridor,  CREATE,  and  the  Seattle-Tacoma  FAST  Corridor—are  largely 
grade  separations  and  crossing  upgrades  that  also  benefit  highway  operations  and 
safety.  In  areas  fortunate  enough  to  have  robust  commuter  rail  and  inter-city  pas-
senger  rail,  the  conflicts  are  between  passenger  and  rail  customers  each  trying  to 
use the same constrained system. 

Most  of  the  Nation’s  gateway  seaports  and  other  major  modal  and  intermodal 
freight  traffic  generators  established  over  the  past  three  centuries  are  now  embed-
ded  in  densely  populated  urban  areas.  Most  cannot  be  moved.  Their  efficiency  has 
been compromised by the characteristics of their surroundings which present obsta-
cles to linking with these important freight gateways with the national highway and 
rail  systems.  The  lack  of  connectivity  leads  to  substantial  negative  environmental 
impacts  on  local  communities.  Many  of  those  negative  impacts  can  be  mitigated  by 
improving  the  transportation  connections  between  these  freight  gateways  and  the 
core national transportation system. Deficient intermodal connectors were identified 
at  the  time  the  National  Highway  System  was  designated  in  the  mid-1990s.  In  the 
decade since there has not been a systematic, national strategy to address the local 
burden of transportation facilities which provide national benefits. 

Since  the  interstate  highway  system  was  originally  envisioned  and  built  in  the 
1950s,  the  Nation’s  population  has  increased,  population  growth  has  shifted,  the 
number  of  vehicles  and  vehicle  miles  travelled  (VMT)  has  increased  disproportion-
ately,  and  the  trucking  industry  has  grown  and  evolved  in  ways  that  no  one  did  or 
could  have  predicted.  Today,  we  have  a  number  of  interstate  highway  chokepoints, 
principally  at  the  intersection  of  Interstate  highways  and  in  major  metropolitan 
areas,  which  produce  sizable  costs  to  the  economy  in  the  form  of  delay  and 
unreliability  in  freight  shipments.  The  highway  chokepoints  also  affect  the  move-
ment  of  people.  Individual  states  and  localities  cannot  absorb  the  full  burden  of  fi-
nancing the maintenance, operations, and improvements to the highway system that 
is the foundation of interstate commerce. 

It is important to note that each of these examples involves both freight and pas-
senger  mobility.  It  is  impossible  to  separate  the  freight  and  passenger  transpor-
tation  issues  and  our  dual-use  infrastructure  compels  us  to  seek  solutions  that  are 
beneficial to both. That is why AASHTO made the following recommendation to the 
National Surface Transportation Policy and Revenue Study Commission: 

Establish a National Rail Transportation Policy. Intercity passenger and freight 
rail  are  critical  components  of  the  Nation’s  surface  transportation  system.  Cur-
rent  rail  capacity  is  not  sufficient  to  meet  passenger  or  freight  needs.  It  is  im-
perative  that  a  national  rail  policy  be  developed  which  addresses  institutional 
roles,  passenger  and  freight  capacity,  and  new  non-Highway  Trust  Fund  fund-
ing and financing options. 

We are competing in the global economy, and the health of our national transpor-

tation network is critical for our competitiveness. 

Growth in trade volume has been substantial and is continuing (see chart). From 
a  transportation  perspective,  however,  what  is  equally  important  is  the  changing 
trade  patterns  which  affect  freight  movement.  Trade  is  not  simply  growing—it  is 
coming from different origins, bound for different destinations, requiring a response 
to both the growth in volume and the shift in trade patterns. A look at the changes 
in  the  ranking  of  national  economies  around  the  world  makes  clear  the  challenge 
of investing in transportation infrastructure that will meet import and export needs 
in the future. (see chart) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

16 

One  of  the  important  drivers  of  the  growth  of  the  economies  of  other  nations  is 
infrastructure investment. China and Europe, our two largest competitors and with 
very  different  governmental/political  systems  are  carrying  out  national  programs  of 
transportation  infrastructure  investment  in  support  of  their  economic  objectives. 
China,  with  a  population  of  1.3  billion,  is  building  a  53,000-mile  National  Express-
way System which, when complete in 2020, will rival the 47,000-mile U.S. Interstate 
Highway  System.  India,  with  a  population  of  one  billion,  is  building  a  10,000-mile 
national  expressway  system.  Europe,  with  a  population  of  450  million,  is  spending 
hundreds of billions of euros on a network of highways, bridges, tunnels, ports, and 
rail lines. 

The  United  States  must  significantly  increase  its  financial  commitment  to  her 

transportation system if we are to remain a world economic power. 
State Freight Initiatives 

State Departments of Transportation, local governments, and the freight transpor-
tation  industry  have  collaborated  on  many  important  projects  and  programs  to 
nudge  the  freight  transportation  system  into  the  21st  century.  Three  of  the  most 
notable  are  the  Chicago  CREATE  program,  the  FAST  Corridor  and  the  Alameda 
Corridor. 

Chicago’s  CREATE  Program—The  seven  Class  I  railroads,  Amtrak,  Metra,  the 
City  of  Chicago  and  the  State  of  Illinois  are  cooperatively  planning  and  financing 
a  program  of  projects  including  15  new  overpasses  to  separate  motor  vehicles  from 
train  tracks,  six  new  overpasses  to  separate  freight-rail  trains  from  passenger-rail 
trains, and extensive upgrades to tracks, switches, and signals. The program, which 
costs $1.5 billion will greatly reduce the time needed to transfer freight between the 
eastern and western railroads and will address the freight and passenger transpor-
tation  problems  arising  from  19th  century  infrastructure  operating  in  the  21st  cen-
tury. 

The  FAST  Corridor—In  the  Seattle-Tacoma  Washington  region,  the  FAST  cor-
ridor network seeks to tie together overcrowded port, highway, and rail connections 
at  the  Nation’s  third  busiest  international  freight  portal.  The  Puget  Sound  ports 
serve  the  entire  nation  with  up  to  75  percent  of  the  containers  entering  its  ports 
moving to rail with destinations outside of Washington State. More than $60 billion 
in imports and $12 billion in American exports used the Washington State ports in 
2004.  The  Washington  State  DOT,  the  Puget  Sound  Regional  Council,  and  the 
freight  industry  developed  and  are  carrying  out  a  multiyear,  multimodal  program 
of projects. Since 1998, the public-private coalition has invested $568 million of pub-
lic and private funding for strategic freight mobility infrastructure improvements in 
the  FAST  Corridor.  Another  $300  million  is  needed  to  complete  the  remaining  16 
of the 25 of the priority Corridor projects. 

The  Alameda  Corridor—The  Alameda  Corridor  is  the  grandmother  of  the  inter-
modal  connector  projects.  The  ports  of  Long  Beach  and  Los  Angeles  handle  more 
than  64  percent  of  Asian  container  imports  and  nearly  25  percent  of  all  U.S.  im-
ports.  The  Alameda  Corridor  project  built  a  state-of-the  art  rail  access  network  to 
the ports. It consists of a 20-mile long rail expressway—basically a large-grade sepa-
ration project—linking the Ports of Long Beach and Los Angeles to the Nation’s rail 
network near downtown Los Angeles. It consolidated four branch line railroads and 
eliminated  more  than  200  at-grade  crossings.  The  financing  for  the  $2.4  billion 
project,  which  included  a  $400  million  Federal  loan,  was  backed  by  a  fee  on  every 
container  moved.  Traffic  exceeded  the  projections,  making  it  possible  to  retire  the 
original Federal loan 28 years early. Trains moving through Corridor in 2006 hauled 
about 5 million TEUs, up by 32 percent from 2005. 
New York State Freight Initiatives 

New  York  exemplifies  a  multi-modal  approach  to  address  to  the  projected  expo-

nential growth in freight. 

It is often said that the greatest challenge for freight is the last mile. This is par-
ticularly true in major metropolitan areas, where highway congestion is the greatest 
threat to freight mobility. New York City is one of the most truck dependant major 
cities  in  the  Nation.  This  is  directly  attributable  to  its  geography.  New  York  City 
is  an  archipelago—a  series  of  islands.  Of  the  five  boroughs,  only  the  Bronx  is  on 
the mainland. Goods need to reach this huge consumer market through a very con-
strained  highway,  transit  and  rail  network  serving  both  the  consumers  and  the 
goods  that  they  want.  The  more  we  are  able  to  move  people  by  transit,  the  more 
scarce urban highway capacity we can make available for trucks. The interrelation-
ship  between  transit  and  efficient  goods  movement  is  not  unique  to  New  York 
City—it is a factor in every major metropolitan area across the country. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

17 

New  York  is  also  working  with  Class  I  railroads  and  shortline  railroads  to  im-
prove  rail  freight  service.  In  our  draft  statewide  rail  plan,  New  York  is  proposing 
the following goals for 2020: 

and energy consumption; 

• Increase  freight  market  share  by  25  percent,  reducing  growth  in  truck  traffic 
• Increase state investment in intermodal facilities and in ‘‘last mile’’ connections; 
• Allow  modern  freight  cars  to  access  the  New  York  metropolitan  area  and  Long 
Island,  eliminating  300,000  truck  trips  from  the  region’s  highways  each  year; 
• Develop  at  least  three  new  intermodal  facilities/inland  ports  across  the  state 
• Increase  the  use  of  rail  to  transport  hazardous  commodities,  taking  advantage 
• Establish the first ‘‘green’’ shortline locomotive fleet in the nation, by deploying 
a fleet of Low Emission Locomotives. Low emission locomotives have been devel-
oped for light duty yard operations. Low Emissions Locomotives can reduce fuel 
usage by 25 to 35 percent and reduce emissions by up to 80 percent. 

serving the rapidly growing container segment of freight movement; 

of the well-documented safety benefits of rail; and 

New  York  has  a  strong  commitment  to  transportation  system  operations  to  sup-
port  the  movement  of  freight.  New  York,  working  through  the  I–95  Corridor  Coali-
tion,  is  undertaking  the  first  multi-agency  permanent  demonstration  and  deploy-
ment  of  Commercial  Vehicle  Infrastructure  Integration  (CVII)  in  the  Nation.  The 
Vehicle Infrastructure Integration (VII) Program is a cooperative effort between the 
USDOT, State governments and the automobile industry to develop and test an in-
formation  technology  that  uses  the  most  advanced  communications  technologies  to 
exchange real-time information between the roadside and vehicles to improve safety 
and mobility. VII systems can warn a driver when it is not safe to enter an intersec-
tion,  or  when  a  vehicle  is  following  too  close  behind  another  vehicle.  Vehicles  can 
serve  as  data  collectors  and  anonymously  transmit  traffic  and  road  condition  infor-
mation  from  major  roads  in  the  transportation  network.  Such  information  can  help 
transportation  agencies  and  emergency  responders  implement  active  strategies  to 
reduce  congestion  and  save  lives.  New  York’s  CVII  project,  developed  under  real- 
world  conditions,  will  involve  driver  identification  and  verification  using  the  Trans-
portation Worker Identification Card (TWIC) and biometrics integrated with the op-
erating system of the truck. It will demonstrate and test additional dashboard safe-
ty  indicators  with  more  direct  vehicle  safety  data  such  as  tire  pressure  and  brake 
status. It will also provide real-time safety warning to the truck driver such as work 
zones  and  speed  reduction  zones.  The  New  York  State  CVII  will  be  features  at  the 
ITS World Congress in New York City this November. 

New  York  is  committed  to  moving  goods  safely.  Working  closely  with  the  New 
York  Motor  Truck  Association,  New  York  State  DOT  developed  the  One  Stop 
Credentialing  and  Registration  system,  known  as  OSCAR,  the  gateway  to  New 
York’s motor carrier safety system. Five state agencies collaborated to design a one- 
stop  shopping  website  which  allows  the  industry  a  single  point  of  contact  to  apply, 
change,  pay  for,  and  receive  operating  credentials  for  Highway  User  Tax  (HUT), 
International Fuel Tax Agreement (IFTA) , and International Registration Program 
(IRP). OSCAR is also the gateway for truckers to apply for oversize/overweight per-
mits,  and  it  provides  a  link  to  the  Department  of  Motor  Vehicles  for  commercial 
driver’s licenses. 

Finally, New York is working with other states, neighboring Canadian provinces, 
as  well  as  Federal  agencies  to  address  the  impacts  of  land  border  crossings  on  the 
movement of goods within our regional marketplace. We are particularly interested 
in  making  sure  that  the  gains  of  faster  travel  and  fewer  tariffs  are  not  lost  to  the 
needs of greater security. Transportation supports a global economy. Increased Fed-
eral  support  for  infrastructure  improvements  at  major  ports  of  entry  for  trade  and 
travel  is  critical  to  our  Nation’s  ability  to  compete  in  the  global  economy.  This  in-
cludes  the  major  seaports,  airports  and  international  border  crossings  that  carry 
global trade to/from the U.S. 

In New York City, the impact of global trade is evident. JFK International Airport 
ranked first in the Nation in a 2004 ranking of all U.S. freight gateways with $125 
billion  in  shipments.  The  Port  Authority  of  New  York  and  New  Jersey  (PANYNJ) 
handled  4.8  million  TEUs  (twenty  foot  equivalent  units)  in  2005—third-largest  in 
the  U.S.  after  Los  Angeles  and  Long  Beach.  Of  all  the  U.S.  trade  by  vessel  and  air 
($1,773  billion),  16  percent  ($283  billion)  moves  through  the  New  York-New  Jersey 
region.  This  trade  does  not  stay  within  the  New  York  City  metropolitan  area.  It 
travels  throughout  the  region,  the  country  and  around  the  world.  About  half  of  the 
international  cargo  at  PANYNJ  originates  from  or  is  destined  for  locations  beyond 
the 26 county PANYNJ region. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

18 

Similarly,  nearly  one  quarter  of  all  U.S.  Canadian  trade  (the  largest  bilateral 
trading  relationship  in  the  world)  passes  through  New  York  State’s  northern  and 
western ports of entry. Nearly 80 percent of this trade either originates in or is des-
tined for states outside of New York. 

The Federal Government needs to bear a share in the cost of maintaining and im-
proving transportation access through these facilities in relation to the benefits that 
accrue  to  the  national  economy.  Localities  should  not  be  solely  responsible  for  the 
cost  of  infrastructure  at  these  ports  of  entry.  While  the  direct  impacts  are  local, 
much  of  the  benefit  of  this  trade  is  received  elsewhere.  Gateway  projects  can  cost 
hundreds  of  millions,  even  billions  of  dollars.  To  expect  states  to  fund  these  im-
provements  through  existing  resources  is  unrealistic.  There  is  a  national  role  in 
funding national benefits. 
Multi-State Freight Initiatives: The I–95 Corridor Coalition 

Freight  has  always  been  a  multi-state  enterprise  and  New  York  is  fortunate  to 
be  able  to  collaborate  with  transportation  agencies  along  the  entire  Eastern  Sea-
board  on  freight  issues  through  the  federally-funded  I–95  Corridor  Coalition.  New 
York was a founding member of the I–95 Corridor Coalition, a coalition of transpor-
tation  agencies  from  Maine  to  Florida  plus  the  Canadian  provinces  of  Quebec  and 
New  Brunswick.  The  15  states  on  the  I–95  corridor  also  contain  40,000  national 
highway  system  miles,  31,000  miles  of  rail  lines,  both  freight  and  passenger,  46 
major seaports, and 103 commercial airports. 

Population  growth  and  economic  growth  have  put  an  increasingly  heavy  burden 
on  all  modes  of  transportation.  In  response  the  I–95  Corridor  was  formed,  initially 
as  a  means  of  coordinating  on  intelligent  transportation  systems  initiatives  across 
states  lines.  It  has  evolved  into  an  institution  that  ‘‘provides  a  forum  for  key  deci-
sion and policymakers to address transportation management and operations issues 
of  common  interest,’’  with  a  high  priority  for  relieving  congestion  on  the  region’s 
highways  by  enhancing  the  capability  of  other  modes  to  shoulder  a  greater  share 
of  freight  movements  in  the  region.  The  I–95  Coalition  has  undertaken  a  number 
of  studies  to  assess  capacity  and  performance  of  its  highway,  rail,  and  maritime 
modes.  The  Coalition  is  an  excellent  example  of  a  coordinated  effort  to  address  the 
transportation challenges arising from increasing congestion and constrained capac-
ity in a large region. 

Under  the  auspices  of  the  I–95  Corridor  Coalition  all  modes  of  transportation 

within the Corridor have been analyzed. These analyses include the following: 

• Highway  Bottlenecks  Study—Analysis  currently  in  progress  will  identify  the 
passenger and freight highway bottlenecks that are most severely impacting re-
gional, long-distance travel in the Coalition region. 

• Mid-Atlantic  Truck  Operations  Study  (MATOps)—Will  provide  a  detailed  anal-
ysis  of  truck  movements  through  the  Mid-Atlantic  region  and  identify  bottle-
neck/chokepoint locations that impede the flow of truck traffic through the Mid- 
Atlantic region. 

• Mid-Atlantic  Rail  Operations  Study  (MAROps)—An  examination  of  rail  system 
performance through the Mid-Atlantic Rail Operations Study (MAROps), involv-
ing  five  states  (Delaware,  Maryland,  New  Jersey,  Pennsylvania,  and  Virginia), 
and three railroads (Amtrak, CSX Transportation, and Norfolk Southern). 

• Northeast  Rail  Operations  Study  (NEROps)—The  Coalition  is  studying  the  rail 
network  in  New  York  and  the  New  England  states  (Maine,  New  Hampshire, 
Vermont,  Massachusetts,  Connecticut,  and  Rhode  Island).  The  NEROps  study 
is describing the current and future demand for freight and passenger rail serv-
ice in the region as well as examining the current and planned supply of freight 
and passenger rail service. 

• Southeast  Rail  Operations  Study  (SEROps)—The  Southeast  Rail  Operations 
Study (SEROps) is completing the rail picture in the Coalition region by identi-
fying  and  describing  key  rail  issues,  activities,  and  initiatives  as  well  as  the 
trends  and  issues  affecting  freight  movements  and  freight  and  passenger  rail 
transportation  in  the  Southeastern  states  (North  Carolina,  South  Carolina, 
Georgia, and Florida). 

• Short-Sea  and  Coastal  Shipping  Options  Study—Provided  to  state  DOTs  and 
MPOs a better understanding of how short-sea shipping fits within local, state-
wide, and regional transportation systems. One of the key outcomes was a pre-
liminary  identification  of  commodity  types  and  general  traffic  lanes  that  could 
be amenable to short-sea shipping operations. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

19 

• The  most  substantial  and  notable  of  these  analyses  has  been  the  Mid-Atlantic 
Rail Operations Study (MAROps) The study identified over 70 major rail choke 
points within the Mid-Atlantic rail system. These included: 
» Antiquated and undersized bridges and tunnels. 
» Lack of capacity on critical segments of freight and passenger lines. 
» Inadequate  vertical  clearances  for  double-stack  container  traffic  on  freight 

mainlines. 

» Inadequate  connections  between  rail  lines.  Congested  grade  crossings,  sta-

tions, yards, and terminals. 

» Outmoded and inadequate information and control systems. 
The  MAROps  study  defined  a  20-year,  $6.2  billion  program  of  rail  improve-
ments  aimed  at  improving  north-south  rail  transportation  for  both  passengers 
and  freight  in  the  Mid-Atlantic  region  and  helping  reduce  truck  traffic  on  the 
region’s  overburdened  highway  system.  In  a  follow-up  study  in  2004,  the  bene-
fits from the MAROps program improvements were estimated at $12.8 billion— 
about a 2-to-1 benefit-cost ratio. The benefits included: 
» $2.9  billion  in  direct  shipper  benefits  due  to  reduced  freight  transportation 

costs; 

» $6.3  billion  in  direct  savings  due  to  reduced  highway  congestion  for  vehicles 
still  on  the  road—$0.8  billion  for  trucks,  $0.7  billion  for  work-related  auto 
trips, and $4.8 billion for non-work auto trips; and 

» $3.7  billion  in  indirect  economic  benefits  generated  throughout  the  economy 

by these transportation savings. 

Other State Freight Initiatives 

In  addition  to  these  well-known  initiatives,  virtually  every  state  is  actively  plan-
ning,  organizing,  collaborating  and  investing  to  make  the  freight  system  more  effi-
cient  and  productive.  States  are  planning,  organizing,  collaborating,  and  investing. 
Planning—States  such  as  Minnesota,  Washington,  Ohio,  Oregon,  California,  New 
Jersey,  Vermont,  and  Virginia  have  completed  or  initiated  freight  transportation  to 
plans as a basis for establishing investment priorities. 

Organizing—A number of states have established a unit within their departments 
of  transportation  through  which  to  develop  and  carry  out  a  freight  transportation 
program.  They  include  Louisiana,  Maryland,  Maine,  Pennsylvania,  Minnesota, 
Washington, and Oregon. 

Collaborating—Because freight transportation operations and much freight trans-
portation  infrastructure  lie  in  the  private  sector,  states  are  initiating  freight  advi-
sory  committees  to  strengthen  the  link  with  government.  They  are  well-established 
in  Oregon,  Colorado,  and  Minnesota  and  in  the  early  stages  in  a  number  of  other 
states. 

Investing—Florida,  New  York,  Virginia,  Mississippi,  Pennsylvania,  Oregon,  and 
California have recently created or expanded freight financing programs that either 
focus on rail or are available for investments in all freight modes. 

States are acting to address the challenges of moving freight more efficiently, eco-
nomically, and reliably, but our efforts do not aggregate into a national strategy and 
our resources are not sufficient to meet the national need. 
AASHTO Policy Recommendations 

We  need  to  move  forward  as  a  nation,  but  to  do  so  with  confidence  we  need  a 
better map. The fact that we agree on the problem (i.e., that we have severe, costly, 
constraints  on  efficient  freight  movement)  does  not  automatically  yield  a  well-fund-
ed,  strategic  nationwide  freight  investment  program.  AASHTO’s  Bottom  Line  work 
has  produced  maps  that  show  the  most  serious  chokepoints  for  highway,  rail,  and 
port landside connections and corridors (maps attached). We need to consolidate this 
and  other  analyses  into  a  fully-funded  nationwide  investment  strategy  that  identi-
fies  and  stages  the  investments  that  will  produce  the  maximum  benefit  for  the  na-
tional  system.  This  is  no  small  task,  but  it  should  be  undertaken  now.  A  national 
strategy,  involving  Federal,  state,  and  local  Governors  and  the  private  sector  re-
quires a common national understanding to guide investment. 

In closing, I want to outline several of AASHTO’s policy recommendations. 
Surface  transportation  investment  needs  to  be  increased  to  the  levels  required  to 
keep  the  United  States  competitive  in  the  global  economy  and  meet  America’s  21st 
century mobility needs. It means increasing highway and transit funding toward the 
‘‘cost-to-improve’’ goal estimated by the U.S. DOT. Expressed in ‘‘year of expenditure 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

20 

dollars’’ the 2025 goal for highways would be $242 billion per year and transit would 
be $49 billion per year. 

The  only  way  those  levels  of  funding  can  be  achieved,  is  for  all  levels  of  govern-
ment—Federal, state, and local—to continue to fund their historical shares of what 
is  needed.  Over  the  past  decade  the  Federal  Government  has  provided  approxi-
mately 45 percent of highway and transit capital funding, while 55 percent has been 
provided  by  state  and  local  governments.  A  significant  increase  in  Highway  Trust 
Fund  revenues  will  be  required  to  avert  a  major  cutback  in  highway  and  transit 
funding,  restore  the  program’s  purchasing  power,  and  enable  future  improvements. 
AASHTO  also  supports  an  increase  in  Federal  transportation  funding  assistance 
to  states  and  their  local  governments  through  tax  credit  bonding.  This  mechanism 
could be particularly helpful new source of Federal revenue to allow states to make 
investments in rail passenger and freight improvements. 

AASHTO supports additional Federal Government financing for freight-related in-
vestments,  including  freight  gateways,  connectors,  corridors,  and  border  crossings. 
With  state  involvement,  AASHTO  also  supports  tax  incentives  for  new  investment 
in freight-rail infrastructure by rail companies, with state involvement, and funding 
to states for participation in public-benefit rail improvements. 

As a nation, we must ultimately transition to a diversified portfolio of Federal rev-
enue  sources.  We  must  examine,  analyze,  and  select  alternative  funding  mecha-
nisms  to  meet  the  financial  needs  of  the  Nation’s  transportation  systems  into  the 
foreseeable future. A comprehensive, sustainable, diversified portfolio of Federal rev-
enue  is  needed  to  address  the  diverse  investment  needs  of  the  Nation’s  surface 
transportation system, i.e., its highways, transit systems, railroads, and ports. 

Because  freight  moves  irrespective  of  local,  state,  and  national  borders  the  Fed-
eral Government should provide support for a multi-state/regional investment mech-
anism  to  fund  and  finance  improvements  to  regionally  and  nationally  significant 
freight  projects,  where  costs  are  in  a  single  state,  but  benefits  accrue  to  several 
states. 

The  Federal  Government  should  encourage  the  private  sector  to  invest  in  oper-
ational and capacity improvements that can relieve freight bottlenecks and improve 
the flow of goods and services. The Federal Government should also provide support 
for state efforts to relieve critical freight chokepoints through investment in projects 
such as truck lanes and intermodal connectors. 

AASHTO’s  Board  has  also  concluded  that  the  states,  in  collaboration  with  the 
freight transportation industry and the Federal Government, should investigate the 
feasibility  of  regional  adjustments  in  truck  size  and  weight  in  particular  corridors 
that demonstrate important economic benefits and meet safety, pavement/bridge im-
pact and financing criteria. 

Given the realities of the current state of the Highway Trust Fund and the neces-
sity to maintain and improve the existing infrastructure through the core programs 
currently authorized by SAFETEA–LU, revenues for major freight investments such 
as those identified above will necessarily be derived from sources other than the cur-
rent  fuel  tax.  We  should  calculate  the  value  that  freight  transportation  adds  to  the 
economy and devise means of tapping that value for the needed capital investment. 
Mr.  Chairman,  Members  of  the  Committee,  the  importance  of  the  subject  you 
have  under  discussion  today  would  be  hard  to  exaggerate.  It  is  in  the  interest  of 
us  all  to  take  on  the  challenge  as  vigorously  and  effectively  as  we  can.  On  behalf 
of the AASHTO member states, I promise that we will work with you in that effort. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

21 

CHARTS 

Freight Demand by Tons and Ton-Miles 2005 to 2035 

2005 

2015 

2025 

2035 

Freight Tons 

Air, truck, rail, and water 
Growth from 2005 

Modal Shares of Tonnage 

Air 
Other (pipeline, multiple modes) 
Water 
Rail 
Truck 
Total 

Freight Ton-Miles a 

Air, truck, rail, and water 
Growth from 2005 

Modal Shares of Ton-Miles 

Air 
Other 
Water 
Rail 
Truck 
Total 

15.3 Billion 

19.0 Billion 

23.0 Billion 

29.0 Billion 

23.5% 

50.1% 

88.9% 

0.1% 
1.3% 
7.4% 
14.2% 
77.1% 
100.0% 

0.1% 
1.3% 
7.0% 
14.2% 
77.4% 
100.0% 

0.1% 
1.2% 
6.5% 
13.5% 
78.7% 
100.0% 

0.1% 
1.1% 
6.0% 
12.8% 
80.1% 
100.0% 

5.84 Trillion 

7.12 Trillion 

8.70 Trillion 

11.23 Trillion 

22% 

49% 

92% 

0.3% 
2.7% 
11.4% 
25.1% 
60.6% 
100.0% 

0.3% 
2.7% 
10.6% 
25.7% 
60.7% 
100.0% 

0.3% 
2.4% 
9.6% 
25.1% 
62.6% 
100.0% 

0.3% 
2.0% 
8.4% 
24.1% 
65.2% 
100.0% 

Source: Global Insight, Inc., TRANSEARCH 2004, with Global Insight economic forecasts. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
2
N
N
Y
L
G
0
1
6

22 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

4
N
N
Y
L
G
0
1
6

.

s
p
e
3
N
N
Y
L
G
0
1
6

23 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

6
N
N
Y
L
G
0
1
6

.

s
p
e
5
N
N
Y
L
G
0
1
6

AMERICAN ASSOCIATION OF STATE HIGHWAY AND TRANSPORTATION OFFICIALS 

24 

Freight Transportation Policy 
Basic Propositions 

• Efficient  and  reliable  freight  transportation  is  critical  for  global  economic  com-
petitiveness  and  essential  for  domestic  economic  prosperity  and  an  improving 
quality of life. 

• International trade as a percentage of the Nation’s GDP has doubled in the last 
two  decades  and  will  increase  by  at  least  another  50  percent  by  2020,  adding 
to the volume of freight, the distance of freight trips, and significant change and 
volatility in origins and destinations of freight traffic. 

• In  recent  years  a  number  of  ‘‘red  flag’’  events  have  demonstrated  that  the  Na-
tion’s  freight  transportation  system  requires  immediate,  sustained,  and  signifi-
cant action. 

• The infrastructure capacity—physical and operational—of all modes of transpor-
tation has not expanded with increasing demand and will fall far short of meet-
ing future demands of freight transportation. 

• Substantial  investment  and  improved  operations  by  both  private  business  and 

government will be required to avert even more severe capacity constraints. 

• State and local transportation officials are confronted with the challenge of pro-
viding infrastructure to address large and shifting traffic increases generated by 
ports, inland terminals and mega-distribution centers. 

• States are central to the effort to strengthen the national freight transportation 
system  as  a  result  of  their  ownership  and  management  of  the  highway  system 
that  carries  the  largest  portion  of  freight  and  makes  the  essential  connections 
to the other modes. 

• States  are  increasingly  engaged  and  active  in  response  to  the  freight  transpor-

tation challenge and their efforts should be strengthened and expanded. 

• SAFETEA–LU contains a number of authorizations important for freight trans-
portation  which  should  be  implemented  in  a  coordinated  and  energetic  fashion. 
• Investment  in  the  major  elements  of  the  freight  transportation  system—high-
way,  rail,  port,  waterway,  and  air—through  current  programs  must  be  in-
creased, but these programs will not be sufficient to meet the need. 

• New sources of revenue and new forms of financing must be developed and de-

ployed. 

• The Federal Government should be responsible for the ‘‘national’’ benefits share 
of  investment  resulting  from  trade  agreements,  international  ports,  border 
crossings, major national freight transportation gateways, and substantial secu-
rity requirements mandated for freight facilities. 

• New  forms  of  Public-Private  and  Public-Public  Partnerships  will  be  needed  to 
address  challenges  that  do  not  conform  to  government  jurisdictions,  geographic 
boundaries,  or  the  traditional  dividing  line  between  government  and  business. 
• Plans and projects for freight transportation investments must fully incorporate 

environmental, community-impact, land use and energy considerations. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much, Ms. Glynn. 
Mr. Hamberger, your testimony, please. 

STATEMENT OF EDWARD R. HAMBERGER, PRESIDENT AND 

CEO, ASSOCIATION OF AMERICAN RAILROADS 

Mr. HAMBERGER. Mr. Chairman, thank you, and Members of the 
Subcommittee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  be  here  on  behalf 
of the Association of American Railroads and our member rail com-
panies. 

Before  I  begin,  I’d  just  like  to  make  three  points  outside  of  my 
prepared  remarks,  Mr.  Chairman.  Number  one  is—and  I  do  this 
with  great  sensitivity—I  need  to  correct  your  chart.  We  just  got  in 
the 2007 numbers. In 2007 freight railroads averaged 436 miles per 
gallon.  That  is  to  say,  we  on  average  moved  one  ton  of  freight  436 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

25 

miles  on  one  gallon  of  fuel.  So  I  hate  to  disagree  with  the  Chair-
man, but I thought that we better update the data. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. That’s always a good way to start. 
[Laughter.] 
Mr.  HAMBERGER.  Yes.  I  was  sitting  here  pondering  what  to  do. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Correcting  the  record  is  not  uncommon 

around here. 

Mr.  HAMBERGER.  Number  two,  I  would  like  to  point  out  for  the 
subcommittee,  if  you  haven’t  gotten  the  news,  that  the  UTU  has 
notified  me  this  morning  that  they  did  ratify  the  agreement  with 
the  freight  railroads,  so  we  now  have  over  95  percent  of  our  em-
ployees with a contract and we’re very pleased that over 85 percent 
of UTU members have voted to ratify that contract. 

Third,  while  this  is  a  hearing  about  freight,  in  my  written  testi-
mony I touch on it, but I would be remiss with the House right now 
taking up the Amtrak authorization bill—at least I hope right now 
they’re taking it up—and your leadership of this Committee has led 
to the passage of the Amtrak authorization bill. 

At $135 a barrel, this country has to take advantage of the inher-
ent efficiency of steel wheel on the steel rail. It’s efficient to get 436 
miles per gallon on the freight side, but it’s just as efficient on the 
passenger  side.  We  need  policies  that  provide  enough  capacity  for 
both freight and passenger rail. I hope in the months and years to 
come  we  can  talk  more  about  that  as  well.  But  I’ve  already  used 
up half of my time. 

But  anyway,  if  I  can  get  back  to  the  freight  issue  and  the  issue 
of  this  hearing.  The  National  Surface  Transportation  Policy  Com-
mission  did  note  in  its  recent  report  that  congestion  is  affecting 
every  mode  of  surface  transportation  for  lengthy  periods  each  day 
as a result of the mismatch between supply and demand of limited 
capacity. 

Freight railroads are not exempt from that assessment. 2006 was 
the  best  year  on  record,  2007  the  second  best  year  on  record  in 
terms  of  commodities  flowing  over  the  freight  rail  system.  Today 
we  carry  twice  as  much  freight  per  route  mile  as  we  did  in  1990. 
This  has  led  to  capacity  constraints  along  the  rail  network  and  all 
forecasts  project  increases  in  demand.  The  Department  of  Trans-
portation forecast is 88 percent by the year 2035. 

To  meet  that  demand,  it  is  clear  that  we  will  have  to  invest  in 
expanded  capacity,  we’re  going  to  have  to  do  a  number  of  things, 
and we’ve already begun doing those. One is hiring new employees, 
11,000  more  employees  today  than  just  3  years  ago.  New  tech-
nology  has  been  deployed  to  increase  capacity,  including  more  so-
phisticated  signaling  systems,  higher  capacity  freight  cars,  and 
more  powerful  locomotives.  We’ve  also  entered  into  alliances  with 
our  customers  and  with  each  other  to  improve  utilization  and  the 
efficiency of the freight flows. 

But ultimately, at the end of the day it all comes down to money. 
We are going to have to invest to expand capacity, and we’ve been 
doing that. Since 1980 the industry has spent $420 billion on infra-
structure  and  equipment.  That  includes  maintaining  and  expand-
ing  the  infrastructure.  That  is  40  cents  out  of  each  revenue  dollar 
goes into capital expenditures or maintenance expenditures. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

26 

To place that into perspective, each of the two largest freight rail 
companies  spends  more  to  maintain  and  improve  their  track  and 
roadway  than  all  but  three  of  Secretary  Glynn’s  members  at 
AASHTO  spend  on  their  State  highway  programs.  The  next  two 
largest  railroads  would  be  ranked  in  the  top  ten  in  comparison  to 
what an individual State spends on its highway network. 

The  ability  of  the  railroads  to  continue  investing  obviously  will 
depend  upon  their  ability  to  make  an  adequate  rate  of  return.  As 
the  Congressional  Budget  Office  noted  in  its  report  2  years  ago, 
profits are key to increasing capacity because they provide both the 
incentive and the means to make those new investments. 

In  order  to  meet  the  projected  demand,  Cambridge  Systematics 
did a study for the Department of Transportation report which esti-
mated that $148 billion will need to be spent on capacity expansion 
alone,  not  maintaining,  not  replacing,  capacity  expansion,  between 
now  and  the  year  2035,  just  to  maintain  the  freight  rail  market 
share. 

The  Cambridge  Systematics  report  projects  that  all  of  that 
money  will  probably  not  be  coming  from  the  freight  railroads.  We 
believe  that  there  is  a  role  for  government  to  play  because  of  the 
public benefits of moving freight by rail. Those benefits include fuel 
utilization,  less  CO2 emissions,  and  obviously  congestion  mitiga-
tion. 

Because  of  the  public  benefits,  I  would  like  to  suggest  a  couple 

of policies that Congress may consider. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Your  full  statement  will  be  in  the  record 
and  in  order  to  move  things  along  I  would  ask  you  if  you  have  a 
few-second summary. 

Mr.  HAMBERGER.  I  will  wrap  up  very  quickly,  thank  you,  Mr. 
Chairman. One would be enactment of the infrastructure tax cred-
it,  which  Senator  Smith  is  a  lead  sponsor;  enactment  of  the  short 
line  rail  investment  tax  credit;  encouragement  of  public-private 
partnerships,  such  as  the  FAST  Corridor,  the  Alameda  Corridor; 
and four, do no harm, that is do not enact policies that would pre-
vent  railroads  from  earning  the  very  money  needed  to  invest  at  a 
time we need to invest it. 

Thank you and I apologize for running over. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Hamberger follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF EDWARD R. HAMBERGER, PRESIDENT AND 
CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER, ASSOCIATION OF AMERICAN RAILROADS 

Introduction 

On behalf of the members of the Association of American Railroads (AAR), thank 
you  for  the  opportunity  to  discuss  strategies  for  efficient  freight  movement.  AAR 
members  account  for  75  percent  of  U.S.  freight  railroad  mileage  operated,  92  per-
cent of employees, and 95 percent of revenue. 

Comprehensive, reliable, and cost-effective freight railroad service is critical to our 
Nation.  Today,  freight  railroads  account  for  more  than  40  percent  of  U.S.  intercity 
ton-miles—more than any other mode of transportation—and serve nearly every in-
dustrial,  wholesale,  retail,  agricultural,  and  mineral-based  sector  of  our  economy. 
And  in  the  words  of  the  former  Railways  Adviser  at  the  World  Bank,  ‘‘Because  of 
a  market-based  approach  involving  minimal  government  intervention,  today’s  U.S. 
freight railroads add up to a network that, comparing the total cost to shippers and 
taxpayers, gives the world’s most cost-effective rail freight service.’’ 

Looking  ahead,  the  United  States  cannot  prosper  in  an  increasingly-competitive 
global marketplace if our freight is not delivered efficiently and cost effectively. Hav-
ing adequate freight rail capacity is critical to this effort. Freight railroads must be 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

27 

able  to  both  maintain  their  extensive  existing  infrastructure  and  equipment  and 
build the substantial new capacity that will be required to transport the significant 
additional traffic our economy will generate. 

I  respectfully  suggest  that  Members  of  this  Committee,  your  colleagues  in  Con-
gress,  and  other  policymakers  have  critical  roles  to  play.  Indeed,  a  primary  obliga-
tion of policymakers is to take steps that assist—and, just as importantly, not take 
steps  that  hinder—railroads  in  making  the  investments  needed  to  provide  the  cur-
rent and future freight transportation capacity our Nation requires. 
Capacity  is  a  Challenge  Everywhere  in  Transportation,  Including  on  Rail-

roads 

As  the  National  Surface  Transportation  Policy  and  Revenue  Study  Commission 
noted  in  a  recent  report,  ‘‘Congestion  [is  affecting]  every  mode  of  surface  transpor-
tation  for  ever-lengthening  periods  each  day,  as  a  result  of  the  mismatch  between 
demand and supply of limited capacity.’’ 1 

To  be  sure,  there  is  a  tremendous  amount  of  strength  and  flexibility  in  our  Na-
tion’s  transportation  systems,  and  the  freight  is  still  being  delivered  by  all  of  the 
modes. But it is clear that all freight transportation modes are facing capacity chal-
lenges today. 

Freight  railroads  face  capacity  challenges  thanks  largely  to  substantial  and  sus-
tained  increases  in  rail  traffic.  From  1990  to  2007,  Class  I  tons  originated  rose  36 
percent, carloads originated rose 47 percent, and revenue ton-miles rose 71 percent. 
In  each  successive  year  from  1998  through  2006,  Class  I  railroads  originated  more 
tons than ever before. Growth in intermodal traffic—truck trailers and shipping con-
tainers  traveling  on  rail  cars  has  been  especially  rapid.  Beginning  with  the  second 
quarter  of  2002,  U.S.  rail  intermodal  traffic  rose  for  20  consecutive  quarters,  some-
times by double-digit amounts compared with the same period in the previous year. 

1 Report  of  the  National  Surface  Transportation  Policy  and  Revenue  Study  Commission,  Vol-

ume 1, p. 4. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
B
M
A
H
0
1
6

28 

There  was  a  slight  decline  in  rail  traffic  in  2007,  due  mainly  to  the  severe  prob-
lems  in  the  housing  and  automotive  sectors.  Even  so,  railroads  operating  in  the 
United  States  moved  more  freight  in  2007  than  in  any  previous  year  except  2006. 

As  a  result  of  these  substantial  traffic  increases,  average  freight  rail  traffic  den-
sity  has  increased  sharply.  Just  from  1990  to  2007,  Class  I  car-miles  per  mile  of 
track  owned  rose  approximately  82  percent;  revenue  ton-miles  per  mile  of  road 
owned rose some 118 percent. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

3
B
M
A
H
0
1
6

s
p
e
.
2
B
M
A
H
0
1
6

29 

The increase in traffic and traffic density have led to capacity constraints on some 
rail  corridors  and  points  on  the  rail  network.  Railroads  may  differ  in  the  degree  to 
which their capacity is constrained, but there is no question that there is much less 
room on the U.S. rail network today than there was even a few years ago. 

In  recent  years,  solid  growth  in  the  economy  (the  current  slowdown  notwith-
standing)  and  population,  improved  rail  service  offerings,  expanding  international 
trade, increasingly-congested highways, sharply higher fuel prices, and other factors 
have pushed more and more freight to railroads. Even when taking into account the 
current  lessened  traffic  demand  due  to  the  present  economic  conditions,  analysts 
generally expect market forces to continue to encourage more freight to move by rail 
in the years ahead. 

As a result, the long-term forecast is for freight rail traffic to trend steadily high-
er.  For  example,  Global  Insight  recently  projected  a  28  percent  increase  in  U.S. 
freight  rail  tonnage  from  2006  through  2018.  The  U.S.  Department  of  Transpor-
tation  recently  forecast  that  freight  railroad  demand  will  rise  88  percent  by  2035. 
If the increase in rail traffic in the 15 years following 2007 simply matches the rate 
of  growth  over  the  comparable  period  prior  to  2007,  by  2021  Class  I  carriers  will 
be originating more than 41 million carloads—up from 31.5 million in 2006. 

The  magnitude  of  the  looming  freight  rail  capacity  issue  was  also  borne  out  by 
a recent study by Cambridge Systematics, a prominent economic and transportation 
consulting firm. The purpose of the study, which focused on 52,000 miles of primary 
rail  corridors,  was  to  estimate  the  cost  of  the  expansion  in  capacity  necessary  for 
U.S. freight railroads to handle the 88 percent increase in freight rail traffic forecast 
by  the  DOT  for  2035,  assuming  no  gain  in  rail’s  market  share  of  intercity  freight 
movements. 

The  study  found  that  if  rail  capacity  needs  are  not  properly  addressed,  by  2035 
some  16,000  miles  of  primary  rail  corridors—nearly  one-third  of  the  52,000  miles 
covered  in  the  study—will  be  so  congested  that  train  flows  would  be  unstable  and 
congestion and service delays would be persistent and substantial. Because the rail 
system  is  so  interconnected,  this  outcome  would  mean  that  the  entire  U.S.  freight 
rail system would become, in effect, disabled. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
4
B
M
A
H
0
1
6

30 

The  significance  of  the  network  aspects  of  rail  operations  cannot  be  overempha-
sized.  As  rail  lines  are  operated  at  or  near  full  capacity,  efficiency  (including  oper-
ational  predictability)  becomes  more  critical.  Service  disruptions  caused  by  ineffi-
cient asset utilization can have impacts not only on the railroad involved but poten-
tially throughout the entire rail network. 

All  of  this  means  that  the  characteristics  of  the  U.S.  freight  railroad  industry 
today are significantly different than they were in the past, when traffic levels were 
much lower and capacity was rarely an issue. The rail network faces capacity chal-
lenges  now  and  could  face  a  capacity  crisis  in  the  future  if  the  necessary  invest-
ments are not made. Looking ahead, as their traffic continues to grow, railroads will 
increasingly need to concentrate on building new capacity and finding ways to better 
utilize  their  existing  capacity—while  continuing  to  maintain  existing  capacity  at 
high standards. 
Railroad Networks Are Extremely Complex to Plan and Operate 

In  2006  (the  most  recent  year  for  which  data  are  available),  the  approximately 
560  U.S.  freight  railroads  originated  36.5  million  carloads  of  freight—equal  to  ap-
proximately  100,000  carloads,  on  average,  every  day  of  the  year.  Each  day,  dozens 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

6
B
M
A
H
0
1
6

s
p
e
.
5
B
M
A
H
0
1
6

31 

of different types of freight cars are used to haul a huge variety of products between 
thousands  of  different  origin  and  destination  pairs  on  journeys  that  might  be  only 
a mile or two—or could cover several thousand miles.2 

And  unlike  other  network  industries  which  transmit  fungible  products  (e.g.,  elec-
tricity is the same, no matter who generates it) or products that can readily be rout-
ed  to  particular  customers  using  automated  equipment  (e.g.,  electronic  signals  for 
telecommunications),  railroads  must  move  specific  railcars  carrying  specific  com-
modities  from  specific  origins  to  specific  locations.  Railroads  can  accomplish  this 
only because they devote enormous resources to plan and operate their networks to 
meet their customers’ needs safely and efficiently. 
Different Train Types Create Different Demands on the Rail Network 

Managing  the  current  and  future  use  of  rail  network  capacity  is  an  extraor-
dinarily complex process that involves a wide variety of elements. These include cur-
rent  and  expected  traffic  volumes;  the  types  of  trains  to  be  moved  (e.g.,  unit  trains 
vs.  manifest  trains,  passenger  trains  vs.  freight  trains,  etc.),  their  speed,  and  pri-
ority  status;  the  quantity  and  quality  of  available  assets;  the  availability  of  funds 
for new investments; pertinent laws and regulations; and much more. Sophisticated 
analytical  processes  (e.g.,  advanced  computer  modeling)  help  railroads  understand 
and  incorporate  many  of  these  factors  into  rail  decisionmaking.  No  computer  pro-
gram,  though,  is  sophisticated  enough  to  incorporate  everything  that  could  impact 
how well a rail network runs at any point in time. Thus, railroads depend critically 
on the experiences and judgment of their employees. 

The mix of train types determines the speed and spacing of trains on a track. All 
else  equal,  a  corridor  that  serves  a  single  type  of  train  can  usually  accommodate 
more  trains  per  day  than  a  corridor  that  serves  a  mix  of  train  types.  Trains  of  a 
single  type  can  be  operated  at  similar  speeds  and  with  more  uniform  spacing  be-
tween  the  trains,  in  part  because  they  have  similar  braking  and  acceleration  capa-
bilities. This increases the total number of trains that can operate over a track seg-
ment  each  day.  When  trains  of  different  types—each  with  different  length,  speed, 
and  braking  characteristics—share  a  track  segment,  greater  spacing  is  required  to 
ensure  safe  braking  distances  and  accommodate  different  acceleration  rates.  As  a 
result, the average speed drops and the total number of trains that can travel over 
the corridor is reduced. 

Moreover,  different  train  types  and  customer  segments  have  different  service  re-
quirements.  For  example,  premium  intermodal  movements  demand  high  levels  of 
delivery reliability, timeliness, and speed; bulk trains (e.g., coal or grain unit trains) 
may  need  consistent,  managed  service  with  coordinated  pick-up  and  delivery,  but 
high transit speed is often less important; customers who own or manage their own 
fleet  of  freight  cars  may  require  railroads  to  undertake  network  strategies  which 
help  them  minimize  these  costs,  such  as  maximizing  the  number  of  annual  loaded 
trips  rail  cars  make;  passenger  trains  require  high  speed  and  reliability  within  a 
very  specific  time  window;  and  so  on.  In  addition,  a  railroad  must  be  able  to  move 
empty  freight  cars  through  the  network  in  a  manner  which  positions  them  to  pro-
vide service based on continually-changing levels of customer demand. 

The  extent  to  which  all  of  these  sometimes-conflicting  demands  seek  to  use  the 
same  portions  of  the  rail  network  defines  the  complexity  of  the  management  prob-
lem. The more complex the demand base, the greater the mixture of differing train 
types; the more complex network management will be; and the greater the required 
capacity investment. 
Rail Network Planning 

Like firms in every other industry, railroads have limited resources. Their ability 
to meet customer requirements is constrained by the extent and location of their in-
frastructure  (both  track  and  terminal  facilities);  by  the  availability  of  appropriate 
equipment  and  employees  where  they  are  needed;  and  by  the  availability  of  funds 
necessary  to  augment  what  they  already  have.  The  constraints  railroads  face—par-
ticularly  those  involving  their  physical  network—cannot  be  changed  quickly.  It  can 
take  a  year  or  more  for  locomotives  and  freight  cars  to  be  delivered  following  their 

2 Rail  traffic  is  not  uniformly  distributed  each  day,  so  on  some  days  considerably  more  than 
100,000  carloads  are  originated.  In  fact,  the  carloadings  on  the  heaviest  business  day  of  the 
busiest  season  may  exceed  by  40  percent  those  of  the  lightest  business  day  of  the  lightest  sea-
son.  The  variance  is  caused  in  roughly  equal  parts  by  seasonal  demand  and  the  five-day  work 
week of most rail customers. These demand variations have a significant impact on rail capacity 
requirements. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

32 

order; 6 months or more to hire, train, and qualify new employees; and several years 
to plan, permit, and build new infrastructure.3 

In light of these factors and many more, railroads must design effective operating 
plans  that  meet  customer  requirements  within  the  confines  of  the  physical  con-
straints they face. 

The  complexity  of  such  a  plan  is  enormous.  For  example,  it  must  incorporate  the 
differing  types  of  demand  placed  on  various  portions  of  a  network,  as  well  as  the 
changes  in  that  demand.  Sometimes  these  changes  evolve  over  several  (or  more) 
years  and  are  based  on  changes  in  underlying  markets—e.g.,  the  emergence  of  the 
Powder River Basin as the premiere source of domestic coal, the growth of imported 
goods from the West Coast, or the development of ethanol markets. At other times, 
these  changes  are  relatively  sudden—brought  on,  for  example,  by  natural  events 
(e.g., floods or hurricanes), economic factors (e.g., export surges due to a weaker dol-
lar),  or  the  loss  or  gain  of  traffic  flows  of  a  major  customer  or  group  of  customers 
through  plant  openings  or  closings  or  the  competitive  bidding  process.  Sometimes 
these changes can be foreseen; at other times, they are wholly unexpected. 

A  railroad’s  operating  plan  must  allocate  this  demand  across  a  network  that  has 
terminal  processing  constraints  (e.g.,  the  number  of  yard  tracks,  locomotive  facili-
ties,  configuration,  etc.);  line-haul  capacity  constraints  (e.g.,  number  of  main  tracks 
and  crossover  points  between  them;  location  and  frequency  of  sidings;  types  of  sig-
naling  systems;  speed  limits;  connections  with  other  routes;  etc.);  locomotive  avail-
ability  (e.g.,  the  number,  their  horsepower,  availability  of  support  facilities  for  fuel-
ing  and  maintenance,  etc.);  and  employee  constraints  (e.g.,  number,  location,  crew 
support facilities, equipment maintenance and servicing personnel, etc.). 

On  every  major  railroad,  all  of  these  factors  must  be  combined  to  develop  a  plan 

to move traffic safely and efficiently 24 hours per day, every day of the year. 

Sophisticated  computer  models  are  available  to  assist  in  the  network  planning 
process.  However,  these  simulation  results  must  be  interpreted  and  validated  by 
knowledgeable railroad personnel who use their judgment and experience as to what 
works and what does not. 

Because  of  its  complexity,  the  development  of  a  new  network  operating  plan  to 
accommodate  substantially-changed  conditions  typically  takes  months  or  years,  not 
days  or  weeks.  (However,  refinement  of  an  existing  plan  is  a  continuous  improve-
ment  process.)  In  essence,  the  overall  planning  process  must  create  a  number  of 
‘‘mini plans’’ for each of the various train types (such as premium intermodal, inter-
national  intermodal,  coal,  grain,  other  bulk,  automotive,  manifest,  local,  passenger, 
etc.)  that  overlay  and  share  the  physical  network.  Each  network  use  plan  also  at-
tempts  to  bring  resolution  to  the  thousands  of  competing  customer  interests  that 
make daily use of the railroad resources. 
Managing an Operating Plan 

Implementing  and  managing  an  operating  plan  in  the  field  is  also  challenging. 
When  dealing  with  networks  of  this  complexity,  even  the  best  plans  will  have  gaps 
that  must  be  filled  with  the  managerial  experience  of  knowledgeable  personnel. 
Moreover,  the  operating  situation  is  always  fluid—day-to-day  fluctuations  in  vol-
ume,  weather,  crew  and  equipment  availability,  and  more  can  have  an  enormous 
impact  on  the  ability  of  a  railroad  to  manage  to  the  dictates  of  its  operating  plan. 
Even in the best operation, trains may be late (or early), customers may not release 
cars  on  time,  bad  weather  may  ensue,  grade  crossing  accidents  may  happen,  and 
delays may occur. 

Although operating plans often build in some flexibility, where possible, to accom-
modate these variances, no plan can either predict or accommodate all eventualities 
for  all  portions  of  a  rail  network.  Moreover,  accommodation  is  much  more  difficult 
when  capacity  is  constrained.  In  fact,  when  capacity  is  tight,  disruptive  incidents 
are more common and recovery takes longer than when the network is not fully uti-
lized.  And  because  the  rail  system  truly  is  a  network,  disruptions  in  one  portion  of 
the system can quickly spread to distant points.4 

The need for safe operations trumps everything else, and proper line maintenance 
is  essential  for  safe  rail  operations.  However,  the  need  for  maintenance  adds  still 
another  level  of  complexity  to  rail  planning.  In  fact,  because  of  higher  rail  volumes 
and a trend toward heavier loaded freight cars, the maintenance of the rail network 
has  become  even  more  important.  Railroads  have  no  desire  to  return  to  the  days 

3 Railroads typically have a number of projects far enough along in the planning process that 

construction can be initiated quickly if funding become available. 

4 Unlike airline networks, where the period after midnight can usually be used to recover from 
the  previous  day’s  problems,  a  rail  network  operates  24  hours  a  day.  Thus,  incident  recovery 
must be accomplished while current operations are ongoing. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

33 

when  maintenance  ‘‘slow  orders’’  (speed  restrictions  below  the  track’s  normal  speed 
limit) were one of the most common causes of delay on the rail network. That’s why 
one of the most important parts of any railroad operating plan is the accompanying 
maintenance plan with which it is integrated, and minimizing the impact of mainte-
nance  disruptions  on  rail  operations  is  one  of  the  major  reasons  for  the  additional 
main track capacity that is being added to the rail network today. 

Terminals  and  their  operation  are  another  key  consideration  for  preserving  flu-
idity  in  a  rail  network.  A  train  may  operate  without  delay  over  a  segment  of  main 
line.  However,  if  it  cannot  enter  a  terminal  due  to  congestion,  then  it  must  remain 
out  on  the  main  line  or  in  a  siding  where  it  could  block  or  delay  other  traffic.  The 
ability  of  a  terminal  to  hold  trains  when  necessary  and  to  process  them  quickly  is 
one of the key elements in preventing congestion and relieving it when it does occur. 
Thus,  one  of  the  most  important  factors  in  increasing  capacity  for  the  rail  network 
is enhancing the fluidity of terminals. 

Unfortunately, terminals are often one of the more difficult areas in which to add 
capacity.  They  are  frequently  in,  or  near,  urban  areas.  Expansion  generally  means 
high  land  and,  potentially,  high  mitigation  costs.  And  as  discussed  further  below, 
even in less urban areas, a rail terminal is rarely considered positive by nearby resi-
dents,  and  its  development  or  expansion  to  accommodate  freight  capacity  growth  is 
usually the subject of intense debate. 
Four-Stage Railroad Capacity Upgrade Process 

Railroads  typically  have  four  stages  in  the  process  of  upgrading  their  capacity. 
They are explained sequentially below, but in actual practice tend to be used in par-
allel: 

1.  Identify  and  implement  process  changes  that  can  enhance  capacity.  This  in-
cludes a wide variety of steps, such as redesigning the railroad’s transportation 
and  operation  plans  (described  above);  redesigning,  negotiating,  and  imple-
menting new interchange plans with connecting railroads; redesigning yard and 
terminal  operations;  working  with  customers  to  improve  their  inbound  or  out-
bound flow processes; changing a maintenance plan; redesigning the process uti-
lized  to  inspect  and  maintain  equipment,  rethinking  and  implementing  new 
freight  car  distribution  strategies;  and  redeploying  locomotives  for  more  effec-
tive utilization. 
Some of these process improvements can be designed and implemented in weeks 
or months. Others may require a year or more. 
2.  Develop  and  deploy  improved  information  technology  and  processes  for  uti-
lizing that technology. This includes improvements in such areas as dispatching 
and control systems; terminal management systems; maintenance planning sys-
tems;  transportation  planning  systems;  work  assignments;  locomotive  and 
freight  car  monitoring;  track  defect  identification  and  diagnostic  systems;  and 
locomotive maintenance management systems. Some of these improvements too 
can  be  implemented  in  only  a  few  months,  while  others  are  more  complex  and 
may take several years to develop and implement. 
3.  Acquire  and  deploy  assets  that  can  be  used  ‘‘flexibly.’’  This  includes  assets 
such  as  locomotives,  freight  cars,  and  higher-capacity  maintenance  machinery. 
These items are not restricted to any particular portion of the rail network, but 
can  be  deployed  where  and  when  needed.  Trained  employees  are  perhaps  the 
most  important  of  the  ‘‘flexible’’  assets.  Equipment  usually  requires  at  least  6 
months  to  acquire,  often  after  many  additional  months  of  planning  and  design; 
employees usually require at least 6 months to train. 
4.  Adding  more  infrastructure,  or  ‘‘iron  in  the  ground.’’  This  represents  long- 
term  assets  that,  once  in  place,  cannot  be  redeployed  elsewhere.  Usually,  they 
take  at  least  1  year  to  deploy,  and  frequently  take  three  to  10  years  to  plan, 
design, permit, and build. 
These  include  projects  such  as  main  line  capacity  additions  (e.g.,  new  main 
tracks, sidings, and signal systems); new terminal capacity (e.g., intermodal and 
automotive terminals, freight classification yards, locomotive and freight equip-
ment  repair  and  servicing  facilities);  large  scale  upgrades  of  choke  points  in 
urban  areas  (such  as  the  Alameda  Corridor  and  the  series  of  Kansas  City  ‘‘fly-
over’’  projects);  new  customer  access  routes;  major  bridge  additions  or  rebuilds; 
improving  tunnel  clearances;  and  improvements  in  connectivity  between  dif-
ferent portions of the rail network. 

Railroads Are Working on a Variety of Fronts to Increase Capacity 

Railroads are committed to working to meet present and projected transportation 
demands by addressing the host of factors that influence the fluidity and resiliency 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

34 

of their operations, as well as the operations over the entire rail network. Examples 
of the railroads’ efforts are described below. 
Spending on Infrastructure and Equipment 

Of  the  many  different  factors  that  affect  how  well  a  rail  network  functions,  the 
basic amount and quality of infrastructure and equipment are among the most sig-
nificant.  For  this  reason,  U.S.  freight  railroads  have  been  expending,  and  will  con-
tinue to expend, enormous resources to improve their asset base. In fact, rail spend-
ing  for  these  purposes  has  never  been  higher  than  in  recent  years,  demonstrating 
the diligence with which railroads are responding to the capacity issue. 

Class  I  capital  spending  in  2007  was  $9.2  billion.  In  2003,  by  contrast,  Class  I 
capital  spending  was  $5.9  billion.  In  addition,  in  recent  years  substantially  higher 
percentages of rail investments have been directed to expanding capacity. If mainte-
nance  expenses  are  included  in  addition  to  capital  spending,  from  1980  through 
2007, U.S. freight railroads have invested approximately $420 billion—more than 40 
cents out of every revenue dollar. In 2006 and 2007, Class I railroads alone devoted 
more than $19 billion per year to these purposes. 

The following is just a sampling of the diverse types of capacity-enhancing invest-

ments individual Class I railroads have recently made or will soon be making: 

• BNSF  plans  a  $2.45  billion  capital  commitment  program  for  2008,  including 
leasing  200  locomotives  at  a  cost  of  around  $400  million  and  $200  million  in 
track  and  facility  expansion.  The  2008  capacity  expansion  program  comes  after 
a  record  capacity  expansion  program  in  2007.  Major  2008  capacity  expansion 
programs  include  continuing  to  double-  or  triple-track  the  Southern  Transcon 
route,  including  a  second  main  line  across  Abo  Canyon  in  New  Mexico;  con-
tinuing to install double-track on a major coal route in Nebraska and Wyoming; 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

8
B
M
A
H
0
1
6

s
p
e
.
7
B
M
A
H
0
1
6

35 

expanding intermodal facilities in Kansas City, Los Angeles, and Memphis; and 
adding sidings between Fort Worth and Houston. 

• Canadian  National  plans  capital  spending  of  around  $1.5  billion  in  2008,  in-
cluding  approximately  $1.1  billion  on  track  infrastructure,  $140  million  on 
equipment, and approximately $250 million on transload facilities and distribu-
tion centers to grow the business. More than $300 million in rail infrastructure 
projects  will  be  in  the  United  States.  Among  many  other  projects,  CN  plans  to 
complete the multi-year $100 million upgrade of the Johnston Yard in Memphis. 
• Canadian Pacific plans capital spending of $885 million to $895 million in 2008, 
about  equal  to  what  the  railroad  spent  in  2007.  Funds  will  go  to  freight  cars, 
locomotives, track renewal, and other key areas. 

• CSX plans $5 billion in capital spending from 2008 to 2010. The railroad plans 
to  spend  some  $200  million  each  year  for  the  next  3  years  on  new  locomotives 
and  more  than  $100  million  per  year  on  freight  cars,  mainly  for  coal  and  auto-
motive  traffic.  Infrastructure  projects  include  terminal  expansions  in  Atlanta, 
Buffalo,  Charlotte,  and  Jacksonville,  as  well  as  a  new  intermodal  terminal  in 
northwest Ohio. 

• Kansas City Southern plans capital expenditures of approximately $500 million 
in  2008.  KCS  also  plans  to  spend  about  $65  million  to  buy  30  new  locomotives 
for U.S. operations. 

• Norfolk Southern plans to spend, in 2008, approximately $1.5 billion on capital 
investments (an increase of $148 million, or 11 percent, over 2007). Investments 
in 2008 will include a new locomotives and freight cars; the construction or ex-
pansion  of  facilities  in  Columbus  and  Maple  Heights,  Ohio;  and  major  invest-
ments  in  expansion  projects  related  to  the  Heartland  Corridor  (from  the  East 
Coast to the Midwest) and the Crescent Corridor (which will link the Northeast, 
Mid-Atlantic, and Central Southeast). 

• Union  Pacific  plans  to  invest  a  total  of  $3.1  billion  for  capital  projects  in  2008. 
Major  investment  categories  include  $840  million  to  increase  network  and  ter-
minal  capacity,  especially  on  coal,  ethanol,  and  intermodal  routes  and  in  the 
Houston region. UP also plans to invest $1.6 billion to maintain and strengthen 
track  infrastructure;  $490  million  to  upgrade  the  locomotive  and  freight  car 
fleet, including the acquisition of 175 high-horsepower locomotives and new cov-
ered hoppers; and $170 million to upgrade information technology systems. 

The  massive  investments  railroads  must  make  in  their  systems  reflect  their  ex-
treme  capital  intensity.  Railroads  are  at  or  near  the  top  among  all  U.S.  industries 
in  terms  of  capital  intensity.  In  fact,  from  1997  to  2006  (the  most  recent  year  for 
which data are available), the average U.S. manufacturer spent 3 percent of revenue 
on capital expenditures. The comparable figure for U.S. freight railroads was 17 per-
cent,  or  more  than  five  times  higher.  Likewise,  in  2006,  railroad  net  investment  in 
plant  and  equipment  per  employee  was  $662,000—nearly  eight  times  the  average 
for all U.S. manufacturing ($84,000). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

36 

As a further illustration of the magnitude of rail infrastructure spending, the four 
largest Class I railroads spend far more on capital outlays and maintenance of track 
and  roadway  than  the  vast  majority  of  state  highway  agencies  spend  on  their  re-
spective highway networks. For example, only the highway agencies of Texas, Flor-
ida, and California spend more on roadway capital and maintenance than Union Pa-
cific and BNSF each spend on their networks. CSX and Norfolk Southern are in the 
top ten compared with all states. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

0
1
B
M
A
H
0
1
6

s
p
e
.
9
B
M
A
H
0
1
6

37 

Hiring New Employees 

In  addition  to  equipment  and  infrastructure,  personnel  are  a  key  determinant  of 
rail capacity, and railroads have been aggressively hiring and training new employ-
ees. Class I railroads had 11,000 more employees in December 2007 than in Decem-
ber 2003, when the industry began to reverse a decades-long trend of fewer employ-
ees. The number of ‘‘train and engine’’ employees—mainly engineers and conductors 
who  operate  trains—was  up  11  percent  during  this  period,  the  number  of  mainte-
nance of track and structures employees was up 5 percent, and the number of main-
tenance of equipment employees was up 7 percent. 

Infusion of Technology 

Technology has always played a key role in expanding rail capacity. Signaling sys-
tems have become more sophisticated; trains have become longer and heavier; loco-
motives  have  become  more  powerful  and  more  reliable;  and  track  structures  have 
become  more  robust  and  thus  less  prone  to  outages  for  maintenance  or  because  of 
failure. 

Freight  railroads  have  always  been  at  the  forefront  in  the  use  of  computers  and 
information technology, and today railroads are rapidly expanding their use of these 
technologies to improve overall efficiency and the fluidity of their operations, there-
by adding capacity without adding more infrastructure. 

For  example,  railroads  use  advanced  computer  modeling  software  in  a  wide  vari-
ety of rail applications, from automating rail grinding schedules and improving cus-
tomer demand forecasting to optimizing yard operations. CN, for example, is imple-
menting  what  it  calls  ‘‘SmartYard,’’  complex  computer  software  that  identifies  and 
analyzes every possible combination and outcome for sequencing cars in a large clas-
sification  yard  and  simultaneously  updates  and  communicates  the  car  processing 
plan.  The  result  is  more  efficient,  faster  yard  operations.  Other  railroads  are  en-
gaged in similar efforts. 

Recognizing  that  another  way  to  add  capacity  is  to  move  more  trains  faster  over 
the  same  length  of  track,  railroads  are  also  working  with  their  suppliers  to  design, 
implement,  and  improve  innovative  computerized  ‘‘trip  planning’’  systems.  These 
highly-complex systems automatically incorporate and analyze a mix of ever-chang-
ing  variables  (e.g.,  crew  and  locomotive  availability,  terminal  congestion,  the  dif-
ferent priority status of loads of freight, track conditions, maintenance plans, weath-
er,  etc.)  to  optimize  how  and  when  cars  are  assembled  to  form  trains,  when  those 
trains  depart,  and  how  they  are  sequenced  across  the  railroad  in  conjunction  with 
the other trains that are operating. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.

1
1
B
M
A
H
0
1
6

38 

Trip-planning  systems,  electronically-controlled  pneumatic  (ECP)  brakes,  train 
control  systems,  heavy-axle  load  research,  and  advanced  rail  car  and  track  defect 
detector  systems  are  just  a  few  of  the  many  technological  tools  that  railroads  are 
using  to  improve  equipment  ‘‘cycle  time’’—i.e.,  the  total  time  it  takes  for  a  freight 
car to be loaded, hauled to destination, unloaded, returned to the same or a different 
shipper,  and  loaded  again.  These  tools  also  increase  the  capacity  of  rail  mainlines 
by allowing more precise braking, reducing the number of rail cars required to move 
a  given  amount  of  freight,  and  dramatically  decreasing  train  delays  due  to  equip-
ment or track maintenance problems. 

The benefits of increased efficiency can be seen through the results of rail efforts 
to  ‘‘supersize,’’  automate,  and  increase  the  velocity  of  traffic  flows  where  practical. 
For  example,  railroads  have  offered  trainload  service  to  grain  customers  who  have 
built  high-speed  ‘‘shuttle  loader’’  elevators,  which  dramatically  improve  the  effi-
ciency  of  transporting  grain  by  rail.  At  BNSF,  for  example,  a  typical  grain  car  in 
shuttle  service  hauls  approximately  three  times  as  much  grain  over  the  course  of 
a year as a car in non-shuttle service. 

Expanded over a network, this type of operational efficiency can free up substan-
tial  capacity  for  other  uses.  Union  Pacific,  for  example,  has  estimated  that  a  one 
mile-per-hour increase in system-wide velocity frees approximately 250 locomotives, 
5,000  freight  cars,  and  180  train  and  engine  employees  to  move  additional  traffic. 
Cooperative Alliances and Collaborations 

Railroads  are  also  entering  into  cooperative  alliances  with  each  other  and  with 

their customers to improve capacity utilization, lower costs, and improve service. 

As  just  one  example,  in  October  2007,  Norfolk  Southern  and  Union  Pacific  an-
nounced new westbound intermodal train service that will shorten by a day the trip 
for standard intermodal freight from the southeastern United States to Los Angeles. 
This shift began with the completion of the first phase of improvements on the Me-
ridian Speedway—Norfolk Southern’s and Kansas City Southern’s joint venture cor-
ridor between Meridian, Mississippi, and Shreveport, Louisiana. In establishing this 
route,  the  railroads  shortened  the  trip  length  by  130  miles  compared  to  moving 
freight via the Memphis gateway. 
Challenges to Freight Mobility and Capacity Expansion 

The  preceding  section  details  many  of  the  ways  that  railroads  are  diligently  ad-
dressing  the  capacity  issue.  However,  there  are  a  number  of  serious  impediments 
to meeting the rail capacity challenge which in many cases have prevented, delayed, 
or  significantly  increased  the  expense  of  realizing  the  desired  capacity  improve-
ments. 

The  National  Surface  Transportation  Policy  and  Revenue  Study  Commission,  in 
its final report released in January 2008, stated that, ‘‘Simply put, the Commission 
believes that it takes too long and costs too much to deliver transportation projects, 
and that waste due to delay in the form of administrative and planning costs, infla-
tion, and lost opportunities for alternative use of the capital hinder us from achiev-
ing  the  very  goals  our  communities  set.’’ 5 The  Commission’s  point  often  applies  to 
rail  infrastructure  expansion  projects,  including  projects  that  involve  little  or  no 
public financial participation. 

Under  existing  law,  a  comprehensive  regulatory  regime  preempts  state  and  local 
regulations  (with  the  exception  of  local  health  and  safety  regulations)  that  unrea-
sonably  interfere  with  railroad  operations.  Moreover,  detailed  environmental  re-
views,  when  required,  identify  the  impacts  of  railroad  infrastructure  projects  and 
determine necessary mitigation measures. 

Nevertheless,  often  some  members  of  the  affected  local  communities  still  oppose 
many  rail  expansion  projects,  and  their  opposition  tends  to  be  quite  vocal  and  so-
phisticated.  Trains  do  make  noise,  rail  operations  may  at  times  be  disruptive  to 
those  who  live  or  work  nearby,  and  the  regional  or  national  benefits  of  rail  freight 
service  are  often  not  readily  apparent  to,  or  deemed  important  by,  the  local  popu-
lation. Even those who recognize the benefits of rail freight service may prefer that 
railroads run their trains near somebody else’s building or through some other town. 
In many cases, railroads face a classic ‘‘not-in-my-backyard’’ problem. 

In  the  face  of  local  opposition,  railroads  try  to  work  with  the  local  community  to 
find  a  mutually  satisfactory  arrangement.  These  efforts  are  usually  successful. 
When  agreement  is  not  reached,  however,  projects  can  face  seemingly  interminable 
delays  and  higher  costs.  For  example,  Norfolk  Southern  had  to  endure  almost  5 
years  of  delay  and  uncertainty  before  it  was  allowed  to  construct  and  begin  oper-

5 Report  of  the  National  Surface  Transportation  Policy  and  Revenue  Study  Commission,  Vol-

ume 1, page 11. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

39 

ating  its  terminal  in  Austell,  Georgia,  needed  to  handle  rapidly-increasing  inter-
modal  traffic  within  the  region.  More  recently,  Union  Pacific  continues  to  suffer 
delays  in  double-tracking  its  Sunset  Corridor  in  Arizona  due  to  issues  with  a  state 
agency. 

Often,  local  communities  allege  violations  of  environmental  requirements  to  chal-
lenge  the  proposed  project.  Railroads  understand  the  goals  of  environmental  laws, 
and appreciate the need to be responsive to community concerns, but community op-
position  to  rail  operations  can  serve  as  a  significant  obstacle  to  railroad  infrastruc-
ture investments, even when the opposition has no legal basis. 

These  types  of  delays  can  have  significant  negative  affects  on  the  costs  of  rail 
projects,  and,  in  turn,  the  ability  of  railroads  to  respond  to  service  requests.  Based 
on railroad cost index data from the AAR, just in the 5-years from the first quarter 
of 2003 through the first quarter of 2008, railroad wage rates rose 15 percent, wage 
supplements  (fringe  benefits,  such  as  health  insurance  for  employees)  rose  11  per-
cent,  and  the  cost  of  materials  and  supplies  (which  includes  such  items  as  rail, 
crossties, and ballast) rose 52 percent. 

Railroads  will  continue  to  advocate  that  the  time  required  for  these  review  proc-
esses  be  shortened  without  adversely  affecting  the  quality  of  that  result,  but  until 
that happens, rail expansion projects will often be delayed unnecessarily. 
Today’s Earnings Pay for Tomorrow’s Capacity 

As  described  above,  the  railroads  are  diligently  doing  everything  they  believe  to 
be prudent to maintain and expand their capacity to provide service, including com-
mitting record levels of investment. 

However,  it  is  important  to  note  that  because  U.S.  freight  railroads  are  over-
whelmingly privately owned and must finance the vast majority of their infrastruc-
ture  spending  themselves,  capacity  investments  are  accompanied  by  substantial  fi-
nancial risk. As the Government Accountability Office noted in a recent report, ‘‘Rail 
investment  involves  private  companies  taking  a  substantial  risk  which  becomes  a 
fixed cost on their balance sheets, one on which they are accountable to stockholders 
and  for  which  they  must  make  capital  charges  year  in  and  year  out  for  the  life  of 
the investment.’’ 6 Accordingly, railroad capacity investments must pass appropriate 
internal railroad investment hurdles—i.e., the investments will be made only if they 
are expected to generate an adequate return. 

For this reason, adequate rail earnings are critical for capacity investment. As the 
Congressional  Budget  Office  (CBO)  has  noted,  ‘‘As  demand  increases,  the  railroads’ 
ability  to  generate  profits  from  which  to  finance  new  investments  will  be  critical. 
Profits  are  key  to  increasing  capacity  because  they  provide  both  the  incentives  and 
the  means  to  make  new  investments.’’ 7 If  a  railroad  is  not  financially  sustainable 
over  the  long  term,  it  will  not  be  able  to  make  capacity  investments  to  maintain 
its  existing  network  in  a  condition  to  meet  reasonable  transportation  demand,  or 
make  additional  investments  in  the  replacement  or  expansion  of  infrastructure  re-
quired by growing demand. 

To  be  sure,  railroads  in  recent  years  have  achieved  financial  results  that  are 
much better than their results since the 1970s. In 2006, U.S. railroads carried more 
freight  than  ever  before,  and  their  net  income  was  higher  than  ever  before  as  well. 
The railroads enjoyed relatively good financial results in 2007 as well. 

But these financial results need to be kept in context. Statements about railroads’ 
‘‘record  profits’’  often  ignore  the  fact  that  rail  profitability  in  earlier  years  was  rel-
atively  poor.  Thus,  an  improvement  from  earlier  years  may  be  a  ‘‘record,’’  yet  still 
fall  short  of  the  earnings  achieved  by  most  of  the  other  industries  against  which 
railroads  compete  for  capital.  In  fact,  that  is  the  case  with  the  rail  industry.  Rail 
industry profitability has consistently lagged most other industries—and that is still 
the case today. 

Return  on  equity  (ROE)  is  a  common  profitability  measure.  According  to  data 
compiled by Value Line (a financial information firm), the ROE for the U.S. freight 
rail  industry  in  2006  was  14.0  percent—possibly  the  best  ROE  it  has  ever  had. 
(Value  Line’s  railroad  universe  includes  BNSF,  CSX,  CN,  CP,  KCS,  NS,  UP,  and 
Genesee  &  Wyoming.)  By  contrast,  the  median  ROE  in  2006  for  the  89  industries 
(encompassing  around  1,700  firms)  for  which  Value  Line  calculates  ROE  was  16.2 
percent—16  percent  higher  than  the  rail  figure.  In  fact,  in  2006  railroads  ranked 
tied  for  57th  among  the  89  industries  for  which  Value  Line  calculates  ROE.  Value 

6 Government  Accountability  Office,  Freight  Railroads:  Industry  Health  Has  Improved,  but 

Concerns About Competition and Capacity Should Be Addressed, October 2006, p. 56. 

7 Congressional  Budget  Office,  Freight  Rail  Transportation:  Long-Term  Issues,  January  2006, 

p. 11. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

Line  data  for  2007  indicate  that  the  railroad  median  (14.0  percent)  again  fell  well 
short of the median for all industries (15.8 percent). 

40 

In  other  words,  while  recent  years  may  have  been  the  best  financial  years  ever 
for  railroads,  they  have  not  been  sufficient  to  bring  railroads  even  to  the  mid-point 
among  all  industries,  and  the  need  for  financial  sustainability  is  as  pronounced 
today  as  ever  before—especially  in  view  of  the  projected  investment  requirements 
the industry will be facing. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

3
1
B
M
A
H
0
1
6

s
p
e
.

2
1
B
M
A
H
0
1
6

41 

According  to  the  Cambridge  Systematics  study  noted  earlier,  an  investment  of 
$148  billion  in  2007  dollars  (of  which  $135  billion  is  for  Class  I  railroads)  will  be 
necessary for rail infrastructure expansion to keep pace with economic growth, meet 
the  DOT’s  forecast  demand,  and  maintain  (but  not  grow)  rail’s  current  market 
share.  That  expenditure  is  in  addition  to  the  hundreds  of  billions  of  dollars  nec-
essary  over  this  period  to  maintain  and  replace  existing  rail  infrastructure,  and  to 
maintain and replace locomotives, freight cars, and other equipment. 

Class  I  railroads  are  anticipated  to  be  able  to  generate  (through  earnings  growth 
from the additional traffic and productivity gains) only $96 billion of the $135 billion 
needed for new capacity identified by the Cambridge Systematics study. That leaves 
a funding shortfall that could be covered by tax incentives for rail infrastructure in-
vestments, public-private partnerships, or other means. 

Railroads will continue to spend significant amounts of their own funds to address 
the capacity challenges described above. However, they are, and will continue to be, 
unable  to  pay  for  all  of  the  capacity  that  would  be  required  to  serve  all  shippers’ 
needs  all  of  the  time.  Since  the  amount  of  rail  capital  available  for  investment  is 
limited,  investment  decisions  in  these  circumstances  focus  on  which  investments  to 
choose  between,  rather  than  solely  whether  a  specific  investment  should  be  made. 
In such cases, those investment decisions should be based on projected returns that 
will most favor the long-term sustainability of the rail network. 
Public Involvement in Freight Rail Infrastructure Investment 

Freight  railroads  will  continue  to  spend  massive  amounts  to  improve  and  main-
tain  their  systems.  But  even  with  their  improved  financial  performance,  funding 
constraints will likely prevent railroads from meeting optimal future rail infrastruc-
ture  investment  needs  entirely  on  their  own.  This  funding  shortfall  means  that 
many rail projects that would otherwise expand capacity and improve the ability of 
our  Nation’s  farms,  mines,  and  factories  to  move  their  goods  to  market;  speed  the 
flow of international trade; relieve highway congestion; reduce pollution; lower high-
way costs; save fuel; and enhance safety will be delayed—or never made at all. 

I respectfully suggest that it is in our Nation’s best interest to ensure that optimal 
freight  railroad  capacity  enhancements  are  made.  Policymakers  can  help  address 
the rail capacity funding gap in several ways: 

• Rail  Infrastructure  Tax  Incentives.  S.  1125/H.R.  2116  (the  ‘‘Freight  Rail  Infra-
structure  Capacity  Expansion  Act  of  2007)  calls  for  a  25  percent  tax  credit  for 
investments in new track, intermodal facilities, yards, and other freight rail in-
frastructure projects that expand rail capacity. All businesses that make capac-
ity-enhancing rail investments, not just railroads, would be eligible for the cred-
it. 
The budgetary cost of a rail infrastructure tax credit (ITC) would be about $300 
million  per  year,  but  the  stimulatory  benefit  to  the  economy  would  be  much 
greater. U.S. Department of Commerce data indicate that every dollar of freight 
rail infrastructure investment that would be stimulated by a rail infrastructure 
ITC  would  generate  more  than  $3  in  total  economic  output  because  of  the  in-
vestment, purchases, and employment occurring among upstream suppliers. We 
estimate  that  new  rail  investment  induced  by  a  rail  ITC  would  generate  ap-
proximately 20,000 new jobs nationwide. 
The AAR gratefully acknowledges the support many members of this committee 
have  shown  toward  S.  1125,  and  congratulates  them  on  recognizing  that  a  rail 
ITC addresses the central challenge of how to move more freight without caus-
ing more highway gridlock or environmental degradation. 
• Short  Line  Tax  Credit.  Since  1980,  more  than  380  new  short  lines  have  been 
created,  preserving  thousands  of  miles  of  track  (much  of  it  in  rural  areas)  that 
may  otherwise  have  been  abandoned.  In  2004,  Congress  enacted  a  50  percent 
tax credit (‘‘Section 45G’’) for investments in short line track rehabilitation. The 
focus  was  on  assisting  short  lines  in  handling  the  larger  and  heavier  freight 
cars that are needed to provide their customers with the best possible rates and 
service. 
Since the enactment of Section 45G, hundreds of short line railroads rapidly in-
creased the volume and rate of track rehabilitation and improvement programs. 
For  example,  the  replacement  of  railroad  ties,  a  key  component  of  handling 
heavier cars, has increased by half a million ties per year in both 2005 and 2006 
as  a  result  of  the  credit.  Unfortunately,  Section  45G  expired  in  2007.  Pending 
legislation  in  Congress  (S.  881/H.R.  1584,  the  ‘‘Short  Line  Railroad  Investment 
Act  of  2007’’)  would  extend  the  tax  credit  and  thus  preserve  the  huge  benefits 
it delivers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

42 

• Public-Private  Partnerships.  Public-private  partnerships  (PPPs)  reflect  the  fact 
that  cooperation  is  more  likely  to  result  in  timely,  meaningful  solutions  to 
transportation  problems  than  a  go-it-alone  approach.  Without  a  partnership, 
projects  that  promise  substantial  public  benefits  in  addition  to  private  benefits 
are  likely  to  be  delayed  or  never  started  at  all  because  it  would  be  too  difficult 
for  either  side  to  justify  the  full  investment  needed  to  complete  them.  In  con-
trast,  if  a  public  entity  shows  it  is  willing  to  devote  public  dollars  to  a  project 
based upon the public benefits that will accrue, the private entity is much more 
likely  to  provide  the  private  dollars  (commensurate  with  private  gains)  nec-
essary for the project to proceed. 
Partnerships  are  not  ‘‘subsidies’’  to  railroads.  Rather,  they  acknowledge  that 
private  entities  should  pay  for  private  benefits  and  public  entities  should  pay 
for  public  benefits.  In  many  cases,  PPPs  only  involve  the  public  contributing  a 
portion  of  the  initial  invest-ment  required  to  make  an  expansion  project  fea-
sible—with  the  railroad  responsible  for  funding  all  future  maintenance  to  keep 
the infrastructure productive and in good repair. 
Perhaps  the  most  extensive  rail-related  public-private  partnership  envisioned 
today  is  the  Chicago  Region  Environmental  and  Transportation  Efficiency  Pro-
gram  (CREATE),  a  $1.5  billion  project  involving  the  State  of  Illinois,  the  City 
of Chicago, and major freight and passenger railroads serving the region. CRE-
ATE’s  goal  is  to  modernize  and  improve  transportation  in  the  region  by  sepa-
rating  tracks  and  highways  to  speed  vehicle  travel  and  reduce  congestion  and 
delays  for  motorists;  updating  track  connections  and  expanding  rail  routes  to 
reduce  transit  times;  and  adding  separate,  passenger-only  tracks  in  key  loca-
tions to remove bottlenecks that have slowed passenger and freight movements 
in  the  region  for  decades.  The  $330  million  first  stage  of  CREATE  recently  got 
underway. 
• Say  No  to  Reregulation.  Prior  to  1980,  decades  of  government  over-regulation 
had  brought  U.S.  freight  railroads  to  their  knees.  Bankruptcies  were  common, 
rates  were  rising,  safety  was  deteriorating,  and  rail  infrastructure  and  equip-
ment  were  in  increasingly  poor  condition  because  meager  rail  profits  were  too 
low  to  pay  for  needed  upkeep  and  replacement.  Recognizing  the  need  for 
change, Congress passed the Staggers Rail Act of 1980, which partially deregu-
lated the rail industry. 
The record since Staggers shows that deregulation works. Since 1981, rail traf-
fic  is  up  95  percent,  rail  productivity  is  up  163  percent,  and  average  inflation- 
adjusted  rail  rates  are  down  54  percent.  And  rail  safety  is  vastly  improved— 
the  train  accident  and  employee  injury  rates  have  plunged  since  Staggers.  Our 
privately-owned,  largely  deregulated  freight  railroads  competing  fairly  in  the 
transportation  marketplace  have  produced  the  best  freight  rail  system  in  the 
world. It is the best for shippers in price and service; best for employees in com-
pensation  and  safety;  and  best  for  the  public  in  reduced  pollution  and  highway 
gridlock. 
Despite  the  severe  harm  excessive  rail  regulation  caused  prior  to  Staggers  and 
the  enormous  benefits  that  have  accrued  since  then,  legislation  has  been  pro-
posed—most recently, S. 953/H.R. 2125 (the so-called ‘‘Railroad Competition and 
Service  Improvement  Act  of  2007’’)  in  the  110th  Congress—that  would  reregu-
late railroads. 
Reregulation  is  bad  public  policy  and  should  be  rejected.  It  would  prevent  rail-
roads  from  earning  enough  to  make  the  massive  investments  a  first-class  rail 
system  requires.  Under  reregulation,  rail  earnings,  and  therefore  rail  spending 
on  infrastructure  and  equipment,  would  plummet;  the  industry’s  existing  phys-
ical plant would deteriorate; needed new capacity would not be added; and rail 
service would become slower, less responsive, and less reliable. 
By perpetuating the myth that service to a shipper by a single railroad is equiv-
alent  to  unconstrained  market  power,  proponents  of  reregulation  ignore  the  re-
ality  that  railroads  face  extensive  competition  for  the  vast  majority  of  their 
business—including  when  a  customer  is  served  by  only  one  railroad.  Railroads 
do  not  oppose  competition.  The  truth  is,  there  is  plenty  of  it  out  there  already, 
either  between  two  or  more  railroads,  from  trucks  and  barges,  or  from  other 
competitive forces. And where the marketplace cannot support more than single 
railroad  service,  legal  safeguards  exist  to  protect  against  anti-competitive  rail-
road behavior. 
The current system of rail regulation works. It allows shippers to pay the lowest 
possible rates consistent with a privately-owned rail system. It makes no sense 
to destroy the best freight rail system the world has ever seen in order to move 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

43 

toward  a  discredited  system  that  failed  in  the  past  and  would  fail  again  in  the 
future. 

Public investment in freight rail infrastructure projects is justified because the ex-
tensive  benefits  that  would  accrue  to  the  general  public  by  increasing  the  use  of 
freight rail would far exceed the costs of public participation. For example: 

• Fuel  efficiency—Railroads  are  three  or  more  times  more  fuel  efficient  than 
trucks.  In  2007,  railroads  moved  a  ton  of  freight  an  average  of  436  miles  per 
gallon of fuel. If just 10 percent of the long distance freight that moves by high-
way  moved  by  rail  instead,  fuel  savings  would  exceed  one  billion  gallons  per 
year. 

• Greenhouse Gas Emissions—Greater use of freight rail offers a simple, inexpen-
sive,  and  immediate  way  to  meaningfully  reduce  greenhouse  gas  emissions 
without  harming  the  economy.  Because  of  railroads’  fuel  efficiency,  every  ton- 
mile  of  freight  that  moves  by  rail  instead  of  trucks  reduces  greenhouse  gas 
emissions by two-thirds or more. 
• Highway  congestion—Highway  gridlock  already  costs  the  U.S.  economy  more 
than  $78  billion  per  year  just  in  wasted  fuel  and  time,  according  to  a  study  by 
the Texas Transportation Institute. But because a typical train takes the freight 
of  several  hundred  trucks  off  our  highways,  freight  railroads  reduce  highway 
gridlock,  the  costs  of  maintaining  existing  highways,  and  the  pressure  to  build 
costly new highways. 
• Pollution—The EPA estimates that for every ton-mile of freight carried, a train 
typically emits substantially less nitrogen oxides and particulates than a truck. 
• Safety—Fatality  rates  associated  with  intercity  trucking  are  eight  times  those 
associated  with  freight  rail  transportation.  Railroads  also  have  lower  employee 
injury rates. 

The  American  Association  of  State  Highway  and  Transportation  Officials 
(AASHTO)  has  noted  that  ‘‘Relatively  small  public  investments  in  the  Nation’s 
freight railroads can be leveraged into relatively large benefits for the Nation’s high-
way infrastructure, highway users, and freight shippers.’’ 8 The Congressional Budg-
et  Office  (CBO)  has  also  concluded  that  public  investment  in  rail  infrastructure 
should  be  considered:  ‘‘Another  way  of  addressing  the  underpayment  of  infrastruc-
ture  costs  by  railroads’  competitors  is  to  provide  financial  assistance  to  the  rail-
roads.’’ Echoing AASHTO, CBO observed that, ‘‘[p]roviding Federal aid for a rail in-
vestment  might  be  economically  justified  if  the  net  social  benefits  were  large  but 
the  net  private  benefits  to  railroads  were  insufficient  to  induce  them  to  make  such 
an investment.9 
Passenger Railroads and Freight Railroad Capacity 

Our  Nation’s  privately-owned  freight  railroads  are  successful  partners  with  pas-
senger  railroads  all  across  the  country.  Around  97  percent  of  the  22,000  miles  over 
which  Amtrak  operates  are  owned  by  freight  railroads,  and  hundreds  of  millions  of 
commuter trips each year occur on commuter rail systems that operate at least par-
tially over tracks or right-of-way owned by freight railroads. 

Freight  railroads  recognize  the  potential  national  benefits  of  a  strong  national 
passenger  rail  system.  The  key  question  is:  under  what  circumstances  can  freight 
and passenger interests advance this worthy goal? 

As  noted  earlier,  because  of  substantial  and  sustained  traffic  increases,  U.S. 
freight  railroads  are  moving  more  freight  than  ever  before,  and  demand  for  freight 
rail  service  is  projected  to  grow  sharply  in  the  years  ahead.  Passenger  rail  growth 
would  come  on  top  of  growth  in  freight  traffic.  That’s  why,  going  forward,  capacity 
will likely be the single most important factor determining our ability to provide the 
high quality rail service that will be essential for both freight and passengers. 

While  recognizing  existing  Amtrak  statutory  authority  regarding  use  of  freight 
railroad-owned facilities, the AAR has developed principles which we believe should 
govern new passenger rail use of freight-owned facilities: 

• Freight railroads should not be forced to give passenger railroads access to their 
• Freight railroads should be fully compensated for the use of their assets by pas-

property; rather, access should be voluntarily negotiated. 

senger trains. 

8 AASHTO, Freight Rail Bottom Line Report, p. 1. 
9 Congressional Budget Office, Freight Rail Transportation: Long-Term Issues (January 2006), 

p. 22. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

44 

• Freight railroads should be adequately protected from liability. 
• Freight  railroads  should  not  be  asked  to  pay  for  capacity  increases  needed  to 

accommodate passenger service. 

These  principles  are  grounded  in  the  tremendous  importance  of  freight  railroads 
to America’s producers and consumers. Freight railroads lower shipping costs by bil-
lions  of  dollars  each  year  and  produce  an  immense  competitive  advantage  for  our 
farmers,  manufacturers,  and  miners  in  the  global  marketplace.  If  passenger  rail-
roads  impair  freight  railroads  and  force  freight  that  otherwise  would  move  by  rail 
onto the highway, those advantages would be squandered. Moreover, highway grid-
lock would worsen; fuel consumption, pollution, and greenhouse gas emissions would 
rise;  and  our  mobility  would  deteriorate—outcomes  that  are  completely  contrary  to 
the goals of expanding passenger rail in the first place. 

As  part  of  its  work,  the  National  Surface  Transportation  Policy  and  Revenue 
Study  Commission  received  a  report  from  the  Passenger  Rail  Working  Group 
(PRWG),  which  provided  a  long-term  vision  for  passenger  rail  development  in  this 
country.  The  authors  of  that  report  should  be  commended  for  helping  policymakers 
focus on the important issue of intercity passenger rail. Freight railroads appreciate 
that  the  PRWG  concurs  that  passenger  rail  progress  must  be  complementary  to— 
not in conflict with—freight rail development. 

We  believe  that  future  passenger  rail  initiatives,  especially  on  the  scale  envi-
sioned  by  the  PRWG,  will  increasingly  require  separate  assets  dedicated  to  pas-
senger  operation,  rather  than  the  incremental  initiatives  most  typical  of  past  pas-
senger  rail  expansion.  This  more  visionary  approach  would  enable  faster  and  more 
reliable  passenger  service,  and  would  minimize  the  substantial  operational,  engi-
neering,  legal,  and  other  impediments  that  often  hinder  the  ability  of  freight  rail-
roads to accommodate passenger trains. 

This approach will be costly, but so will any approach to meaningfully enhancing 
passenger  rail.  Policymakers  must  understand  that  no  passenger  system  in  the 
world pays for its operating and capital expenses solely from the fare box. But there 
are substantial public benefits from high-speed intercity passenger rail. Freight rail-
roads  believe  that  the  public  benefits  of  a  truly  attractive  and  competitive  national 
passenger rail capability will exceed public costs, and look forward to working with 
all appropriate parties to make those benefits a reality. 
Conclusion 

America today has the best freight rail network in the world. Still, it is clear that 
rail  capacity  will  have  to  increase  as  the  economy  and  population  expand  in  the 
years ahead. Railroads are working hard to ensure that adequate capacity exists to 
meet our future freight transportation needs. Meanwhile, policymakers can help by 
instituting  targeted  tax  incentives  for  projects  that  expand  rail  capacity,  engaging 
in  more  public-private  partnerships  for  freight  rail  infrastructure  projects,  and  en-
suring  that  the  legislative  and  regulatory  structure  under  which  railroads  operate 
is conducive to further investment in rail capacity. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much. 
Mr. Larrabee? 

STATEMENT  OF  REAR  ADMIRAL  RICHARD  M.  LARRABEE, 
(RET.),  U.S.  COAST  GUARD;  DIRECTOR  OF  COMMERCE,  PORT 
AUTHORITY OF NEW YORK AND NEW JERSEY 
Mr.  LARRABEE.  Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking  Member  Smith, 
distinguished Members of the Committee: Thank you for the invita-
tion  to  testify  today.  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  provide  some 
insight  into  improving  the  efficiency  of  future  freight  movement. 
My  name  is  Richard  M.  Larrabee.  I’m  the  Director  of  Port  Com-
merce for the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey. In this 
capacity  I’m  responsible,  along  with  other  private  and  public  part-
ners, for the promotion, protection, and development of the Port of 
New  York  and  New  Jersey,  which  includes  facilities  in  both  New 
York and New Jersey. 

The  Port  Authority  is  a  bi-state  agency  which  oversees  not  just 
seaports,  but  also  other  transportation  facilities,  such  as  airports, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

45 

bridges,  and  tunnels,  and  rapid  transit  commuter  systems.  From 
this unique perspective, we have the benefit of a macro view of how 
different modes of transportation interrelate and work to strength-
en the region while moving people and goods safely and efficiently. 
We  also  recognize  the  importance  of  increasing  costs  of  modern-
izing  and  rebuilding  infrastructure  to  ensure  continued  economic 
expansion. 

With  a  4  percent  growth  last  year,  the  Port  of  New  York  and 
New  Jersey  outperformed  many  of  the  major  ports  throughout  the 
country. We believe our continued growth is due in part to our loca-
tion as a gateway to the largest, most affluent consumer market in 
North  America.  But  location  and  marine  terminals  capacity  alone 
will  not  be  able  to  sustain  the  movement  of  over  5  million  TEUs 
a year. 

We  link  increased  cargo  movement  through  our  port  facilities  to 
our  strategic  investments  in  port  infrastructure,  investments  in 
dredging, rail, road, and in some cases in our terminals themselves. 
Since September 11, 2001, when formulating the Port Authority’s 
budget  our  focus  first  and  foremost  has  been  on  security.  Second 
is maintaining a state of good repair for our facilities. Once funding 
for these two items is allocated, only a small fraction of the budget 
remains  for  capital  investments  and  new  initiatives.  We  prioritize 
these projects, focusing on alleviating choke points along the supply 
chain. 

With  this  in  mind,  we  have  embarked  on  a  10-year  $2  billion 
capital plan to continue to ensure that our facilities in the port are 
able  to  handle  the  forecasted  annual  growth  of  5  to  7  percent  over 
the next 10-year period. 

Sustainability,  ensuring  that  we  are  good  stewards  of  the  land, 
is  also  a  driving  factor.  One  of  the  agency’s  goals  is  to  continue  to 
move  more  freight  from  the  roads  to  rail.  Although  approximately 
80 percent of the containerized cargo entering our port stays within 
the  region,  a  significant  and  growing  portion  heads  to  points  west 
and north. About 13 percent of the port’s cargo moves by rail today, 
but  we  are  investing  nearly  $600  million  in  our  on-dock  rail  infra-
structure  to  increase  that  proportion  to  about  20  percent  over  the 
next decade. 

However, much of our investment is in jeopardy if other funding 
sources,  public  or  private,  are  not  identified  to  expand  the  freight 
rail system nationally. According to AASHTO, without sufficient in-
vestment  by  2020  only  half  of  the  forecasted  growth  in  freight  rail 
tonnage  can  be  accommodated  by  the  current  freight  rail  system. 
Enhancing  our  Nation’s  freight  system  should  and  must  be  in  the 
forefront  of  any  discussion  of  transportation.  It’s  imperative  that 
port authorities and logistics companies have a partner in the Fed-
eral Government for this effort, as a local or regional approach will 
not completely suffice. 

To  assist  in  the  process  of  organizing  trade  and  cargo  flows,  the 
Federal  Government  could  map  the  international  transportation 
system  from  a  national  perspective  and  propose  national  corridors 
to  accommodate  the  anticipated  freight  flows.  Regional  projects 
could  be  measured  for  their  national  significance,  how  they  would 
work within that system as a whole. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

46 

Such  an  example  can  be  seen  in  the  Federal  Principles  and 
Guidelines  for  Water  and  Related  Land  Resource  Implementation 
Studies, which describe the analytical and policy framework for de-
termining the appropriate participation of the Federal Government 
in  dredging  projects.  At  least  on  a  conceptual  level,  we  believe  a 
similar  approach  could  work  looking  at  regional  projects  for  na-
tional benefit. 

New  national  investments  in  freight  capacity  will  need  innova-
tive  Federal  financing  systems.  A  piecemeal  approach  is  not  and 
will not meet the needs of our Nation’s crumbling and stressed in-
frastructure.  Just  as  airports  and  highways  have  a  reliable  source 
of  funding,  so  must  freight  infrastructure.  The  Highway  Trust 
Fund  and  Passenger  Facility  Charge  at  airports  have  provided  a 
reliable  funding  source  for  systems  investments  in  our  Nation’s 
roads  and  airports.  Seaports  and  intermodal  connections  should 
have  a  comparable  funding  mechanism  to  provide  needed  system-
atic investment. 

Our freight transportation system is the blood circulation system 

of our Nation’s economy. We don’t want congested arteries. 

It’s  going  to  take  time  and  a  great  deal  of  funding  to  maintain 
and  enhance  the  freight  movement  system  in  the  Nation.  While 
we’re  working  on  this,  the  international  trade  and  demand  for 
freight transportation will continue to grow. The world is not wait-
ing  for  us.  If  our  system  can’t  keep  up,  the  Nation’s  economy  will 
become  less  competitive  and  we’ll  suffer.  I  respectfully  urge  this 
committee  to  formulate  and  recommend  a  workable  approach  be-
fore  we  are  truly  overwhelmed  with  congestion  and  the  loss  of 
freight mobility that is so vital to our national economy. 

Thank you again for the opportunity to testify this afternoon. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Larrabee follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REAR ADMIRAL RICHARD M. LARRABEE, (RET.), U.S. COAST 
GUARD, DIRECTOR OF COMMERCE, PORT AUTHORITY OF NEW YORK AND NEW JERSEY 
Good  afternoon.  Honorable  Chairman  Lautenberg  and  Ranking  Member  Smith 
and distinguished Members of the Committee, thank you for the invitation to testify 
before  you  today.  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  provide  some  insight  into  improv-
ing the efficiency of future freight movement. 

My  name  is  Richard  M.  Larrabee,  and  I  am  the  Director  of  Port  Commerce  for 
the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey (the Port Authority). In this capac-
ity,  I  am  responsible,  along  with  other  private  and  public  partners,  for  the  pro-
motion, protection, and development of the Port of New York and New Jersey, which 
includes  facilities  in  Bayonne,  Elizabeth,  Jersey  City,  and  Newark,  New  Jersey,  as 
well as in Staten Island, and Brooklyn, New York. 

The  Port  Authority  is  a  bi-state  agency  that  oversees  not  just  seaports,  but  also 
other  transportation  facilities  such  as  airports,  bridges  and  tunnels,  and  a  rapid 
transit  commuter  system.  From  this  unique  perspective,  we  have  the  benefit  of  a 
macro  view  of  how  different  modes  of  transportation  interrelate  and  work  to 
strengthen the region while moving people and goods safely and efficiently. We also 
have  direct  expertise  of  the  importance—and  increasing  cost—of  modernizing  and 
rebuilding infrastructure to ensure continued economic expansion. 

With 4 percent cargo growth in 2007, the Port of New York and New Jersey out-
performed  many  major  ports  throughout  the  country,  which  declined  or  grew  less 
than  1  percent  in  the  same  period.  We  believe  our  continued  growth  is  due  in  part 
to  our  location  as  a  gateway  to  the  largest  and  most  affluent  consumer  market  in 
North America, with nearly 100 million consumers within a single day’s travel. But, 
location and marine terminals with capacity alone would not be able to sustain the 
movement of 5,097,496 TEUs. 

We link increased cargo movements through our port facilities to our strategic in-
vestments  in  port  infrastructure,  which  have  increased  our  port’s  ability  to  handle 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

47 

future capacity—investments in dredging, rail, road, and in some cases in the termi-
nals themselves. Since September 11, when formulating the Port Authority’s budget, 
our  focus,  first  and  foremost,  is  on  security.  Second  is  maintaining  a  state  of  good 
repair  for  our  facilities.  Once  funding  for  these  two  items  is  allocated,  only  a  small 
fraction  of  the  budget  remains  for  capital  investments  and  new  initiatives.  We 
prioritize those projects, focusing on alleviating chokepoints along the supply chain. 
With  this  in  mind,  we  have  just  embarked  on  a  10  year  $2  billion  capital  plan  to 
continue  to  ensure  that  our  facilities  are  able  to  handle  the  forecasted  annual 
growth of 5–7 percent over the next 10 years. 

Sustainability,  ensuring  that  we  are  good  stewards  of  the  land,  is  also  a  driving 
factor.  One  of  the  agency’s  goals  is  to  continue  to  move  more  freight  from  roads  to 
rail. For each container we place on a train, we save 1.7 truck trips, reducing emis-
sions  and  improving  congestion  on  our  local  roads.  Although  approximately  80  per-
cent  of  containerized  cargo  entering  the  port  stays  within  the  region,  a  significant 
and growing portion heads to points west and north. About 13 percent of the port’s 
cargo  moves  by  rail  today,  but  we  are  investing  $600  million  in  on-dock  rail  infra-
structure to increase that proportion to about 20 percent over the next decade. How-
ever,  much  of  our  investment  is  in  jeopardy  if  other  funding  sources,  public  or  pri-
vate, are not identified to expand the freight rail system nationally. 

According to the American Association of State Highway and Transportation Offi-
cials  (AASHTO),  without  sufficient  investment,  by  2020,  only  half  of  the  forecasted 
growth in freight rail tonnage can be accommodated by the current freight rail sys-
tem. The balance would likely shift to trucks and the highway system.1 This would 
have a detrimental effect on our environment, and increase congestion on roads that 
are shared with local residents. 

We  recognize  that  our  port  facilities—and  the  Port  Authority’s  bridges  and  tun-
nels—are  just  one  link  in  the  global  supply  chain.  The  Port  Authority  can  partner 
with others, but has no authority to invest infrastructure assets beyond its Port Dis-
trict—a  25-mile  zone  circumscribed  around  the  Statue  of  Liberty.  We  are  working 
with our tenants and local partners in state and local government to make strategic 
investments outside of the gates of our ports—for roads and rail and warehousing— 
but  our  efforts  alone  will  not  ensure  the  continued  efficiency  of  national  freight 
movement. 

Enhancing our Nation’s freight system should and must be at the forefront of any 
discussion of transportation. It is imperative that port authorities and logistics com-
panies  have  a  partner  in  the  Federal  Government  for  this  effort,  as  a  local  or  re-
gional approach will not suffice. 

Working together, as partners, we can develop a consistent policy that the indus-

try can rely on for funding and prioritizing projects. 

The  Federal  Government  is  providing  policy  and  governance  leadership  to  meet 
our  Nation’s  security  needs;  similar  policy  leadership  is  desirable  in  meeting  our 
country’s  growing  transportation  needs.  The  Safe,  Accountable,  Flexible  and  Effi-
cient  Transportation  Equity  Act—A  Legacy  for  Users  (SAFETEA–LU)  took  a  step 
in this direction with the creation of the National Surface Transportation Policy and 
Revenue Study Commission. 

To  assist  in  the  process  of  organizing  trade  and  cargo  flows,  the  Federal  Govern-
ment could map the international freight transportation system from a national per-
spective  and  propose  national  corridors  to  accommodate  the  anticipated  freight 
flows. 

Regional  projects  could  be  measured  for  their  national  significance—how  they 
work with the system as a whole. Such an example can be seen in the current Fed-
eral  approach  to  deepening  the  channels  of  the  Nation’s  navigable  waters.  The  im-
portance  of  ports,  channels  and  inland  waterways  has  been  well  established  as  a 
major means of commercial transportation and as part of national defense. Congress 
uses a disciplined approach to funding the maintenance and improvement of the Na-
tion’s navigation system. Individual navigation channel improvements must be dem-
onstrated to be in the Federal interest before becoming eligible for Federal funding. 
The Federal Principles and Guidelines for Water and Related Land Resources Imple-
mentation Studies, which were approved in 1983, describes the analytical and policy 
framework for determining the appropriate participation of the Federal Government 
in  dredging  projects.  ‘‘Local  sponsors’’,  such  as  port  authorities,  propose  channel- 
deepening projects and the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers determines the costs and 
expected benefits of proposed projects as part of its determination of the Federal in-
terest.  In  the  past,  the  benefits  have  been  almost  exclusively  determined  by  esti-
mating  the  transportation  cost  savings  that  would  result  to  the  Nation’s  economy 
with the proposed improvement. Projects with a positive cost-benefit analysis are el-

1 AASHTO—Freight-Rail Bottom Line Report, 2003. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

48 

igible for consideration for Federal funding, but such projects must subsequently be 
authorized,  and  funded,  by  Congress.  Additionally,  total  project  costs  are  typically 
shared  between  the  local  sponsor  and  Federal  Government.  At  least  on  the  concep-
tual  level,  we  believe  a  similar  approach  could  be  developed  as  an  equitable  frame-
work  for  determining  whether  Federal  funding  should  be  applied  to  rail  and  other 
projects that could have a significant benefit to the Nation. 

New national investments in freight capacity will need innovative Federal financ-
ing  systems.  A  piecemeal  approach  has  not  and  will  not  meet  the  needs  of  our  Na-
tion’s  crumbling  and  stressed  infrastructure.  Just  as  airports  and  highways  have  a 
reliable source of funding, so must freight infrastructure. The Highway Trust Fund 
and  Passenger  Facility  Charge  (PFC)  at  airports  have  provided  a  reliable  funding 
source  for  system  investments  in  our  Nation’s  roads  and  at  airports.  Seaports  and 
their  intermodal  connections  should  have  a  comparable  funding  mechanism  to  pro-
vide  needed  systematic  investments.  The  public  benefits  of  these  investments  re-
quire some form of acknowledgement and compensations. The freight transportation 
system  is  the  blood  circulation  system  of  our  Nation’s  economy;  we  don’t  want  con-
gested arteries. 

It  is  going  to  take  time—and  a  great  deal  of  funding—to  maintain  and  enhance 
the  freight  movement  system  in  the  Nation.  While  we  are  working  on  this,  inter-
national  trade  and  demand  for  freight  transportation  will  continue  to  grow.  The 
world  is  not  waiting  for  us—if  our  system  can’t  keep  up,  the  Nation’s  economy  will 
become  less  competitive  and  will  suffer.  This  is  a  very  real  problem  that  requires 
a  very  realistic  solution.  I  respectively  urge  this  committee  to  formulate  and  rec-
ommend a workable approach before we are truly overwhelmed with congestion and 
lose the freight mobility that is so vital to the national economy. 

Thank you again for allowing me the opportunity to testify before you today. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much. 
Mr. Vanselow? 

STATEMENT OF GLENN VANSELOW, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

PACIFIC NORTHWEST WATERWAYS ASSOCIATION 

Mr.  VANSELOW.  Mr.  Chairman,  Senator  Smith,  Members  of  the 
Committee:  Thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  testify.  I  am  Glenn 
Vanselow,  Executive  Director  of  the  Pacific  Northwest  Waterways 
Association. PNWA is a nonpartisan, nonprofit. We represent ports, 
towboat  companies,  steamship  operators,  agriculture  and  forest 
products  shippers  in  Washington,  Oregon,  Idaho,  and  northern 
California. 

Our Nation’s economy relies on safe, efficient, and reliable trans-
portation. I will focus on navigation, but please note, efficient water 
transportation  requires  efficient  land-side  transportation.  A  bottle-
neck  in  any  one  link  can  prevent  American  producers  from  con-
necting with their domestic and foreign markets. 

Annually 2.5 billion tons move by water within, to, and from the 
United  States.  $2  trillion  moves  in  international  trade  and  that 
generates $21 billion in customs revenue to the U.S. Treasury each 
year. 

Pacific  Northwest  ports  ship  90  million  tons  of  cargo  worth  $60 
billion. The Columbia River is the Nation’s number one gateway for 
the export of wheat and barley. Seattle and Tacoma form the coun-
try’s third largest gateway for containerized cargo. 

A typical barge can carry 1,500 tons on the Mississippi and 3,500 
tons  on  the  Columbia  and  Snake  Rivers.  That  compares  with  100 
tons by rail car or 29 tons per truck. For the Columbia River, load-
ing  a  typical  grain  ship  with  55,000  tons  of  wheat  for  export  re-
quires four barge tows or 550 rail cars or 1,900 trucks. 

Larger  carrying  capacity  translates  into  energy  efficiencies.  The 
Chairman  has  already  cited  the  U.S.  Maritime  Administration’s 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

49 

Texas  Transportation  Institute  study  comparing  truck,  rail,  and 
barges.  If  I  may  say,  Mr.  Hamberger  and  I  had  a  chance  to  chat 
beforehand. 413 ton-miles per gallon, 436 ton-miles per gallon, why 
quibble? Why quibble? Navigation carries 576 ton-miles per gallon. 
The details are in my written testimony. 

Those  fuel  savings  translate  into  environmental  benefits,  with 

navigation producing fewer air emissions as well. 

Each  year  $1.5  billion  is  collected  from  inland  and  deep  draft 
navigation  user  fees.  The  combined  collections  are  far  in  excess  of 
expenditures.  Despite  this  surplus,  navigation  needs  are  not  being 
met.  There  is  a  backlog  of  maintenance  and  new  construction  that 
is multiple billions of dollars. 

The  Harbor  Maintenance  Tax  was  designed  to  fully  fund  dredg-
ing  of  deep  draft  ports.  $1.4  billion  is  collected  each  year.  Only 
$900  million  is  spent.  The  surplus  is  over  $4  billion  today.  The 
GAO estimates that it will grow to $8 billion in just 3 years, 2011. 
The  Inland  Waterways  Trust  Fund  collects  $80  to  $100  million 
a  year.  It  provides  half  of  the  new  construction  on  the  inland  wa-
terways. That Fund had a surplus for many years, but that surplus 
will be gone by 2009. 

The Administration has proposed a new inland waterway lockage 
fee. It would increase the tax fourfold for barging on the Columbia 
and Snake Rivers. The PNWA opposes this new tax as long as the 
combined  navigation  user  tax  collections  are  in  excess  of  expendi-
tures.  Rather  than  propose  new  taxes,  we  urge  the  Administration 
to spend funds that are currently being collected. 

Underfunding  navigation  hurts  the  country  and  it  hurts  the  Pa-
cific Northwest. The PNWA tracks appropriations for 32 navigation 
projects  in  the  Pacific  Northwest.  Those  are  detailed  also  in  our 
written  testimony.  The  administration’s  budget  adequately  funds 
only  three  of  our  region’s  top  32  projects.  Congressional  adds  are 
needed for the other 29, including to maintain the Columbia River 
channels and the locks on the inland system, dredging and jetty re-
pair  at  Oregon  coastal  ports,  to  meet  endangered  species  require-
ments at Seattle’s Lake Washington Ship Canal, to study and pre-
pare  Seattle’s  Elliott  Bay  Seawall,  and  for  a  long-term  sediment 
management study at Humboldt Bay in California. 

Congress  has  responded  with  increased  funding  in  past  years. 
Those hard-fought increases are important and they are very much 
appreciated, but they’re not sufficient. We urge Congress to reinvig-
orate  our  Nation’s  infrastructure  by  funding  navigation  at  levels 
that  match  the  overall  collections  of  user  taxes.  That  would  add 
$500  million  annually  nationwide.  User  fees  were  instituted  to 
meet  specific  funding  needs.  The  funds  collected  must  be  spent. 
Congress has the authority. We urge you to exercise that authority. 
Thank  you  for  your  support.  We  look  forward  to  working  with 
you  to  ensure  that  our  Nation’s  transportation  infrastructure  pro-
vides a solid foundation for a robust American economy. Thank you 
for this opportunity to testify. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Vanselow follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

50 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF GLENN VANSELOW, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

PACIFIC NORTHWEST WATERWAYS ASSOCIATION 

Mr. Chairman, Members of the Committee, 
Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  today  on  the  important  topic  of  freight 
mobility.  I  am  Glenn  Vanselow,  Executive  Director  of  the  Pacific  Northwest  Water-
ways  Association.  PNWA  is  a  non-partisan,  non-profit  association  that  represents 
freight  mobility  interests,  including  port  authorities,  towboat  companies,  steamship 
operators,  shippers  of  cargo,  agricultural  producers,  forest  products  manufacturers 
and other transportation interests in Washington, Oregon, Idaho and northern Cali-
fornia. 

Our  nation’s  economy  relies  on  a  safe,  efficient  and  cost-effective  transportation 
system.  That  system  includes  road,  rail,  water  and  air.  My  colleagues  on  the  panel 
are addressing trucking and rail. I will focus on navigation. But I do so while noting 
that efficient water transportation requires efficient landside transportation as well. 
For  international  and  domestic  trade,  intermodal  connections  are  critically  impor-
tant.  A  bottleneck  in  any  one  link  reduces  the  strength  of  the  supply  chain  con-
necting producers with their domestic and foreign markets. 
Economic Benefits of Navigation 

Annually,  more  than  2.5  billion  tons  of  cargo  move  by  water  within,  to  and  from 
the United States. Nearly 1.6 billion of those tons move in international trade, with 
a value of over $2 trillion. Waterborne international trade generates over $21 billion 
annually  in  U.S.  Customs  revenue  to  the  U.S.  Treasury.  The  total  direct  and  indi-
rect economic impact of waterborne commerce is 8.4 million jobs, and over $300 bil-
lion in personal income. 

In my region, the Pacific Northwest, our ports ship nearly 90 million tons of cargo 
worth over $60 billion. The Columbia River is the Nation’s number one gateway for 
the  export  of  wheat  and  barley,  and  the  third  largest  grain  gateway  in  the  world. 
The  Ports  of  Seattle  and  Tacoma  are  the  third  largest  gateway  for  containerized 
cargo in the country. 
Environmental Benefits of Navigation 

A  typical  barge  can  carry  1,500  tons  on  the  Mississippi  River  System  and  3,500 
tons  on  the  Columbia  Snake  River  System.  That  compares  with  100  tons  per  rail 
car and 29 tons per truck. 

The modal comparison for the Mississippi River System in Figure 1 is from a 2008 
U.S.  Maritime  Administration  (MARAD)  study  completed  at  the  Texas  Transpor-
tation Institute at Texas A&M: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
E
S
N
A
V
0
1
6

In Figure 2, PNWA prepared the same comparison for the Columbia Snake River 

System. 

51 

For  the  Columbia  Snake  River  System,  delivering  cargo  to  load  a  typical  grain 
ship  with  55,000  tons  of  wheat  would  require  4  barge  tows,  550  rail  cars,  or  1,900 
trucks. 

The differences in carrying capacity translate into differences in energy efficiency. 
Below  is  a  chart  showing  the  relative  energy  efficiencies  of  truck,  rail  and  barge 
transportation  on  the  Mississippi  River  System,  courtesy  of  the  MARAD/Texas 
Transportation Institute study. 

The  chart  shows  ton-miles  per  gallon,  or  how  many  miles  a  ton  of  cargo  can  be 
carried on one gallon of fuel. Fuel efficiencies are improving for all three modes, yet 
navigation continues to move more cargo, more miles, for every gallon of fuel. 

The  fuel  savings  translate  into  proportionate  navigation  benefits  for  the  environ-
ment,  with  fewer  emissions  of  hydrocarbons,  carbon  monoxide,  nitrous  oxide  and 
particulate matter. Figure 5 is a table from the 2008 MARAD study showing a com-
parison of emissions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

3
E
S
N
A
V
0
1
6

.

s
p
e
2
E
S
N
A
V
0
1
6

52 

Navigation Funding 

Since 1789, the Federal Government has exerted control over navigation channels 
and channel improvements. In 1824, Congress delegated authority over the Nation’s 
navigation  system  to  the  U.S.  Army  Corps  of  Engineers.  Operations  and  mainte-
nance  and  new  construction  of  navigation  projects  are  funded  annually  in  the  En-
ergy and Water Development Appropriations bill. Since 1978 there has been a user 
fee  on  the  Nation’s  inland  waterways,  the  Inland  Waterways  User  Fee.  In  1986, 
Congress established a user fee for deep draft coastal ports and harbors, the Harbor 
Maintenance Tax. 

Each  year,  a  total  of  $1.5  billion  is  collected  from  the  inland  and  deep  draft  user 
fees. That is in addition to the $21 billion in Customs duties that are collected. De-
spite the collection of these fees, navigation needs are not being met. There is a sig-
nificant backlog of maintenance and new construction. 

The  Harbor  Maintenance  Tax  was  established  to  collect  fees  to  provide  100  per-
cent  of  the  cost  of  operations  and  maintenance,  primarily  dredging,  of  the  Nation’s 
deep  draft  and  coastal  ports  and  harbors.  Approximately  $1.4  billion  is  collected 
each year and symbolically placed in the Harbor Maintenance Trust Fund, but only 
about  $900  million  is  expended.  Currently,  the  surplus  of  collections  over  expendi-
tures  is  over  $4  billion.  The  GAO  reports  that  the  surplus  is  expected  to  grow  to 
$8 billion by 2011. Rather than being used for their intended purpose, at least $500 
million of these user fees is instead used to balance the Federal budget. 

The Inland Waterways Fuel Tax was created to collect fees to provide for 50 per-
cent  of  the  cost  of  new  construction  and  rehabilitation  of  locks  on  the  Nation’s  in-
land  waterways.  It  collects  20  cents  per  gallon  of  fuel  used  by  towboats  on  the  in-
land  waterways.  Each  year  it  collects  about  $100  million,  but  that  has  decreased 
to about $80 million as towboats have become more fuel efficient. The Inland Water-
ways Trust Fund had a surplus for many years, but now, expenditures are projected 
to  surpass  collections  in  2009.  The  Administration  has  proposed  instituting  a  new 
inland  waterway  tax  which  would  replace  the  fuel  tax  with  a  lockage  fee  for  each 
barge. The proposal would increase the user tax approximately four-fold for barging 
on the Columbia and Snake Rivers. 

PNWA opposes this new tax. Currently, the combined government navigation user 
tax collections are far ahead of expenditures. That is expected not only to continue, 
but to grow for the foreseeable future. 

Despite  collections  far  exceeding  expenditures,  the  Administration  does  not  pro-
pose sufficient funding to maintain the existing navigation system or to meet future 
needs.  For  decades,  during  both  Republican  and  Democratic  administrations,  we 
have had to look to Congress for increases over and above the inadequate Adminis-
tration budget proposals. 

As  an  example  of  how  this  affects  the  Pacific  Northwest,  I  have  attached  a  copy 
of  PNWA’s  appropriations  request  for  FY  2009.  We  track  32  navigation  projects 
from  Humboldt  Bay  in  California,  up  the  Oregon  Coast,  along  the  entire  length  of 
the  Columbia  Snake  River  System  in  Oregon,  Washington  and  Idaho,  to  the  Ports 
of Seattle and Tacoma and the northern reaches of the Puget Sound in Washington. 
Of those 32 navigation projects, 29 are in need of additional funding. In other words, 
the  Administration’s  budget  proposal  provides  adequate  funding  for  only  three  of 
our region’s 32 navigation projects. 

Additional  funding  is  needed  in  all  categories  . . .  general  investigations,  new 

construction and routine operations and maintenance. Here are a few examples. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
4
E
S
N
A
V
0
1
6

53 

On the Columbia Snake River System, Congressional adds are needed to maintain 
authorized  channel  depth  throughout  the  Columbia  and  Lower  Willamette  project. 
Two of our eight locks need Congressional adds for routine operations and mainte-
nance.  Five  need  adds  for  major  maintenance  and  repairs.  One  needs  additional 
funding for dredging to maintain authorized channel depth. 

Oregon’s  coastal  ports  need  funds  added  for  routine  dredging  to  maintain  their 

navigation channels and for jetty repairs. 

In  Puget  Sound,  the  Lake  Washington  Ship  Canal  needs  a  Congressional  add  to 
meet  Endangered  Species  Act  requirements.  More  funding  is  needed  for  the  Elliott 
Bay Seawall study in Seattle. 

In  California,  Humboldt  Bay  needs  funding  to  complete  a  long  term  sediment 

management feasibility study. 

Congress has responded in past years. Those hard fought increases have been im-
portant,  and  very  much  appreciated,  but  they  have  not  been  sufficient  to  prevent 
navigation  infrastructure  from  further  deteriorating.  We  encourage  Congress  to  re-
invigorate  our  Nation’s  navigation  infrastructure  by  funding  navigation  at  levels 
that  match  the  overall  collection  of  user  taxes.  That  is  what  is  necessary  to  meet 
our Nation’s vital economic needs. That would equate to an annual increase of $500 
million nationally. 

Unfortunately,  having  money  in  a  Federal  trust  fund  does  not  mean  that  the 
money  is  actually  available  to  be  spent  for  its  designated  purpose.  That  is  wrong. 
User  fees  were  instituted  to  meet  a  specific  funding  need.  The  funds  collected  from 
navigation user fees must be spent to meet navigation needs. Congress has the au-
thority to make this happen. We urge Congress to exercise that authority. 

We appreciate your past and continued recognition of the ways our Nation’s trans-
portation  infrastructure  provides  a  foundation  for  a  robust  American  economy.  We 
look  forward  to  working  with  you  to  ensure  that  our  transportation  infrastructure 
is capable of meeting our Nation’s needs. 

Thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  testify.  I  am  happy  to  answer  any  questions 

you may have. 

(Attachment: PNWA FY 2009 Energy and Water Appropriations Requests) 

PNWA FY 2009 Energy and Water Appropriations requests 
Deep Draft Navigation 

More than 60 million tons of cargo, worth $36 billion, moves in international trade 
across  the  docks  of  Oregon  and  Washington  ports.  The  Puget  Sound  and  Columbia 
River gateways are some of the largest in the country for: containers; wheat, barley 
and corn exports; and automobile imports. PNWA supports continued investment in 
the  development  and  maintenance  of  the  Federal  navigation  projects  that  support 
this important economic activity. 

Construction (CG) 

FY 2008 

President’s 
FY 2009 

Budget Level 

Support 
Additional 

Funds 

Total 

Request 

for 

FY 2009 

Columbia River Channel Improvement Project 
John  Day  Major  Rehab  Study  (funding  is  located  in 

dam safety program) 

Mt. St. Helens sediment control 
Evaluate  fish  passage  alternatives,  dredge  to  main-

tain flood control 

Lower Columbia River ecosystem restoration 
Water  Resources  Education  Ctr.  site,  plan/design 

Sandy River Delta site, plan Vancouver Lake site 

Lake Washington Ship Canal seismic analysis 
Humboldt  Bay  Long-Term  Sediment  Management 

feasibility study 

14,760,000 
1,000,000 

36,000,000 
2,000,000 

0 
0 

9,247,000 

1,410,000 

5,000,000 

36,000,000 
2,000,000 

6,410,000 

1,688,000 

1,500,000 

3,080,000 

1,580,000 

0 

107,000 

0 
0 

450,000 
500,000 

450,000 
500,000 

General Investigations (GI) 

Elliott Bay Seawall study (Port of Seattle) 
Lake Washington Ship Canal restoration study 

FY 2008 

590,000 
369,000 

President’s 
FY 2009 

Budget Level 

Support 
Additional 

Funds 

Total 

Request 
for FY 
2009 

0 
0 

1,025,000 
650,000 

1,025,000 
650,000 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

54 

We are pleased to note that the following critical infrastructure item was included 

in the President’s budget: 

• $675K  for  plans  and  specs  for  the  Columbia  River  jetties  major  rehab  (funding 

is part of the ‘‘Columbia River at the Mouth’’ account) 

Operations & Maintenance (O&M) 

FY 2008 

President’s 
FY 2009 

Budget Level* 

Support 
Additional 

Funds 

Total 

Request 

for 

FY 2009 

Columbia River at the Mouth (MCR) 
South jetty beneficial use site study 
Columbia & Lower Willamette River below Vancouver 

& Portland (C&LW) 

Maintenance dredging on C&WL, at Westport Slough 
($810K) and the Old Mouth of the Cowlitz ($450K), 
major maintenance report for pile dikes 

Columbia River between Vancouver & the Dalles 
Additional maintenance dredging 
Coos Bay (Port of Coos Bay) 
Additional  maintenance  dredging,  North  Jetty  in-

terim repair, jetty major maintenance report 

Yaquina Bay & Harbor (Port of Newport) 
Maintenance  dredging,  engineering  analysis  of  north 

jetty extension 

Lake Washington Ship Canal 
Design for modification to diffuser well (for improved 

passage of ESA-listed fish) 

Humboldt Harbor & Bay (Port of Humboldt Bay 
Additional maintenance dredging 

14,583,000 

14,873,000 

15,273,000 

400,000 

23,461,000 

24,973,000 

27,469,000 

2,496,000 

448,000 

640,000 

814,000 

174,000 

5,609,000 

4,769,000 

10,852,000 

6,083,000 

1,247,000 

1,482,000 

1,972,000 

490,000 

5,506,000 

7,554,000 

8,154,000 

600,000 

5,181,000 

5,144,000 

5,600,000 

456,000 

* The President’s budget only specifies funding for O&M on a regional basis. These project amounts were ob-

tained from the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers. 
Columbia Snake River System Inland Navigation 

Barging  on  the  Columbia  Snake  River  system  carries  10–12  million  tons  of  cargo 
worth  $1.5–2  billion  annually.  Barging  feeds  50  percent  of  the  wheat  exports  and 
25  percent  of  the  containers  handled  at  the  Lower  Columbia  ports.  It  is  the  lowest 
cost, most fuel efficient, and cleanest mode of cargo transportation. Ongoing support 
of  this  inland  waterway  is  critical  to  the  health  of  the  regional  economy  and  the 
success of our deep draft ports. 

We  are  pleased  to  note  that  the  following  critical  infrastructure  needs  were  in-

cluded in the President’s budget: 

• $1.56M for the Lower Monumental downstream lock gate plans & specifications. 
• $1M for pintle bearings and $3M for tainter valves at The Dalles. 
• $2.5M for tainter valves at John Day. 
• $6.7M  for  the  Programmatic  Sediment  Management  Plan  for  the  Lower  Snake 

River. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

55 

 

0
0
0
2
7
4

,

,

2
1

 

,

0
0
0
0
7
3

,

8

 

0
0
0

,

6
4
6

,

1
1

 

,

0
0
0
9
0
5

,

5

 

0
0
0
0
6
0

,

,

3

 

0
0
5
1
4
2

,

,

5

 

0
0
0
0
0
0

,

,

4

 

,

0
0
0
1
0
8

,

7

 

0
0
0

,

1
7
7

 

0
0
0

,

4
7
6

 

,

0
0
0
7
9
5

,

4

 

,

0
0
0
6
1
2

,

3

 

0
0
0

,

2
9
9

 

0
0
0

,

0
5

 

0
0
0

,

0
0
7

 

0
0
0

,

5
2
6

 

0

 

,

0
0
0
0
0
4

,

2

 

0
0
0

,

0
5

 

,

0
0
0
5
1
2

,

1

 

,

0
0
0
0
0
1

,

1

 

0
0
0

,

1
0
7
1
1

,

 

0
0
0

,

0
4
0
4
1

,

 

0
0
0

,

6
9
6

,

7

 

0
0
0

,

0
8
6

,

3

 

0
0
0

,

9
4
0

,

7

 

0
0
0

,

6
3
3

,

4

 

0
0
0

,

1
5
2

,

1

 

0
0
0

,

3
8
2

,

5

-
e
r
 
,
e
n
a
r
c
 
y
a
w

l
l
i
p
s
 

b
a
h
e
r
 
,
)
)

M
M
5
5

.
.

3
3
$
$
(
(
 
 
r
r
i
i
a
a
p
p
e
e
r
r
 
 

k
k
c
c
a
a
r
r
c
c
 
 

m
m
u
u
r
r
d
d

 
 

n
n
o
o
i
i
t
t
c
c
i
i
r
r
f
f
 
 
s
s
e
e
t
t
a
a
g
g
 
 
t
t
f
f
i
i
l
l
 
 

k
k
c
c
o
o
l
l
v
v
a
a
n
n

 
s
p
m
u
p

 
e
n
i
b
r
u
t
 

d
l
i
u
b

 
 
r
r
o
o
f
f
 
 
t
t
c
c
a
a
r
r
t
t
n
n
o
o
c
c
 
 

d
d
n
n
a
a

 
 

n
n
g
g
i
i
s
s
e
e
D
D

 

 

m
a
D
&
k
c
o
L

 

 
y
r
a
N
c
M

 

m
e
t
s
y
s
 
l
o
r
t
n
o
c
 

k
c
o
l
v
a
n

 
e
c
a
l
p
e
r
 
,
s
e
i
t
i
v
i
t
c
a
M
&
O
 
e
n
i
t
u
o
R

 

 

 
s
e
i
t
i
v
i
t
c
a
M
&
O
 
e
n
i
t
u
o
R

 

 

m
a
D
&
k
c
o
L

 

 
s
e
l
l
a
D
 
e
h
T

 

 

m
a
D
&
k
c
o
L

 

 

 
y
a
D
n
h
o
J

 

 

m
a
D
&
k
c
o
L

 

 
e
l
l
i
v
e
n
n
o
B

 

0
0
0

,

5
3
7

,

1

 

0
0
0

,

8
4
7

,

3

 

 

m
a
D
&
k
c
o
L

 

 
r
o
b
r
a
H
 
e
c
I

 
s
t
i
b

 
g
n
i
r
o
o
m
 
g
n
i
t
a
o
l
f
 
r
i
a
p
e
R

-
a
m

 
g
n
i
t
a
r
e
p
o
 

d
n
a

 
e
t
a
g
 

m
a
e
r
t
s
p
u

 
e
h
t
 
f
o
 
t
n
e
m
e
c
a
l
p
e
r
 
e
h
t
 
r
o
f

 
e
s
a
h
p

 

n
g
i
s
e
d

 

d
n
a

 
g
n
i
r
e
e
n
i
g
n
e
 
,
g
n
i
n
n
a
l
P

 
t
r
o
p
e
r
 
e
c
n
a
n
e
t
n
i
a
m

 
r
o
j
a
m

 
r
e
p

 
y
r
e
n
i
h
c

 
s
l
o
r
t
n
o
c
 
e
t
a
g
 

 

k
c
o
l
v
a
n
m
a
e
r
t
s
p
u

 
e
h
t
 
e
t
a
t
i
l
i
b
a
h
e
r
 

d
n
a

 
l
l
a
w
 
e
d
i
u
g
 
g
n
i
t
a
o
l
f
 
e
h
t
 

n
i
 
s
k
a
e
l
 
r
i
a
p
e
R

-
e
r
 
e
c
n
a
n
e
t
n
i
a
m

 
r
o
j
a
m

 

n
i

 
t
n
e
m
p
i
u
q
e
 
l
a
c
i
n
a
h
c
e
m

 

d
n
a

 
l
a
c
i
r
t
c
e
l
e
 
f
o
 
t
n
e
m
e
c
a
l
p
e
r
 
r
o
f

 

n
g
i
s
e
d
/
g
n
i
r
e
e
n
i
g
n
E

 
r
i
a
p
e
r
 

m
r
a

 
g
n
i
t
a
u
t
c
a

 
e
t
a
g
 
r
e
t
i

m

 
r
o
f
 
g
n
i
d
n
u
f
 
;
t
r
o
p

 

0
0
5

,

1
4
2

,

5

 

0
0
0

,

0
5
5

,

1

 

0
0
0

,

2
6
9

,

2

 

0
0
0

,

7
5
3

,

1

-
e
t
n
i
a
m

 
r
o
j
a
m

 
r
o
f

 
s
c
e
p
s
/
s
n
a
l
p

 

d
n
a

 
,
)
)

M
M
5
5
1
1
$
$
(
(

.
.

 
 
s
s
t
t
r
r
a
a
p
p

 
 
e
e
l
l
t
t
n
n
i
i
p
p

 
 
e
e
t
t
a
a
g
g
 
 

m
m
a
a
e
e
r
r
t
t
s
s
n
n
w
w
o
o
d
d

 
,
r
i
a
p
e
r

 

p
o
t
s
r
e
t
a
w

 

k
c
o
l
v
a
N

 
t
r
o
p
e
r
 
e
c
n
a
n

 

 

m
a
D
&
k
c
o
L

 

 
l
a
t
n
e
m
u
n
o
M

 
r
e
w
o
L

 

 

m
a
D
&
k
c
o
L

 

 
e
s
o
o
G
 
e
l
t
t
i
L

 

0
0
0

,

6
8
4

,

5

 

0
0
0

,

9
4
6

,

3

 

 

m
a
D
&
k
c
o
L

 

 
e
t
i
n
a
r
G
 
r
e
w
o
L

 
s
t
i
b

 
g
n
i
r
o
o
m
 
g
n
i
t
a
o
l
f
 
r
i
a
p
e
R

 
r
o
j
a
m

 

d
n
u
f

 
;
e
t
a
g
 
r
e
t
n
i
a
t

 

m
a
e
r
t
s
p
u

 
r
i
a
p
e
r

 
;

5

 

d
n
a
 

3

 

h
t
i
l
o
n
o
m

 

n
e
e
w

t
e
b

 

k
c
o
l
v
a
n

 

n
i

 
s
p
o
t
s
r
e
t
a
w

 
r
i
a
p
e
R

 
s
e
i
t
i
v
i
t
c
a

 
t
r
o
p
e
r
 
e
c
n
a
n
e
t
n
i
a
m

 
)
)

M
M
1
1

.
.
1
1
$
$
(
(
 
 

n
n
o
o
t
t
s
s
k
k
r
r
a
a
l
l
C
C

 
 
f
f
o
o
 
 
t
t
r
r
o
o
P
P

 
 
r
r
a
a
e
e
n
n

 
 
l
l
e
e
n
n
n
n
a
a
h
h
c
c
 
 
v
v
a
a
n
n

 
 
l
l
a
a
r
r
e
e
d
d
e
e
f
f
 
 
e
e
g
g
d
d
e
e
r
r
D
D

 
,

n
g
i
s
e
d

 

m
e
t
s
y
s

 
c
i
l
u
a
r
d
y
h

 

d
n
a

 
e
v
l
a
v

 
r
e
t
n
i
a
t

 
,
t
u
C

 
r
o
b
r
a
H

 
e
c
I

 
e
g
d
e
r
d

 
,
)
)

M
M
1
1
1
1
$
$
(
(

.
.

 
 
s
s
b
b
a
a
h
h
e
e
r
r

 
 
e
e
n
n
a
a
r
r
c
c

 
 

k
k
c
c
i
i
r
r
r
r
e
e
D
D

 
r
i
a
p
e
r
 

p
o
t
s
r
e
t
a
w

 
.
s
r
e
e
n
i
g
n
E

 
f
o
 
s
p
r
o
C
 
y
m
r
A

 
.

.

S
U
 
e
h
t
 

m
o
r
f
 

d
e
n
i
a
t
b
o
 
e
r
e
w
 
s
t
n
u
o
m
a

 
t
c
e
j
o
r
p

 
e
s
e
h
T

 
.
s
i
s
a
b

 
l
a
n
o
i
g
e
r
 

a

 

n
o
 
M
&
O
 
r
o
f
 
g
n
i
d
n
u
f
 
s
e
i
f
i
c
e
p
s
 
y
l
n
o
 
t
e
g
d
u
b

 
s
’
t
n
e
d
i
s
e
r
P

 
e
h
T
*

 
.

m
e
t
s
y
S

 
r
e
v
i
R
 
e
k
a
n
S

 

 

a
i
b
m
u
l
o
C
d
n
a
l
n
i
 
e
h
t
 

n
o
 
s
d
e
e
n

 
y
t
i
r
o
i
r
p

 
t
n
e
s
e
r
p
e
r
 
y
y
a
a
r
r
g
g
 

n
i
 
s
m
e
t
I
 
:
e
t
o
N

 
l
a
t
o
T

 
t
s
e
u
q
e
R

 

9
0
0
2
Y
F

 

 
r
o
f

 
t
r
o
p
p
u
S

 
l
a
n
o
i
t
i
d
d
A

 
s
d
n
u
F

 
s
’
t
n
e
d
i
s
e
r
P

 

 
t
e
g
d
u
B
9
0
0
2
Y
F

 

 
*
l
e
v
e
L

 

8
0
0
2
Y
F

 

 
)

M
&
O

(
 
e
c
n
a
n
e
t
n
i
a
M
&
 
s
n
o
i
t
a
r
e
p
O

 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

56 

PNWA Member Shallow Draft Commercial and Recreational Ports 

PNWA supports full funding for these critical projects. These ports, home to fish-
ing fleets, marinas and significant commercial and recreational facilities, are critical 
to  the  economic  survival  of  their  communities.  Many  have  small  populations,  and 
the ports provide employment for a significant proportion of community. 

Operations & Maintenance (O&M) 

FY 2008 

Oregon 

President’s 
FY 2009 
Budget 
Level* 

Support 
Additional 
Funds** 

Total 

Request 

for 

FY 2009 

1,850,000 

35,000 

4,932,000 

Tillamook Bay & Bar (Port of Garibaldi) 
Jetty  repair,  major  maintenance  report,  plans  & 

specs; maintenance dredging 
Yaquina River (Port of Toledo) 
Siuslaw River (Port of Siuslaw) 
Dredging,  ocean  disposal  site  evaluation,  north  & 

south jetties major maintenance report 

580,000 
691,000 

0 

583,000 

Umpqua River (Port of Umpqua) 
Rogue River (Port of Gold Beach) 
Dredging, evaluate north & south jetties 
Chetco River (Port of Brookings Harbor) 

1,370,000 
427,000 

635,000 
587,000 

409,000 

574,000 

Washington 

Swinomish Channel (Port of Skagit County) 
Columbia River at Baker Bay (Port of Ilwaco) 
Columbia River b/t Chinook & Sand Island (Port of 

Chinook) 

467,000 
598,000 
229,000 

0 

3,000 
6,000 

4,897,000 

632,000 

2,067,000 

784,000 

684,000 
448,000 

691,000 
840,000 
699,000 

632,000 
2,650,000 

1,419,000 
1,271,000 

1,022,000 

691,000 
843,000 
705,000 

* The President’s budget only specifies funding for O&M on a regional basis. These project amounts were ob-

tained from the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers. 

** Unless otherwise specified, additional requested funds are for maintenance dredging needs. 

mony. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thank  you  all  for  your  important  testi-

I’ll  start  with  a  question  for  you,  Administrator.  The  2005 
SAFETEA–LU  highway  bill  required  the  Bush  Administration  to 
put  together  a  comprehensive  plan  for  a  national  intermodal 
freight  policy  by  last  summer.  We’ve  not  even  seen  a  progress  re-
port. What’s the status of this plan? 

Mr.  BRUBAKER.  Mr.  Chairman,  that  is  an  outstanding  question. 
I’m going to have to defer to some of the staff here and get an an-
swer for the record for you on exactly where that is. I will dive into 
that, though, as soon as I get back and call your staff and find out. 

[The information referred to follows:] 

STATUS OF THE COMPREHENSIVE PLAN FOR INTERMODAL FREIGHT POLICY 

On  Friday,  August  15,  Thomas  Bolle  and  Jeff  Onizuk  from  the  Research  and  In-
novative  Technology  Administration  (RITA)  staff,  met  with  Subcommittee  staffer 
Stephen  Gardner  as  a  follow-up  to  the  June  10  freight  hearing.  During  that  meet-
ing,  Stephen  indicated  that  in  terms  of  the  status  of  the  comprehensive  plan  for 
intermodal  freight  policy,  they  would  like  to  know  where  RITA  stands  now,  with  a 
focus  on  methodology  and  metrics.  He  also  indicated  that  following  that  discussion 
they  would  like  to  discuss  the  scope,  structure,  and  plan  for  intermodal  activities 
and the Office of Intermodalism within the Department. It was agreed that the best 
way  to  follow-up  on  these  issues  was  to  schedule  a  meeting  with  RITA  Adminis-
trator Paul Brubaker and Subcommittee staff following the August recess. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  It’s  an  important  program  and  I  would 
hope  that  your  people  would  have  been  able  to  present  it  to  you 
with the start of this meeting. 

Without a comprehensive national strategy for freight movement, 
this  administration  seems  incapable  of  putting  good  data  to  use  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

57 

craft  policy  and  make  investment  decisions  to  meet  our  transpor-
tation  challenges.  What  have  you  got  by  way  of  specific  examples 
of  how  the  data  that  you  collect  is  being  used  for  shaping  Federal 
transportation policy? 

Mr.  BRUBAKER.  Yes,  sir.  That  was  one  of  the  main  points  in  my 
oral testimony, is the quality of the existing data that we currently 
have  around  freight  movement  from  a  holistic,  multimodal  and 
intermodal way. We don’t have the kind of quality complete picture 
of the existing movement of freight flow that we would like. For ex-
ample,  one  of  the  programs  that’s  under  my  responsibility  is  the 
Commodity Freight Flow Survey and that data by the time we get 
it,  collect  it,  analyze  it,  and  release  it  is  18  months  to  2  years  old. 
What  we  need  to  have  is  a  real-time  picture  of  the  performance 
of the supply chain. We know that data exists. We know that there 
are ways to collect that data, leveraging technology. In fact, one of 
the University Transportation Centers that we fund down at Geor-
gia Tech actually collects that type of information on a private sec-
tor-funded  project,  where  they  are  able  to  track  container  ship-
ments  across  the  country,  across  the  various  modes.  They  can  tell 
you  real-time  exactly  where  their  shipments  that  they’re  tracking 
for  a  private  sector  client,  like  I  mentioned,  are  in  the  supply 
chain. 

What it’s revealing is information that we as a Department real-
ly need to know in terms of where the bottlenecks are in the exist-
ing supply chain. That’s one piece of it. 

The  other  piece  of  it  is  we  know,  based  on  what  information  we 
do have, that there are some significant choke points in the supply 
chain  and  we’ve  taken  some  steps  and  implemented  some  pro-
grams, particularly Corridors of the Future, where we’re looking at 
freight flow up and down some of the most historically crowded cor-
ridors,  where  you’ve  got  freight  competing  with  passenger  move-
ment, to try to relieve congestion in those areas. 

But the bottom line is from our perspective the data that we cur-
rently collect is inadequate and we are undertaking some pretty ex-
tensive efforts and reviews to try to assemble the right kind of data 
sets,  understanding  what’s  relevant  and  trying  to  revector,  fun-
damentally revector our data collection, so that we can support—— 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  It’s  a  bit  disconcerting  that  this  crisis 
we’re  facing  has  been  coming  on  for  some  time,  and  I  would  have 
thought  that  someplace  in  your  Transportation  Department,  this 
information  would  have  been  part  of  routine  management.  Very 
frankly, it’s tough to accept the fact that at this point in time that 
you don’t have the facility to do it. 

I’m going to go on to my colleagues and we’ll have another round 
of questions. With that, Senator Smith, the Ranking Member of the 
Subcommittee. Senator Smith? 

STATEMENT OF HON. GORDON H. SMITH, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 
Senator SMITH. Thank you, Senator Lautenberg. 
All of you, thank you. Your testimony has been very helpful. Ad-
miral  Larrabee  and  Glenn,  good  to  see  you.  Nice  to  have  you. 
Thank you for coming back here. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

58 

I think we’re touching on a very, very important issue. Whenever 
I  go  to  Seattle  or  Portland  or  Long  Beach—and  I’m  sure  it’s  the 
same at the Port of New Jersey and New York—the infrastructure 
is operating at near capacity, whether you’re talking highway, rail, 
or shipping. I wonder if anyone is looking at our navigation system, 
if you look at the congestion we’re seeing. 

Do  you  know  of  any  estimates  to  the  impact  on  our  economy  of 
congestion  in  the  maritime  system?  Is  anybody  focusing  on  the 
maritime component? We’ve talked highway, we’ve talked rail. 

Mr.  LARRABEE.  Senator,  I  think  a  good  example  would  be  the 
labor  issues  on  the  West  Coast  in  2002,  when  the  southern  Cali-
fornia ports were closed. We estimated that for each day that those 
ports  were  closed  the  U.S.  economy  was  losing  about  a  billion  dol-
lars  a  day.  I  think  most  Americans  don’t  understand  the  vital  role 
that ports play in this logistics, very complex logistics system. 

The  example  that  I’ve  given  could  be  substituted  by  a  major 
storm. It could be substituted by a terrorist event or in many ports 
congestion,  which  simply  overwhelms  the  system.  Right  now,  I 
think from our perspective in New York and New Jersey we believe 
that  we’ll  see  a  doubling  of  cargo  in  the  next  10  years.  Our  port 
has taken a very systematic approach to improving access through 
a  50-foot  channel  which  we’re  in  the  middle  of  constructing  right 
now,  spending  a  good  deal  on  terminals,  but  primarily  right  now, 
from my testimony, spending in excess of $600 million on rail infra-
structure  and  another  $400  million  on  roadways  around  the  port, 
only  to  be  able  to  accommodate  the  kind  of  growth  that  we  think 
is  coming.  Those  were  all  investments  being  made  for  the  most 
part locally. 

Senator  SMITH.  Well,  that’s  why  I  wonder  if  anybody’s  broken 
down the portion of the cost that is attributable to the lack of chan-
nel  maintenance  and  port  facility  expansion.  It  just  seems  to  me 
that  in  all  of  our  conversations  here,  I  think  rail  is  doing  a  great 
job, we’re certainly investing a lot in highways, and heaven knows 
we  need  to  do  more  of  both,  but  the  shipping  component  I  think 
is grossly undervalued in terms of what it’s contributing. 

Glenn, when you talk about the Snake and Columbia Rivers, four 
barges,  the  equivalent  of  1900  trucks.  Think  of  what  that  means 
in terms of energy use, in terms of congestion on our highways, and 
the  cost  imposed  on  our  highways  where  we  could  be  investing  in 
these  port  facilities  to  the  great  energy  advantage  of  our  country. 
Mr.  VANSELOW.  One  of  the  things  that  I  pointed  out  was  an  ad-
ministration proposal to create a new lockage fee on the inland wa-
terways,  which  would  in  our  area  be  about  a  fourfold  increase.  It 
seems as though it goes against other administration and other na-
tional policies to in essence try to jack up the cost of moving cargo 
on  the  most  energy  efficient  and  least  polluting  mode  of  transpor-
tation. 

Senator  SMITH.  As  you  know,  Glenn,  every  year  we  get  our  port 
budget  zeroed  out  for  basic  dredging.  My  point  is  maybe  some  of 
these  monies  that  we’re  collecting,  in  the  billions  of  dollars,  ought 
to  be  used  to  make  sure  we’re  maintaining  our  channels  and  ex-
panding  our  port  facilities,  to  the  advantage  of  all  these  other 
modes  of  transportation.  I  just  don’t  know  that  we  have  a  very 
intermodal kind of planning process. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

59 

When  you  look  at  the  growth  that’s  projected  in  all  of  these 
areas,  I  think  we’re  leaving  out  a  piece  of  this.  That’s  what  my 
questioning is meant to highlight. 

My  point—people  say,  well,  you  need  to  raise  some  more  fees, 
we’ve  got  to  raise  some  taxes.  The  Harbor  Maintenance  Tax  is  an 
ad  valorem  tax.  It  goes  to  the  value.  As  those  values  go  up,  this 
is  going  to  be  creating  a  tremendous  amount  of  money.  As  those 
values go up, why do we need a new tax? Why can’t we direct those 
increased values at both increased capacity and maintenance? 

Mr. VANSELOW. For both Republican and Democratic administra-
tions  we’ve  had  the  problem  that  the  Administration  in  the  Presi-
dent’s  budget  underfunds  those  collections  dramatically.  Again, 
we’re  at  $4  billion-plus  today.  It  will  be  growing  by  approximately 
a billion dollars a year over the next few years. 

Senator  SMITH.  Well,  my  friend  the  Chairman—it’s  easy  to  pick 
on  the  Bush  Administration.  We  had  the  same  problem  with  the 
Clinton  Administration.  This  isn’t  a  Republican  or  Democratic 
problem. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  He  said  that  and  I  heard  it.  I  was  dis-

appointed to hear it. 

Senator  SMITH.  This  is  money  that  we  are  taking.  We’re  already 
collecting  enough  taxes  and  we’re  just  simply  spending  it  on  other 
general  fund  issues.  But  the  point  is  the  inefficiencies  that  flow 
from  this,  the  energy  waste  that  comes  from  this,  is  a  bipartisan 
shame and I think we ought to fix it. 

That probably goes to the Finance Committee. I happen to be on 

that committee. I’m taking this up there, too. 

Mr. VANSELOW. Thank you, sir. 
Senator  SMITH.  But  what  I  would  like,  my  take-home  to  this  is 
that we have not a Republican problem, not a Democratic problem, 
not a tax collection problem. We have a tax allocation problem. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks very much. 
Senator Carper? 

STATEMENT OF HON. THOMAS R. CARPER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM DELAWARE 

Senator CARPER. Mr. Chairman, thanks very much. 
I’m going to be joined here shortly in the anteroom by the Presi-
dent of the University of Delaware, so I’m going to ask some ques-
tions  and  then  slip  out  and  then  come  back  for  the  second  round 
if I could. 

I appreciate very much your holding this hearing. This is a very 
important  hearing  for  us,  not  just  in  the  Northeast  but  for  our 
country,  and  we  express  our  thanks  to  our  witnesses  for  coming 
today. 

Senator  Lautenberg  along  with  former  Senator  Trent  Lott  and 
myself and others have worked on legislation for a number of years 
that  seeks  to  find  a  way  for  us  to  coexist  between  passenger  rail 
and  freight  rail  and  find  ways  where  the  Federal  Government  and 
State  governments  would  partner  in  terms  of  expanding  avail-
ability, not just for passenger rail service, but also freight rail serv-
ice. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

60 

As  you  know,  in  my  old  role  as  Governor,  if  we  wanted  to  build 
highways,  roads,  or  bridges,  the  Federal  Government  usually  put 
up  about  80  percent  of  the  funds,  the  State  would  put  up  20  per-
cent of the funds. If we wanted to build a transit project, the State 
would put up about 50 percent, the Federal Government would put 
up  another  50  percent.  But  if  inter-city  passenger  rail  made  sense 
to  meet  our  passenger  needs  or  meet  our  transportation  needs  in 
our  state,  the  Federal  Government  would  put  up  nada,  nothing, 
and the states would be expected to fund 100 percent. 

I  know  we’ve  made  decisions  to  fund  in  some  case  roads,  high-
ways,  bridges,  or  maybe  transit  when  it  was  really  more  appro-
priate or more efficient to use intercity passenger rail. We have the 
opportunity,  I  think  the  potential,  for  creating  some  partnerships 
where the Federal Government will put up some money, the states 
will put up some money, maybe for-profit freight railroads will put 
up  some  money,  and  we  could  add  to  their  capacity  and  their  ca-
pacity that intercity passenger rail could utilize as well. 

Let me just ask you to sort of respond to that notion and tell me 

what you like about it and what you don’t. 

Commissioner Glynn? 
Ms. GLYNN. Well, I think—particularly when it comes to the rail-
roads,  which  do  operate  within  highly  defined  and  constrained 
rights-of-way, the type of interplay you’re talking about makes a lot 
of  sense  for  both  passenger  and  the  freight  rail  systems.  For  this 
reason, AASHTO has been very interested in some of the ideas, tax 
credit  ideas  and  others,  that  would  help  functionally  both  the  pas-
senger system and the freight rail system. 

It is very important as we look at tax credits and we look at ben-
efits  to  what  are  private  companies  that  we  make  sure  that  the 
public  benefits  are  identified  and  realized.  Intercity  passenger  rail 
as  well  as  transit  are  two  of  the  places  where  those  benefits  can 
functionally interplay positively with the freight rail operators and 
relieve one of the major sources of congestion and choke points that 
right  now  are  a  problem  for  both  the  freight  railroads  and  the 
intercity  passenger  rail  system,  which  has  so  much  to  give  this 
country. 

Senator CARPER. Thank you. 
Others, please? Mr. Hamberger? 
Mr. HAMBERGER. Thank you, Senator. Let me thank you for your 
leadership,  Senator  Carper,  on  the  floor  last  week  and  Beth 
Osborne,  for  crafting  an  amendment  that  takes  recognition  of  the 
public benefits of moving freight by rail, moving people by rail, and 
trying  to  reduce  the  vehicle  miles  traveled  both  on  the  passenger 
side and the freight side. 

I  think  that  conceptually  we  are  really  trying  to  head  in  the 
same  direction.  We  are  supporting  the  Amtrak  bill  on  the  floor  of 
the House this afternoon. Our individual companies are making an 
individual bilateral effort, in partnership with Amtrak, even as we 
speak,  to  pick  out  individual  corridors  and  trying  to  address  on- 
time performance, some of which can certainly be tied to the capac-
ity  constraints  that  are  out  there.  Perhaps  we  can  improve  oper-
ations and get on-time performance where it needs to be. 

We are committed to trying to improve on-time performance with 
Amtrak  and  trying  to  expand  capacity  for  both.  As  we  say,  the  in-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

61 

herent  advantage  of  moving  freight  by  rail  is  just  as  true  for  mov-
ing  people  by  rail,  and  we’ve  got  to  move  both,  but  we’ve  got  to 
have enough capacity for both. It cannot be one in lieu of the other. 
Senator  CARPER.  We  have  something  in  Delaware  we  call 
DELTRAC,  D-E-L-T-R-A-C.  You  probably  have  something  like  this 
in  New  York,  maybe  other  states  that  you  are  from.  But  the  idea 
is  to  use  technology  to  better  utilize  the  true  capacity  of  our  road 
system,  whether  it’s  smart  signaling  or  when  there’s  a  mishap  to 
clean  it  up,  fix  it  up,  get  traffic  moving  in  the  right  away.  We  call 
it  DELTRAC  and  the  idea  is  to  get  better  capacity  out  of  what  we 
already have. 

My  hope  is  that  we  can  find  a  way  to  do  that  with  rail.  If  we’re 

smart, maybe we can pull that off. 

My  time  has  expired.  I  want  to  come  back  for  a  second  round. 
I’m  going  to  go  meet  with  our  university  president  and  I’ll  come 
back. Thank you for responding. 

Anybody  else  have  a  quick  comment  on  the  issue  that  I  raised? 

Anybody at all? Mr. Brubaker? 

Mr. BRUBAKER. I just wanted to mention that I think innovation 
is something that we believe very deeply can squeeze additional ca-
pacity  out  of  existing  infrastructure.  The  comment  was  made  ear-
lier  about  freight  movement  by  sea.  We’ve  actually  got  a  program 
called  Maritime  Domain  Awareness,  where  what  we’re  doing  is 
we’re actually getting visibility of ships as they’re entering ports or 
nearing ports or even en route to ports, where we can actually help 
guide  them,  much  in  the  same  way  we  guide  planes  into  airports, 
so  that  they  arrive  just  in  time,  so  that  we  can  better  manage  ca-
pacity at ports. That’s an idea that we’re looking at. 

Similar  type  things  with  managing  rail  capacity.  The  only  dif-
ference  there  is  it  requires  significant  cooperation  between  pri-
vately held or quasi-governmental agencies like port authorities, as 
well  as  the  railroads,  in  order  to  squeeze  that  additional  capacity 
out. 

You mentioned sort of that tradeoff between highway investment 
and rail investment and some other investments in terms of move-
ment of freight. We tend to focus on things we are a little bit more 
in  control  of.  What  we’re  trying  to  do  is  change  the  paradigm  so 
that we’re taking a more holistic look of all the elements of all the 
modes  in  the  supply  chain  and  having  a  better  understanding  of 
how they interact, and then work and reach out to the private sec-
tor and the port authorities to better manage the infrastructure. 

Senator CARPER. Thanks for sharing that with us. 
Thanks very much, Mr. Chairman. I’ll be right back. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Mr. Brubaker, I was a little bewildered, to 
say  the  least,  when  I  asked  you  about  the  SAFETEA–LU  highway 
bill that required a comprehensive plan and apparently caught you 
by  surprise.  The  section  of  the  program  that  you  handle  is  I  as-
sume  the  chief  Department  responsible  for  developing  that  infor-
mation. 

What went wrong? This was due in 2005. It was instructed to be 
done by last summer, almost a year ago. Were you surprised at all 
or  interested  enough  to  make  inquiries  about  where  things  were 
without  having  now—you’ll  forgive  me,  sir—having  to  search  for 
staff to report on it? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

62 

Mr.  BRUBAKER.  Sir,  I  will  find  out  exactly  what  the  history  of 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  So  you  haven’t  had  a  chance  to  look  for  it 

this is. 

before? 

Mr. BRUBAKER. No, sir, I have not. Just in the interest of full dis-
closure, I’ve been on this job a little less than a year and I’ve tried 
to inventory all of my SAFETEA–LU requirements, and apparently 
that  one  is  not  one  that  has  been  brought  to  my  attention.  I  will 
promise  you  I  will  find  the  answer  to  that  question  and  get  back 
to you. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Please.  It’s  so  important  because  it’s  fun-

damental to our planning. 
Mr. BRUBAKER. I agree. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  wanted  to  ask  this  question  generally. 
Some  have  suggested  that  we  could  reduce  truck  traffic  on  our 
highways  by  using  barges  and  ships  to  move  freight  between  two 
U.S. ports on marine highways. But a shipment from overseas that 
then  travels  between  these  two  U.S.  ports,  Mr.  Vanselow,  faces 
double  taxation  because  it  pays  the  Federal  Harbor  Maintenance 
Tax twice. 

Now,  might  removing  this  tax  for  the  domestic  portion  of  this 
shipment  provide  incentive  for  these  so-called  short-sea  shipping 
moves to get more trucks off the road? 

Mr.  VANSELOW.  If  you  don’t  mind,  Mr.  Chairman,  I’m  going  to 
use  your  question  to  speak  a  little  more  broadly  about  the  Harbor 
Maintenance  Tax.  First,  industry  does  not  object  to  a  tax.  We  do 
believe  that  it  is  necessary  to  fund  navigation.  These  are  all  Fed-
eral  channels.  They  are  all  maintained  by  the  U.S.  Army  Corps  of 
Engineers.  They  are  all  appropriated  by  Congress,  and  it  is  the 
user fee that should be paying for that. 

The user fee does have some issues. One we’ve talked about, the 
surplus. Others, we have had an issue at our north and south bor-
ders,  where  Seattle  and  Tacoma,  for  example,  are  competing  with 
Vancouver,  B.C.,  and  they  are  advertising  no  Harbor  Maintenance 
Tax  here,  trying  to  woo  cargo  away  from  U.S.  ports.  This  is  cargo 
destined  to  U.S.  importers,  but  moving  through  a  foreign  country 
to get there. So there are other issues. 

We  do  believe  that  we  do  need  to  take  care  of  those  kinds  of 
movements. If a cargo is taxed once coming into the United States, 
that ought to be all that it is taxed. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  But  also  the  unavailability  of  the  full  rev-

enue stream that is developed there has retarded progress. 

Mr. VANSELOW. One of the issues that we have is it is the largest 
ports in the country that need the ability to exercise short-sea ship-
ping  because  of  their  capacity  constraints.  We  have  a  problem 
through  OMB  and  administration  priorities,  it  is  the  largest  ports 
in  the  country  that  are  the  top  priority  for  getting  funding  for  ex-
penditure  out  of  that  Harbor  Maintenance  Tax.  The  smaller  ports, 
which  could  be  the  feeder  ports,  are  the  ones  that  Senator  Smith 
just remarked are zero in the Administration’s budget proposal. We 
have to come to Congress to ask for more. 

So  if  we  could  more  broadly  spend  that—it’s  not  just  L.A.  and 
Long  Beach  that  needs  money.  Their  overflow  opportunities  go  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

63 

Oxnard  and  Port  Hueneme  and  elsewhere  on  the  California  coast. 
We have the same issues in the Pacific Northwest. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Mr. Hamberger, we spend some $40 billion 
a  year  on  highways,  $15  billion  on  our  aviation  system,  but  little 
to  none  on  rail.  What  do  you  think  we  could  do  better  to  balance 
the  Federal  transportation  policies,  to  encourage  investment  in  all 
modes of transportation? 

Mr.  HAMBERGER.  Well,  the  difference,  of  course,  for  freight  rail-
roads  is  that  we  are  privately  owned.  So  I  think  it  would  be  most 
appropriate  for  the  Federal  Government  to  provide  an  investment 
tax credit, an investment tax incentive, to encourage even more in-
vestment than the industry is already undertaking. 

As  you  know,  we  spent  on  average  about  17  or  18  percent  of  all 
revenue  over  the  last  10  years,  on  capacity  expansion.  We  have 
done  a  survey  of  our  members  and  if  the  legislation  co-sponsored 
by Senator Conrad and Senator Smith were to pass we believe that 
an  additional  $1.5  billion  would  be  spent  just  by  the  railroads  on 
capacity  expansion.  It’s  new  capacity.  That  would  create  about 
30,000  jobs  immediately,  not  when  a  government  agency  says  it’s 
OK  to  start  building.  But  these  are  projects  that  are  on  the  draw-
ing  board,  ready  to  go,  for  which  capital  does  not  now  exist.  The 
tax incentive would move those projects forward. We think it would 
be  helpful  in  job  creation,  but  it  also  provides  $1.5  billion  of  more 
capacity per year. 

I would point out one of the reasons that a lot of Mr. Vanselow’s 
members  support  that  legislation  and  the  American  Association  of 
Port  Authorities  supports  it  is  because  it  would  also  be  available 
to anybody who invests in new capacity. That is to say if somebody, 
a  private  investor,  were  to  want  help  to  finance  a  new  intermodal 
yard,  a  land-side  facility  near  a  port,  the  rail  pieces  of  it  would  be 
eligible for the investment tax credit. 

So  I  think  that  that  is  something  that  could  be  done  imme-
diately. The second companion piece, of course, is the short line tax 
credit,  which  expired  at  the  end  of  2007.  In  the  first  year  it  was 
enacted,  half  a  million  additional  ties  were  purchased  in  compari-
son  to  the  number  from  the  previous  year.  And  these  are  short 
lines  that  need  to  upgrade  their  track  to  be  able  to  get  into  the 
heavier service. 

So it works and I think that would be the first thing. The second, 
of course, is the public-private partnerships that everybody has ref-
erenced.  I  would  echo  Commissioner  Glynn’s  comments  that  these 
are  not  handouts,  this  is  not  a  subsidy.  The  private  sector  should 
pay for the private sector benefits and the public sector should pay 
for the public sector benefits, and in that way it is truly a win-win. 

Mr. BRUBAKER. Mr. Chairman, if I might. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes. 
Mr.  BRUBAKER.  Just  to  piggyback  on  what’s  been  said,  there  are 
some programs, one of which was authorized under SAFETEA–LU, 
which  is  the  private  activity  bond.  We  actually  received,  the  De-
partment’s  received,  a  couple  of  applications,  actually  three  appli-
cations,  for  intermodal  freight  transfer  facilities,  two  of  which  are 
in  the  State  of  Illinois,  with  the  idea  of  eliminating  bottlenecks  in 
and  around  Chicago.  That  amounts,  those  three  applications,  total 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

64 

some $2.2 billion and will, if they’re fully funded, are going to wind 
up  adding  capacity  to  handle  over  two  million  containers  per  year. 
So  there  are  some  activities  that  we’re  engaged  in,  as  well  as 

some TIFIA financing as well. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you. 
I’m going to turn over the chairmanship to my distinguished col-
league from Delaware. Since our interests are so closely connected, 
I  feel  safe  in  saying  that  I’m  sure  that  Senator  Carper  will  follow 
up his interest in railroads and freight movement. These two little 
states  of  ours  represent  a  lot  of  seagoing  business  and  a  lot  of  im-
portant transportation facilities. So, please. 

Senator CARPER [presiding]. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I was telling Senator Lautenberg earlier today, when we were on 
the  floor  during  a  series  of  votes,  that  normally  I  take  the  train 
from  Delaware  to  Washington  almost  every  day  and  then  back  at 
night.  Yesterday  I  took  the  train  the  other  way,  from  Wilmington 
to Philadelphia in the morning, and then a bit later in the morning 
from Philly to New York City, and early afternoon from New York 
back down to Wilmington. 

I wasn’t surprised—the first train left Wilmington for New York, 
oh,  about  8:05  and  it  was  still  rush  hour  and  the  train  was  full, 
not  surprisingly.  We  left  Philadelphia  about  10  o’clock  going  to 
New York and it was not rush hour and the train was full. We left 
New  York  a  little  bit  after  2  o’clock,  not  rush  hour,  and  the  train 
was  standing  room  only.  I  thought  to  myself,  something’s  going  on 
here.  Something  is  going  on  here.  Amtrak  is,  especially  in  the 
Northeast  Corridor  right  now,  sort  of  bursting  at  the  seams  in 
terms of providing capacity. 

I know the freight lines throughout the country face a similar sit-
uation. It would be great if we could be smart enough to figure out 
how  to  address  both  of  these  at  least  to  some  extent.  A  friend  of 
mine likes to say ‘‘how to kill two stones with one bird.’’ Maybe we 
can find a way to kill two birds with one stone. 

Now  that  I  am  the  Chair  of  the  hearing,  I  think  I’d  like  to  call 

up a couple of bills of mine. 

[Laughter.] 
I’m the only one here, at least for now—six staff just jumped me 

all at once to make sure I didn’t do that. 

A  question  initially  for  Commissioner  Glynn.  Do  people  call  you 

‘‘Commissioner’’? 

a cabinet secretary? 

Ms. GLYNN. Yes, sir. 
Senator  CARPER.  All  right.  That’s  the  same  as  ‘‘Secretary,’’  like 

Ms. GLYNN. It is, sir, yes. 
Senator  CARPER.  Ann  Canby  used  to  be  our  Secretary  of  Trans-
portation  in  Delaware,  but  I  think  she  was  also  once  the  Commis-
sioner of Transportation in New Jersey. 

Ms. GLYNN. She has been many things and I’m sure will be many 

more. 

Senator  CARPER.  I  loved  working  for  her  when  I  was  Governor. 
[Laughter.] 
Ms. GLYNN. We all do. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

65 

Senator  CARPER.  In  fact,  she  was  the  person  who  recommended 
Beth Osborne to us, which was one of the best hires we ever made 
in my Senate office. 

But  Commissioner  Glynn,  I  think  you  mentioned  in  your  testi-
mony that government tends to divide transportation responsibility 
by  mode.  Here  in  the  Senate  we  have,  as  you  probably  know,  rail 
and  air  jurisdiction  in  this  Committee.  Over  in  the  Committee  on 
Environment  and  Public  Works,  we  have  jurisdiction  over  high-
ways.  In  the  Banking  Committee  we  have  transit.  I  serve  on  all 
three,  so  I  get  to  play  on  all  of  them.  I  think  I’m  the  only  Senator 
who serves on all three. 

But at the U.S. Department of Transportation, I think each agen-
cy  focuses  on  the  movement  of  machines,  trucks,  trains,  planes, 
cars,  and  ships.  But  I  have  found  that  people  don’t  necessarily 
travel  in  this  way.  We  like  to  get  from  point  A  to  point  B  quickly, 
we  like  to  get  there  conveniently,  we  like  to  get  there  in  a  way 
that’s affordable. 

Much  of  the  time,  we  use  multiple  modes  for  one  trip.  In  Wil-
mington,  a  lot  of  people,  until  recently  and  even  still,  will  take 
their  car  or  a  bus  or  a  taxi  or  something  to  go  to  the  Wilmington 
train  station,  will  get  on  the  train,  will  travel  to  BWI.  We  take  a 
shuttle from BWI getting off the train to the airport. Then we take 
an airplane wherever we want to go. 

But  that’s  the  way  people  move,  and  we  do  that  because  it’s  so 
affordable as a result. Freight movement is similar. You have busi-
nesses and consumers who just want to receive their goods quickly, 
they want to get them safely, they want to receive them affordably. 
Here’s  my  question.  It’s  a  long  lead-in  to  a  fairly  short  question, 
but how do we break through what we call government stovepiping 
to  ensure  that  we  institute  policies  here  that  facilitate  a  smooth 
flow of goods and I suppose of people, too? 

Ms.  GLYNN.  That  has  been  one  of  the  challenges  since  the  var-
ious TEA’s began. And it is one that remains for us. Looking at the 
problem from the standpoint of our customers, looking at the prob-
lem from the standpoint of functionality, rather than our own juris-
dictions, has proved very hard for all of us. Yet it is something that 
we need to keep working at. 

Ports are perhaps the best examples of this because ports are by 
nature multimodal and intermodal. That is their business. The fact 
that  we  have  one  stream  of  revenue  going  to  dredging,  another 
stream going to rail improvement or not, a third one going to truck 
access, and all of this, each coming from an environment where the 
contribution may be viewed against a finite set of purposes and re-
sources, tends to make each investment a zero sum game. 

That  is  one  of  the  problems  that  we  have  been  striving  against, 
and  I  must  say  that  Ann  Canby  has  been  very  diligent  in  encour-
aging us to strive against, so that we do break through those stove-
pipes and that we look at it from the standpoint of how can we ad-
dress all aspects of this choke point, not simply the rail aspect, not 
simply  the  road  aspect,  not  simply  the  depth  of  water—all  aspects 
of each choke point. 

If we can address the choke points, that will inure to the benefit 
of  the  entire  system  because  the  entire  system  is  interdependent. 

Senator CARPER. Anyone else on this particular point? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

66 

Mr. BRUBAKER. Yes, sir, if I may. 
Senator CARPER. Yes, sir, Mr. Brubaker. Do people call you ‘‘Ad-

ministrator Brubaker’’? 

Mr. BRUBAKER. Yes, that’s fine. 
My  office  produced  a  document  called  ‘‘Transportation  Vision  for 
2030’’  back  in  January  and  the  whole  notion  here  was  that  we 
would  begin  to  focus  exactly  how  you  described,  on  origin  to  des-
tination  for  passenger  movement,  origin  to  destination  for  freight 
movement  and  really,  because  we’ve  got  the  Office  of  Intermodal 
within  the  Research  and  Innovative  Technology  Administration, 
really  focus  on  cross-modal  activities  and  actually  encourage  the 
other  modal  administrators—and  they  have  been  very,  very  recep-
tive, some of whom sort of refer to their stovepipes as the ‘‘silos of 
excellence.’’  But  nevertheless  it’s  important  that  we  break  down 
those silos and begin to work across modes, because truly it is how 
we  move  freight  and  we  move  people.  It  is  multimodal,  as  I  hope 
we pointed out here today, and we really need to focus on how peo-
ple move and how freight moves as well, because that is in essence 
how we’re going to crack the code. 

Senator CARPER. Thank you. 
Yes, sir, Mr. Hamberger. 
Mr. HAMBERGER. People call me Mister Ed. 
Senator  CARPER.  They’ve  probably  called  you  worse,  and  cer-

tainly me too. 

Mr. HAMBERGER. Yes. 
We have a freight stakeholders coalition that was quite active in 
the  last  surface  transportation  bill.  The  Association  of  American 
Port Authorities was the honorary chair, and it included the Amer-
ican  Trucking  Association,  our  association,  and  others.  John 
Horsley  of  AASHTO,  for  this  upcoming  authorization,  has  been 
very  active  in  trying  to  get  everybody  in  the  room  together  under 
AASHTO’s  banner  to  take  a  look  and  make  some  significant  con-
tributions to the National Transportation Policy and Revenue Com-
mission report that Secretary Peters chaired. 

So I think there is a recognition that it’s not just inside the halls 
of  government,  but  also  those  of  us  in  the  private  sector  need  to 
make sure that we’re cooperating and working together as well. 

Senator CARPER. All right, thank you. 
We’ve been joined in the hearing by my Chief of Staff, Jim Reilly, 
and  he  has  with  him  the  President  of  the  University  of  Delaware, 
Pat Harker. We were just chatting outside the hearing when I was 
in and out of the room, and the last question I’m going to ask was 
actually one that he just raised to my own mind. 

I was privileged for a while in the late 1990s to serve on the Am-
trak Board of Directors. Kind of ironic. I was Governor at the time. 
I  was  nominated  by  the  President,  confirmed  by  the  Senate,  and 
served  on  the  Amtrak  Board.  There  is  now  another  person  named 
Tom  Carper  who  serves  on  the  Amtrak  Board.  It’s  not  a  real  com-
mon  name  and  it’s  caused  enormous  confusion  for  people,  who  say 
how  can  Carper  be  in  the  Senate  and  still  serve  on  the  Amtrak 
Board? It’s a different guy, a lot smarter guy, I think. 

But I was talking with President Harker when I was out meeting 
with him in the conference room and I was sharing with him a lit-
tle bit about what we were discussing here. I reflected back on one 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

67 

of  the  things  we  tried  to  do  during  my  time  on  the  Amtrak  board. 
We  said,  Amtrak  doesn’t  do  badly  in  terms  of  paying  for  its  ex-
penses out of the fare box in densely populated corridors. They ac-
tually  do  pretty  well,  including  the  Northeast  Corridor.  But  when 
running  these  long  distance  trains  in  a  lot  of  cases  Amtrak  loses 
its  shirt,  and  the  taxpayers  end  up  subsidizing  a  fair  amount  of 
that. 

We came up with the notion of how do we do a better job of cov-
ering  our  costs  on  long  distance  trains,  by  in  some  instances  put-
ting on a couple of extra cars on the train, to carry, not people, but 
commodities,  in  some  cases  commodities  that  are  time  sensitive  in 
terms of their delivery. We negotiated with the freight railroads to 
make  sure  that  they  didn’t  object  and  so  that  we  could  use  their 
tracks and provide this service. 

I  left  the  Board  and  the  idea,  which  started  off  with  a  fair 
amount  of  fanfare,  kind  of  died  out.  I  thought  at  the  time  that  it 
was a good idea. I’m still convinced it might be a good idea. Presi-
dent Harker said to me that at an earlier time in his life—he came 
to  us  from  Wharton,  where  he  was  the  President  of  the  Wharton 
School  until  this  past  year.  But  he  said  as  an  engineer  he  had 
worked  on  a  variety  of  projects  involving  subway  transit  systems 
within large cities, and he came up with the notion, or folks he was 
working  with  came  up  with  the  notion,  of  in  some  cases  putting  a 
rail car along with transit, maybe at the back of the train, to carry 
commodities from place to place where you have such tie-ups. I saw 
it yesterday in New York City—with trying to move trucks and de-
livering goods, not just the taxis, but just a lot of trouble trying to 
move  trucks  around  the  city;  and  suggested  that  their  idea  was  to 
use the transit system, get the stuff underground. UPS or whoever 
is providing the delivery could still be there and run at the transit 
stops,  run  a  delivery  service  once  the  commodities  are  offloaded 
from subways. 

Anybody  want  to  take  a  shot  at  that,  either  Amtrak’s  original 
idea  when  I  was  on  the  Board  or  what  President  Harker  sort  of 
outlined?  I  probably  didn’t  do  justice  to  your  idea,  Mr.  President. 
But would you just react to either of those ideas? 

Mr. BRUBAKER. If I could, as good an idea as it is, of course, Sen-
ator,  it  just  did  not  work  in  application,  for  two  reasons  that  I’m 
aware of, and I’ll get you more on this. It was a few years ago. But 
if  memory  serves  correct,  one  is  of  course  that  people  and  freight 
move  at  different  times  and  at  different  speeds.  When  the  Amtrak 
train  comes  into  the  30th  Street  Station  there  in  Philadelphia,  it’s 
there  for  about  5  minutes,  which  is  not  nearly  enough  time  to  ei-
ther unload or hook up additional cars. 

Senator CARPER. We weren’t talking about moving freight in the 

Northeast Corridor. 

Mr. BRUBAKER. Well, in any event, the point being that wherever 
the  train  and  the  passenger  is  moving  it  is  usually  at  a  different 
time and a different speed than the freight. 

Then second, in many cases the station is not configured to han-
dle additional cars, and so either it would be hanging out onto the 
main  line  or  they’d  have  to  go  somewhere  else  to  pick  up.  It  just 
conceptually  sounded  good,  but  out  there  in  practice  did  not  work, 
and I think they consequently pulled the plug on it. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

68 

Senator  CARPER.  The  stationmaster  in  Sioux  City  says:  Fred, 

where are we going to put all these bananas? 

Mr. BRUBAKER. Yes. 
Senator  CARPER.  All  right.  How  about  the  second  half  of  that? 
This is the idea that I’ve done a poor job in describing of President 
Harker’s,  but  an  idea  of  maybe  using  transit  and,  if  you  will,  ap-
pending  to  a  subway  or  a  MARC  train  or  something,  a  vehicle  or 
cars  that  can  carry  such  things  other  than  people?  Does  that  reso-
nate  or  make  any  sense?  Is  anybody  doing  it?  Maybe  somebody’s 
doing it and we don’t even know about it. 

Ms.  GLYNN.  I’m  not  aware  of  anyone  who’s  doing  it,  but  I  am 
acutely  conscious  of  the  fact  that,  at  least  in  the  New  York  City 
subway  system  and  I  believe  in  most  of  the  larger  ones,  we’re 
scrounging for track capacity and station capacity. So except on off 
hours—and  in  off  hours,  of  course,  all  things  become  possible—to 
give up that platform capacity to a new use would be probably dif-
ficult. 

There  is  of  course,  particularly  on  off  hours  and  on  weekends,  a 
different  situation,  and  I  know  that  some  systems  have,  for  in-
stance,  started  offering  different  things  such  as  bicycle  cars  on 
weekends,  so  that  people  who  want  to  travel  with  their  bicycle,  go 
to  the  beach,  whatever,  it  is  easier  for  them  to  do  it.  It’s  not  quite 
the  freight  issue,  but  it  does  help  give  us  a  little  more  flexibility 
when it comes to mobility. 

Senator  CARPER.  We  have  buses  in  Delaware,  people  can  take 

their bike to the beach, and take it on a bus. 

Yes, sir? 
Mr. BRUBAKER. We may also want to examine some of the safety 
implications  of  such  an  arrangement,  because  obviously  passenger 
rail  cars  are  built  for  strict  safety  standards,  whereas  freight  cars 
are  built  to  lesser  safety  standards,  and  what  happens  when  you 
combine the two. It could be pretty—there could be some pretty sig-
nificant unintended consequences. 

Senator CARPER. Fair enough. 
I  have  one  more  question.  I  won’t  ask  it  here;  I’ll  ask  it  for  the 
record,  and  if  you’ll  take  a  moment  and  respond  to  it.  And  I  think 
other  colleagues  of  ours  may  have  questions  that  we’d  like  to  pose 
to  you.  If  you’d  take  a  few  minutes  to  respond  to  those  questions, 
we’d all be grateful. 

Let  me  just  ask  our  staff  here,  any  idea  how  long  we  leave  the 
record  open  for  questions  to  be  posed  for  our  witnesses?  2  weeks? 
2 weeks. 

Again, we appreciate very much your being here and responding 
to our questions. It’s been enjoyable and I think highly informative, 
and as it turns out this is important stuff. So thank you very much. 

With that, this hearing is adjourned. Thank you. 
[Whereupon, at 3:56 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. SUSAN M. COLLINS, U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 
Mr. Chairman, the skyrocketing price of diesel fuel is putting an increasing strain 
on  our  trucking  industry.  To  illustrate  the  problem,  consider  this  fact.  In  1999,  a 
Maine  truck  driver  could  purchase  $500  of  diesel  fuel  and  drive  from  Augusta, 
Maine,  all  the  way  to  Albuquerque,  New  Mexico.  Today,  a  driver  who  purchases 
$500 of diesel and leaves Augusta would not even make it to Altoona, Pennsylvania, 
and  because  diesel  prices  continue  to  increase,  the  problem  is  only  getting  worse. 
I recently met with Kurt Babineau, a small business owner and second generation 
logger  and  trucker  from  the  Penobscot  County  town  of  West  Enfield,  Maine.  Like 
so many of our truckers, Kurt has been struggling with the increasing costs of run-
ning his operation. All of the pulpwood his business produces is transported to Verso 
Paper in Jay, Maine, a 165-mile roundtrip. This would be a considerably shorter trip 
except  that  current  Federal  law  forbids  trucks  weighing  more  than  80,000  pounds 
from  driving  on  Interstate  95  north  of  Augusta.  Instead,  these  heavy  trucks  are 
forced  off  the  modern  four-lane,  limited-access  highway,  and  onto  smaller,  two-lane 
secondary roads that pass through cities, towns, and villages. 

This law not only increases the distance that trucks must travel, it increases their 
travel  time  and  results  in  a  higher  consumption  of  diesel  fuel.  In  fact,  Kurt  esti-
mates  that  permitting  his  trucks  to  travel  on  all  of  Interstate  95  would  save  him 
118  gallons  of  fuel  each  week.  At  approximately  $4.50  a  gallon,  and  including  sav-
ings  from  his  drivers  spending  less  time  on  the  trip,  he  could  save  more  than  $700 
a  week,  and  more  than  $33,000  and  5,600  gallons  of  fuel  each  year.  These  savings 
would  not  only  be  beneficial  to  Kurt’s  bottom  line,  but  also  to  his  employees,  his 
customers,  and  to  our  Nation  as  we  look  for  ways  to  decrease  the  overall  fuel  con-
sumption. 

To  help  provide  assistance  to  our  truckers,  I  recently  introduced  the  Commercial 
Truck  Fuel  Savings  Demonstration  Act,  with  my  senior  colleague  Senator  Olympia 
Snowe as the chief cosponsor. Our legislation would create a two-year pilot program 
that  would  permit  trucks  carrying  up  to  100,000  pounds  to  travel  on  the  Federal 
Interstate system whenever diesel prices are at or above $3.50 a gallon. 

Permitting trucks to carry up to 100,000 pounds on Federal highways would less-
en  the  fuel  cost  burden  on  truckers  in  three  ways.  First,  raising  the  weight  limit 
would  allow  more  cargo  to  be  put  into  each  truck,  thereby  reducing  the  numbers 
of  trucks  needed  to  transport  goods.  Second,  trucks  carrying  up  to  100,000  pounds 
would no longer need to move off the main Federal highways where trucks are lim-
ited  at  80,000  pounds  and  take  less  direct  routes  on  local  roads  requiring  consider-
ably  more  diesel  and  extended  periods  of  idling  during  each  trip.  Finally,  trucks 
traveling on the interstate system would save on fuel costs due to the much superior 
road design of the interstate system as compared to the state and local roads. 

Trucking  is  the  cornerstone  of  our  economy  as  most  of  our  goods  are  transported 
by  trucks  at  some  point  in  the  supply  chain.  Some  independent  truckers  in  Maine 
have  already  been  forced  out  of  business  due  to  rising  fuel  costs.  More  businesses 
are  facing  a  similar  fate  if  relief  is  not  provided.  The  Commercial  Truck  Fuel  Sav-
ings  Demonstration  Act  offers  an  immediate  and  cost  effective  way  to  help  our  Na-
tion’s struggling trucking industry, and individual drivers like Kurt Babineau. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  submit  my  statement,  which  I  hope  will  gen-
erate increased awareness of the need to address the problems facing the movement 
of freight by truck throughout the country. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

HON. PAUL R. BRUBAKER 

Question. The Bush Administration has tried to eliminate one of the Federal Gov-
ernment’s  most  powerful  public-private  partnership  tools  when  it  comes  to  freight 
investment—the  Railroad  Rehabilitation  and  Improvement  Financing  (RRIF)  pro-

(69) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

70 

gram.  This  program  provides  low-interest  loans  and  loan  guarantees  for  rail  infra-
structure  projects  and  could  help  fund  projects  to  reduce  major  chokepoints  like  in 
Chicago. Why has the Bush Administration tried to kill this program, given its tre-
mendous potential to help improve our infrastructure? 

Answer. The President’s 2009 budget does not propose terminating the RRIF pro-
gram,  but  instead  proposes  reforming  it  to  improve  its  effectiveness.  Likewise,  the 
Administration  has  sent  authorizing  legislation  to  Congress  to  sharpen  the  pro-
gram’s  focus.  The  Administration  continues  to  accept  and  process  loan  applications 
and administer the Railroad Rehabilitation and Improvement Financing (RRIF) pro-
gram. 

However, the Administration questions the program’s current design and purpose 
for  several  reasons.  First  of  all  railroads—including  Class  I  railroads  that  generate 
tens  of  billions  of  dollars  in  annual  revenue—are  fully  eligible  for  credit  assistance 
under the program. Privately-owned rail companies that have access to the Nation’s 
financial  markets  have  powerful  competitive  incentives  to  effectively  tap  into  those 
markets.  The  Administration  has  proposed  limiting  RRIF  eligibility  to  small  rail-
roads  only  which  are  most  in  need  of  assistance.  Second,  in  the  event  of  a  default 
on a RRIF loan, the Federal Treasury would be responsible for covering consequent 
losses.  Given  that  Congress  expanded  the  program’s  size  by  10-fold—from  $3.5  bil-
lion  to  $35  billion—those  losses  could  be  substantial.  The  Administration  would 
limit  the  amount  of  funds  a  railroad  could  borrow,  corresponding  with  the  focus  on 
small companies. Finally, railroads already benefit from several 2004 changes to the 
tax  code,  including  relief  from  diesel  fuel  taxes.  The  Administration  has  proposed 
legislative  reforms  for  the  program  to  prioritize  assistance  to  meet  demonstrated 
needs  and  to  ensure  the  efficient  use  of  taxpayers’  funds  and  to  better  protect  the 
Federal  interest.  The  Department  has  also  recently  published  a  notice  of  proposed 
rulemaking as a part of the process for administratively addressing some of the con-
cerns with the program. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:11 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\75682.TXT JACKIE

